HANGING BY A THREAD 





Throwing open the doors to her rooms, Nasuada strode to her desk, 
then dropped into a chair, blind to her surroundings. Her spine was so 
rigid that her shoulders did not touch the back. She felt frozen by the in- 
soluble quandary the Varden faced. The rise and fall of her chest slowed 
until it was imperceptible. I have failed, was all she could think. 


“Ma’am, your sleeve!” 


Jolted from her reverie, Nasuada looked down to find Farica beating at 
her right arm with a cleaning rag. A wisp of smoke rose from the em- 
broidered sleeve. Alarmed, Nasuada pushed herself out of the chair and 
twisted her arm, trying to find the cause of the smoke. Her sleeve and 
skirt were disintegrating into chalky cobwebs that emitted acrid fumes. 


“Get me out of this,” she said. 


She held her contaminated arm away from her body and forced herself 
to remain still as Farica unlaced her overgown. The handmaid’s fingers 
scrabbled against Nasuada’s back with frantic haste, fumbling with the 
knots, and then finally loosening the wool shell that encased Nasuada’s 
torso. As soon as the overgown sagged, Nasuada yanked her arms out of 
the sleeves and clawed her way free of the robe. 


Panting, she stood by the desk, clad only in her slippers and linen che- 
mise. To her relief, the expensive chainsil had escaped harm, although it 
had acquired a foul reek. 


“Did it burn you?” asked Farica. Nasuada shook her head, not trusting 
her tongue to respond. Farica nudged the overgown with the tip of her 
shoe. “What evil is this?” 


“One of Orrin’s foul concoctions,” croaked Nasuada. “I spilled it in his 
laboratory.” Calming herself with long breaths, she examined the ruined 
gown with dismay. It had been woven by the dwarf women of Dtirgrimst 
Ingeitum as a gift for her last birthday and was one of the finest pieces in 
her wardrobe. She had nothing to replace it, nor could she justify com- 
missioning a new dress, considering the Varden’s financial difficulties. 
Somehow I will have to make do without. 


Farica shook her head. “It’s a shame to lose such a pretty dress.” She 
went round the desk to a sewing basket and returned with a pair of 


302 


etched scissors. “We might as well save as much of the cloth as we can. 
I'll cut off the ruined parts and have them burned.” 


Nasuada scowled and paced the length of the room, seething with an- 
ger at her own clumsiness and at having another problem added to her 
already overwhelming list of worries. “What am I going to wear to court 
now?” she demanded. 


The scissors bit into the soft wool with brisk authority. “Mayhap your 
linen dress.” 


“It’s too casual to appear in before Orrin and his nobles.” 


“Give me a chance with it, Ma’am. I’m sure that I can alter it so it’s ser- 
viceable. By the time I’m done, it'll look twice as grand as this one ever 


did.” 


“No, no. It won't work. They'll just laugh at me. It’s hard enough to 
command their respect when I’m dressed properly, much less if I’m 
wearing patched gowns that advertise our poverty.” 


The older woman fixed Nasuada with a stern gaze. “It will work, so 
long as you don't apologize for your appearance. Not only that, I guaran- 
tee that the other ladies will be so taken with your new fashion that 
they'll imitate you. Just you wait and see.” Going to the door, she cracked 
it open and handed the damaged fabric to one of the guards outside. 
“Your mistress wants this burned. Do it in secret and breathe not a word 
of this to another soul or you'll have me to answer to.” The guard saluted. 


Nasuada could not help smiling. “How would I function without you, 
Farica?” 


“Quite well, I should think.” 


After donning her green hunting frock—which, with its light skirt, 
provided some respite from the day’s heat—Nasuada decided that even 
though she was ill disposed toward Orrin, she would take his advice and 
break with her regular schedule to do nothing more important than help 
Farica rip out stitches from the overgown. She found the repetitive task 
an excellent way to focus her thoughts. While she pulled on the threads, 
she discussed the Varden’s predicament with Farica, in the hope that she 
might perceive a solution that had escaped Nasuada. 


In the end, Farica’s only assistance was to observe, “Seems most matters 


393 


in this world have their root in gold. If we had enough of it, we could 
buy Galbatorix right off his black throne... might not even have to fight 
his men.” 


Did I really expect that someone else would do my job for me? Nasuada 
asked herself. I led us into this blind and I have to lead us out. 


Intending to cut open a seam, she extended her arm and snagged the tip 
of her knife on a fringe of bobbin lace, slicing it in half. She stared at the 
ragged wound in the lace, at the frayed ends of the parchment-colored 
strands that wriggled across the overgown like so many contorted worms, 
stared and felt a hysterical laugh claw at her throat even as a tear formed 
in her eye. Could her luck be any worse? 


The bobbin lace was the most valuable part of the dress. Even though 
lace required skill to make, its rarity and expense were mainly due to its 
central ingredient: vast, copious, mind-numbing, and deadening amounts 
of time. It took so long to produce that if you attempted to create a lace 
veil by yourself, your progress would be measured not in weeks but in 
months. Ounce for ounce, lace was worth more than gold or silver. 


She ran her fingers over the band of threads, pausing on the rift that she 
had created. It’s not as if lace takes that much energy, just time. She hated 
making it herself. Energy... energy... At that moment, a series of images 
flashed through her mind: Orrin talking about using magic for research; 
Trianna, the woman who had helmed Du Vrangr Gata since the Twins’ 
deaths; looking up at one of the Varden’s healers while he explained the 
principles of magic to Nasuada when she was only five or six years old. 
The disparate experiences formed a chain of reasoning that was so outra- 
geous and unlikely, it finally released the laugh imprisoned in her throat. 


Farica gave her an odd look and waited for an explanation. Standing, 
Nasuada tumbled half the overgown off her lap and onto the floor. 
“Fetch me Trianna this instant,” she said. “I don’t care what she’s doing: 
bring her here.” 


The skin around Farica’s eyes tightened, but she curtsied and said, “As 
you wish, Ma’am.” She departed through the hidden servants’ door. 


“Thank you,” Nasuada whispered in the empty room. 
She understood her maid’s reluctance; she too felt uncomfortable 


whenever she had to interact with magic users. Indeed, she only trusted 
Eragon because he was a Rider—although that was no proof of virtue, as 


304 


Galbatorix had shown—and because of his oath of fealty, which Nasuada 
knew he would never break. It scared her to consider magicians’ and sor- 
cerers’ powers. The thought that a seemingly ordinary person could kill 
with a word; invade your mind if he or she wished; cheat, lie, and steal 
without being caught; and otherwise defy society with near impunity... 


Her heart quickened. 


How did you enforce the law when a certain segment of the popula- 
tion possessed special powers? At its most basic level, the Varden’s war 
against the Empire was nothing more than an attempt to bring to justice 
a man who had abused his magical abilities and to prevent him from 
committing further crimes. All this pain and destruction because no one 
had the strength to defeat Galbatorix. He won’t even die after a normal 
span of years! 


Although she disliked magic, she knew that it would play a crucial role 
in removing Galbatorix and that she could not afford to alienate its prac- 
titioners until victory was assured. Once that occurred, she intended to 
resolve the problem that they presented. 


A brazen knock on her chamber door disturbed her thoughts. Fixing a 
pleasant smile on her face and guarding her mind as she had been trained, 
Nasuada said, “Enter!” It was important that she appear polite after sum- 
moning Trianna in such a rude manner. 


The door thrust open and the brunette sorceress strode into the room, 
her tousled locks piled high above her head with obvious haste. She 
looked as if she had just been roused from bed. Bowing in the dwarven 
fashion, she said, “You asked for me, Lady?” 


“I did.” Relaxing into a chair, Nasuada let her gaze slowly drift up and 
down Trianna. The sorceress lifted her chin under Nasuada’s examina- 
tion. “I need to know: What is the most important rule of magic?” 


Trianna frowned. “That whatever you do with magic requires the same 
amount of energy as it would to do otherwise.” 


“And what you can do is only limited by your ingenuity and by your 
knowledge of the ancient language?” 


“Other strictures apply, but in general, yes. Lady, why do you ask? 


These are basic principles of magic that, while not commonly bandied 
about, I am sure you are familiar with.” 


305 


“I am. I wished to ensure that I understood them properly.” Without 
moving from her chair, Nasuada reached down and lifted the overgown 
so that Trianna could see the mutilated lace. “So then, within those lim- 
its, you should be able to devise a spell that will allow you to manufac- 
ture lace with magic.” 


A condescending sneer distorted the sorceress’s dark lips. “Du Vrangr 
Gata has more important duties than repairing your clothes, Lady. Our 
art is not so common as to be employed for mere whims. I’m sure that 
you will find your seamstresses and tailors more than capable of fulfilling 
your request. Now, if you will excuse me, I—’” 


“Be quiet, woman,” said Nasuada in a flat voice. Astonishment muted 
Trianna in midsentence. “I see that I must teach Du Vrangr Gata the 
same lesson that I taught the Council of Elders: ] may be young, but I am 
no child to be patronized. I ask about lace because if you can manufac- 
ture it quickly and easily with magic, then we can support the Varden by 
selling inexpensive bobbin and needle lace throughout the Empire. Gal- 
batorix’s own people will provide the funds we need to survive.” 


“But that’s ridiculous,” protested Trianna. Even Farica looked skeptical. 
“You can’t pay for a war with lace. ” 


Nasuada raised an eyebrow. “Why not? Women who otherwise could 
never afford to own lace will leap at the chance to buy ours. Every 
farmer’s wife who longs to appear richer than she is will want it. Even 
wealthy merchants and nobles will give us their gold because our lace 
will be finer than any thrown or stitched by human hands. We'll garner a 
fortune to rival the dwarves’. That is, if you are skilled enough in magic 
to do what I want.” 


Trianna tossed her hair. “You doubt my abilities?” 

“Can it be done!” 

Trianna hesitated, then took the overgown from Nasuada and studied 
the lace strip for a long while. At last she said, “It should be possible, but 


I'll have to conduct some tests before I know for certain.” 


“Do so immediately. From now on, this is your most important assign- 
ment. And find an experienced lace maker to advise you on the patterns.” 


“Yes, Lady Nasuada.” 


306 


Nasuada allowed her voice to soften. “Good. I also want you to select 
the brightest members of Du Vrangr Gata and work with them to invent 
other magical techniques that will help the Varden. That’s your responsi- 
bility, not mine.” 


“Yes, Lady Nasuada.” 
“Now you are excused. Report back to me tomorrow morning.” 
“Yes, Lady Nasuada.” 


Satisfied, Nasuada watched the sorceress depart, then closed her eyes 
and allowed herself to enjoy a moment of pride for what she had accom- 
plished. She knew that no man, not even her father, would have thought 
of her solution. “This is my contribution to the Varden,” she told herself, 
wishing that Ajihad could witness it. Louder, she asked, “Did I surprise 
you, Farica?” 


“You always do, Ma’am.” 


397 


ELVA 





“Ma’am?... You’re needed, Ma’am.” 


“What?” Reluctant to move, Nasuada opened her eyes and saw Jér- 
mundur enter the room. The wiry veteran pulled off his helm, tucked it 
in the crook of his right arm, and made his way to her with his left hand 
planted on the pommel of his sword. 


The links of his hauberk clinked as he bowed. “My Lady.” 


“Welcome, Jormundur. How is your son today?” She was pleased that 
he had come. Of all the members of the Council of Elders, he had ac- 
cepted her leadership the most easily, serving her with the same dogged 
loyalty and determination as he had Ajihad. If all my warriors were like 
him, no one could stop us. 


“His cough has subsided.” 
‘I’m glad to hear it. Now, what brings you?” 


Lines appeared on Jérmundur’s forehead. He ran his free hand over his 
hair, which was tied back in a ponytail, then caught himself and pushed 
his hand back down to his side. “Magic, of the strangest kind.” 


“Oh?” 
“Do you remember the babe that Eragon blessed?” 


“Aye.” Nasuada had seen her only once, but she was well aware of the 
exaggerated tales about the child that circulated among the Varden, as 
well as the Varden’s hopes for what the girl might achieve once she grew 
up. Nasuada was more pragmatic about the subject. Whatever the infant 
became, it would not be for many years, by which time the battle with 
Galbatorix would already be won or lost. 


“I’ve been asked to take you to her.” 

“Asked? By whom? And why?” 

“A boy on the practice field told me that you should visit the child. 
Said that you would find it interesting. He refused to give me his name, 


but he looked like what that witch’s werecat is supposed to turn into, so 


308 


I thought... Well, I thought you should know.” Jérmundur looked embar- 
rassed. “I asked my men questions about the girl, and I heard things... that 
she’s different. ” 


“In what way?” 


He shrugged. “Enough to believe that you should do what the werecat 
says.” 


Nasuada frowned. She knew from the old stories that ignoring a were- 
cat was the height of folly and often led to one’s doom. However, his 
companion—Angela the herbalist—was another magic user that Nasuada 
did not entirely trust; she was too independent and unpredictable. 
“Magic,” she said, making it a curse. 


“Magic,” agreed Jormundur, though he used it as a word of awe and 
fear. 


“Very well, let us go visit this child. Is she within the castle?” 
“Orrin gave her and her caretaker rooms on the west side of the keep.” 
“Take me to her.” 


Gathering up her skirts, Nasuada ordered Farica to postpone the rest of 
the day’s appointments, then left the chambers. Behind her, she heard 
Jérmundur snap his fingers as he directed four guards to take up positions 
around her. A moment later, he joined her side, pointing out their course. 


The heat within Borromeo Castle had increased to the point where 
they felt as if they were trapped within a giant bread oven. The air 
shimmered like liquid glass along the windowsills. 


Though she was uncomfortable, Nasuada knew that she dealt with the 
heat better than most people because of her swarthy skin. The ones who 
had the hardest time enduring the high temperatures were men like Jér- 
mundur and her guards, who had to wear their armor all day long, even if 
they were stationed out under the lidless gaze of the sun. 


Nasuada kept close watch on the five men as sweat gathered on their 
exposed skin and their breathing became ever more ragged. Since they 
had arrived in Aberon, a number of the Varden had fainted from heat- 
stroke—two of whom died an hour or two later—and she had no inten- 
tion of losing more of her subjects by driving them beyond their physical 


3°99 


limits. 


When she deemed they needed to rest, she bade them to stop— 
overriding their objections—and get drinks of water from a servant. “I 
can't have you toppling like ninepins.” 


They had to break twice more before they reached their destination, a 
nondescript door recessed in the inner wall of the corridor. The floor 
around it was littered with gifts. 


Jérmundur knocked, and a quavering voice from inside asked, “Who is 
ie: 


“Lady Nasuada, come to see the child,” he said. 
“Be you of true heart and steadfast resolve?” 


This time Nasuada answered, “My heart is pure and my resolve is as 
s ” 
iron. 


“Cross the threshold, then, and be welcome.” 


The door swung open to an entryway lit by a single red dwarf lantern. 
No one was at the door. Proceeding inward, Nasuada saw that the walls 
and ceiling were swathed with layers of dark fabric, giving the place the 
appearance of a cave or lair. To her surprise, the air was quite cold, al- 
most chilly, like a brisk autumn night. Apprehension sank its poisonous 
claws into her belly. Magic. 


A black mesh curtain blocked her way. Brushing it aside, she found 
herself in what was once a sitting room. The furniture had been removed, 
except for a line of chairs pushed against the shrouded walls. A cluster of 
faint dwarf lanterns were hung in a dimple of the sagging fabric overhead, 
casting weird multicolored shadows in every direction. 


A bent crone watched her from the depths of one corner, bracketed by 
Angela the herbalist and the werecat, who stood with his hackles raised. 
In the center of the room knelt a pale girl that Nasuada took to be three 


or four years old. The girl picked at a platter of food on her lap. No one 
spoke. 


Confused, Nasuada asked, “Where is the baby?” 


The girl looked up. 


310 


Nasuada gasped as she saw the dragon mark bright upon the child’s 
brow and as she peered deep into her violet eyes. The girl quirked her 
lips with a terrible, knowing smile. “I am Elva.” 


Nasuada recoiled without thinking, clutching at the dagger she kept 
strapped to her left forearm. It was an adult’s voice and filled with an 
adult’s experience and cynicism. It sounded profane coming from the 
mouth of a child. 


“Don't run,” said Elva. “I’m your friend.” She put the platter aside; it was 
empty now. To the crone, she said, “More food.” The old woman hurried 
from the room. Then Elva patted the floor beside her. “Please, sit. I have 
been waiting for you ever since I learned to talk.” 


Keeping her grip on her dagger, Nasuada lowered herself to the stones. 
“When was that?” 


“Last week.” Elva folded her hands in her lap. She fixed her ghastly eyes 
on Nasuada, pinning her in place through the unnatural strength of her 
gaze. Nasuada felt as if a violet lance had pierced her skull and was twist- 
ing inside her mind, tearing apart her thoughts and memories. She fought 
the desire to scream. 


Leaning forward, Elva reached out and cupped Nasuada’s cheek with 
one soft hand. “You know, Ajihad could not have led the Varden better 
than you have. You chose the correct path. Your name will be praised for 
centuries for having the courage and foresight to move the Varden to 
Surda and attack the Empire when everyone else thought it was insane to 
do so.” 


Nasuada gaped at the girl, stunned. Like a key matched to a lock, Elva’s 
words perfectly addressed Nasuada’s primal fears, the doubts that kept 
her awake at night, sweating in the darkness. An involuntary surge of 
emotion rushed through her, bolstering her with a sense of confidence 
and peace that she had not possessed since before Ajihad’s death. Tears of 
relief burst from her eyes and rolled down her face. It was as if Elva had 
known exactly what to say in order to comfort her. 


Nasuada loathed her for it. 
Her euphoria warred against her distaste for how this moment of 


weakness had been induced and by whom. Nor did she trust the girl’s 
motivation. 


“What are you?” she demanded. 
“I am what Eragon made me.” 
“He blessed you.” 


The dreadful, ancient eyes were obscured for a moment as Elva 
blinked. “He did not understand his actions. Since Eragon ensorcelled me, 
whenever I see a person, I sense all the hurts that beset him and are 
about to beset him. When I was smaller, I could do nothing about it. So I 
grew bigger.” 


“Why would—’ 


“The magic in my blood drives me to protect people from pain... no 
matter the injury to myself or whether I want to help or not.” Her smile 
acquired a bitter twist. “It costs me dearly if I resist the urge.” 


As Nasuada digested the implications, she realized that Elva’s unsettling 
aspect was a by-product of the suffering that she had been exposed to. 
Nasuada shivered at the thought of what the girl had endured. It must 
have torn her apart to have this compulsion and yet be unable to act on it. 
Against her better judgment, she began to feel a measure of sympathy for 
Elva. 


“Why have you told me this?” 


“I thought that you should know who and what I am.” Elva paused, and 
the fire in her gaze strengthened. “And that I will fight for you however I 
can. Use me as you would an assassin—in hiding, in the dark, and with- 
out mercy.” She laughed with a high, chilling voice. “You wonder why; I 
see you do. Because unless this war ends, and sooner rather than later, it 
will drive me insane. I find it hard enough to deal with the agonies of 
everyday life without also having to confront the atrocities of battle. Use 
me to end it and I’ll ensure that your life is as happy as any human has 
had the privilege to experience.” 


At that moment, the crone scurried back into the room, bowed to 
Elva, and handed her a new platter of food. It was a physical relief to 
Nasuada as Elva looked down and attacked a leg of mutton, cramming 
the meat into her mouth with both hands. She ate with the ravenous in- 
tensity of a gorging wolf, displaying a complete lack of decorum. With 
her violet eyes hidden and her dragon mark covered by black bangs, she 


312 


once again appeared to be nothing more than an innocent child. 


Nasuada waited until it became apparent that Elva had said all she was 
going to. Then—at a gesture from Angela—she accompanied the herbal- 
ist through a side door, leaving the pale girl sitting alone in the center of 
the dark, cloth-bound room, like a dire fetus nestled in its womb, waiting 
for the right moment to emerge. 


Angela made sure that the door was closed and whispered, “All she 
does is eat and eat. We can’t sate her appetite with the current rations. 
Can you—’” 


“She'll be fed. You needn’t worry about it.” Nasuada rubbed her arms, 
trying to eradicate the memory of those awful, horrible eyes... 


“Thank you.” 

“Has this ever happened to anyone else?” 

Angela shook her head until her curly hair bounced on her shoulders. 
“Not in the entire history of magic. I tried to cast her future, but it’s a 
hopeless quagmire—lovely word, quagmire —because her life interacts 
with so many others.” 

“Is she dangerous?” 

“We're all dangerous.” 

“You know what I mean.” 

Angela shrugged. “She’s more dangerous than some and less than others. 
The one she’s most likely to kill, though, is herself. If she meets someone 
who's about to be hurt and Eragon’s spell catches her unawares, then 
she'll take the doomed person’s place. That’s why she stays inside most of 
the time.” 

“How far in advance can she foretell events?” 

“Two or three hours at the most.” 

Leaning against the wall, Nasuada considered the newest complication 
in her life. Elva could be a potent weapon if she were applied correctly. 


Through her, I can discern my opponents’ troubles and weaknesses, as well 
as what will please them and make them amenable to my wishes. In an 


313 


emergency, the girl could also act as an infallible guard if one of the 
Varden, like Eragon or Saphira, had to be protected. 


She can’t be left unsupervised. I need someone to watch her. Someone who 
understands magic and is comfortable enough with their own identity to re- 
sist Elva’s influence... and who I can trust to be reliable and honest. She 
immediately discounted Trianna. 


Nasuada looked at Angela. Though she was wary of the herbalist, she 
knew that Angela had helped the Varden with matters of the utmost 
delicacy and importance—like healing Eragon—and had asked for noth- 
ing in return. Nasuada could think of no one else who had the time, in- 
clination, and expertise to look after Elva. 

“I realize,” said Nasuada, “that this is presumptuous of me, as you aren't 
under my command and I know little of your life or duties, but I have a 
favor to ask of you.” 


“Proceed.” Angela waved a hand. 


Nasuada faltered, disconcerted, then forged ahead. “Would you be will- 
ing to keep an eye on Elva for me? I need—’ 


“Of course! And I'll keep two eyes on her, if I can spare them. I relish 
the opportunity to study her.” 


“You'll have to report to me,” warned Nasuada. 


“The poison dart hidden in the raisin tart. Ah, well, I suppose I can 
manage.” 


“I have your word, then?” 

“You have my word.” 

Relieved, Nasuada groaned and sank into a nearby chair. “Oh, what a 
mess. What a quagmire. As Eragon’s liegelord, I’m responsible for his 
deeds, but I never imagined that he would do anything as dreadful as this. 


It’s a blight on my honor as much as his.” 


A ripple of sharp pops filled the room as Angela cracked her knuckles. 
“Yes. I intend to speak to him about it once he returns from Ellesméra.” 


Her expression was so fierce, it alarmed Nasuada. “Well, don’t hurt 


314 


him. We need him.” 


“I won't... permanently.” 


315 


RESURGENCE 





A blast of ravening wind tore Eragon from his sleep. 


Blankets flapped over him as a tempest clawed at his room, hurling his 
possessions into the air and knocking the lanterns against the walls. Out- 
side, the sky was black with thunderheads. 


Saphira watched as Eragon staggered upright and fought to keep his 
balance as the tree swayed like a ship at sea. He lowered his head against 
the gale and made his way around the room, clutching at the wall until 
he reached the teardrop portal through which the storm howled. 


Eragon looked past the heaving floor to the ground below. It appeared 
to rock back and forth. He swallowed and tried to ignore the churning in 
his stomach. 


By touch he found the edge of the cloth membrane that could be 
pulled out of the wood to cover the opening. He prepared to launch 
himself from one side of the gap to the next. If he slipped, nothing would 
stop him from falling onto the roots of the tree. 


Wait, said Saphira. 


She backed off the low pedestal where she slept and laid her tail along- 
side him so that he could use it as a handrail. 


Holding the cloth with just his right hand, which took all his strength, 
Eragon used the line of spikes on Saphira’s tail to pull himself across the 
portal. As soon as he reached the far side, he grabbed the cloth with both 
hands and pressed its edge into the groove that locked it in place. 


The room went silent. 

The membrane bulged inward under the force of the angry elements 
but showed no sign of giving. Eragon poked it with his finger. The fabric 
was as taut as a drum. 

It’s amazing what the elves can do, he said. 

Saphira cocked her head, then lifted it so that her head was flat against 
the ceiling while she listened. You’d better close up the study; it’s being 


wrecked. 


316 


As he headed toward the stairs, the tree jolted and his leg buckled, 
sending him down hard on one knee. 


“Blast it,” he growled. 


The study was a whirlwind of paper and quills, darting about as if they 
had a mind of their own. He dove into the flurry with his arms wrapped 
around his head. It felt like he was being pelted with stones when the 
tips of the quills struck him. 


Eragon struggled to close the upper portal without Saphira’s help. The 
moment he did, pain—endless, mind-numbing pain— ripped open his 


back. 


He screamed once and went hoarse from the strength of his cry. His vi- 
sion flashed with red and yellow, then faded to black as he toppled to his 
side. Below, he heard Saphira howl with frustration; the staircase was too 
small and, outside, the wind was too ferocious for her to reach him. His 
connection with her receded. He surrendered to the waiting darkness as a 
release from his agony. 


A sour taste filled Eragon’s mouth when he woke. He did not know 
how long he had been lying on the floor, but the muscles in his arms and 
legs were knotted from being curled into a tight ball. The storm still as- 
sailed the tree, accompanied by a thudding rain that matched the pound- 
ing in his head. 


Saphira... ? 

I’m here. Can you come down? 

I'll try. 

He was too weak to stand on the pitching floor, so he crawled to the 
stairs and slid down one at a time, wincing with each impact. Halfway 
down, he encountered Saphira, who had jammed her head and neck as 
far up the stairs as she could, gouging the wood in her frenzy. 

Little one. She flicked out her tongue and caught him on the hand with 


its rough tip. He smiled. Then she arched her neck and tried to pull back, 
but to no avail. 


317 


What's wrong? 
I’m stuck. 


You’re...He could not help it; he laughed even though it hurt. The 
situation was too absurd. 


She snarled and heaved her entire body, shaking the tree with her ef- 
forts and knocking him over. Then she collapsed, panting. Well, don’t just 
sit there grinning like an idiot fox. Help me! 


Fighting the urge to giggle, he put his foot on her nose and pushed as 
hard as he dared while Saphira twisted and squirmed in an attempt to 
free herself. 

It took more than ten minutes before she succeeded. Only then did Er- 
agon see the full extent of the damage to the stairwell. He groaned. Her 
scales had cut through the bark and obliterated the delicate patterns 
grown out from the wood. 


Oops, said Saphira. 


At least you did it, not me.The elves might forgive you. They’d sing dwarf 
love ballads night and day if you asked them to. 


He joined Saphira on her dais and huddled against the flat scales of her 
belly, listening as the storm roared about them. The wide membrane be- 
came translucent whenever lightning pulsed in jagged shards of light. 


What time do you think it is? 


Several hours before we must meet Oromis. Go on, sleep and recover. I 


will keep guard. 


He did just that, despite the tree’s churning. 


318 


WHY DO YOU FIGHT? 





Oromis’s timepiece buzzed like a giant hornet, blaring in Eragon’s ears 
until he retrieved the bauble and wound the mechanism. 


His bashed knee had turned purple, he was sore both from his attack 
and the elves’ Dance of Snake and Crane, and he could do no more than 
croak with his ragged throat. The worst injury, though, was his sense of 
foreboding that this would not be the last time Durza’s wound would 
trouble him. The prospect sickened him, draining his strength and will. 


So many weeks passed between attacks, he said, I began to hope that 
maybe, just maybe, I was healed.... I suppose sheer luck is the only reason I 
was spared that long. 


Extending her neck, Saphira nuzzled him on the arm. You know you 
aren't alone, little one. I’ll do everything I can to help. He responded with 
a weak smile. Then she licked his face and added, You should get ready to 
leave. 


I know. He stared at the floor, unwilling to move, then dragged himself 
to the wash closet, where he scrubbed himself clean and used magic to 
shave. 


He was in the middle of drying himself when he felt a presence touch 
his mind. Without pausing to think, Eragon began to fortify his mind, 
concentrating on an image of his big toe to the exclusion of all else. Then 
he heard Oromis say, Admirable, but unnecessary. Bring Zar’roc with you 
today. The presence vanished. 


Eragon released a shaky breath. I need to be more alert, he told Saphira. I 
would have been at his mercy if he were an enemy. 


Not with me around. 


When his ablutions were complete, Eragon unhooked the membrane 
from the wall and mounted Saphira, cradling Zar’roc in the crook of his 
arm. 


Saphira took flight with a rush of air, angling toward the Crags of 
Tel’naeir. From their high vantage point, they could see the damage that 
the storm had wreaked on Du Weldenvarden. No trees had fallen in 
Ellesméra, but farther away, where the elves’ magic was weaker, numer- 


319 


ous pines had been knocked over. The remaining wind made the crossed 
branches and trees rub together, producing a brittle chorus of creaks and 
groans. Clouds of golden pollen, as thick as dust, streamed out from the 
trees and flowers. 


While they flew, Eragon and Saphira exchanged memories of their 
separate lessons from the day before. He told her what he had learned 
about ants and the ancient language, and she told him about downdrafts 
and other dangerous weather patterns and how to avoid them. 


Thus, when they landed and Oromis interrogated Eragon about 
Saphira’s lessons and Glaedr interrogated Saphira about Eragon’s, they 
were able to answer every question. 


“Very good, Eragon-vodhr.” 
Aye. Well played, Bjartskular, added Glaedr to Saphira. 


As before, Saphira was sent off with Glaedr while Eragon remained on 
the cliffs, although this time he and Saphira were careful to maintain 
their link so as to absorb each other’s instruction. 


As the dragons departed, Oromis observed, “Your voice is rougher to- 
day, Eragon. Are you sick?” 


“My back hurt again this morning.” 


“Ah. You have my sympathy.” He motioned with one finger. “Wait 
here.” 


Eragon watched as Oromis strode into his hut and then reappeared, 
looking fierce and warlike with his silver mane rippling in the wind and 
his bronze sword in hand. “Today,” he said, “we shall forgo the Rimgar 
and instead cross our two blades, Naegling and Zar’roc. Draw thy sword 
and guard its edge as your first master taught you.” 


Eragon wanted nothing more than to refuse. However, he had no inten- 
tion of breaking his vow or letting his resolve waver in front of Oromis. 
He swallowed his trepidation. This is what it means to be a Rider, he 
thought. 


Drawing upon his reserves, he located the nub deep within his mind 


that connected him to the wild flow of magic. He delved into it, and the 
energy suffused him. “Géuloth du knifr,” he said, and a winking blue star 


320 


popped into existence between his thumb and forefinger, jumping from 
one to the next as he ran it down Zar’roc’s perilous length. 


The instant their swords met, Eragon knew that he was as out-matched 
by Oromis as by Durza and Arya. Eragon was an exemplary human 
swordsman, but he could not compete with warriors whose blood ran 
thick with magic. His arm was too weak and his reflexes too slow. Still, 
that did not stop him from trying to win. He fought to the limits of his 
abilities, even if, in the end, it was a futile prospect. 


Oromis tested him in every conceivable manner, forcing Eragon to util- 
ize his entire arsenal of blows, counterblows, and underhand tricks. It was 
all for naught. He could not touch the elf. As a last resort, he tried alter- 
ing his style of fighting, which could unsettle even the most hardened 
veteran. All it got him was a welt on his thigh. 


“Move your feet faster,” cried Oromis. “He who stands like a pillar dies 
in battle. He who bends like a reed is triumphant!” 


The elf was glorious in action, a perfect blend of control and untamed 
violence. He pounced like a cat, struck like a heron, and bobbed and 
wove with the grace of a weasel. 


They had been sparring for almost twenty minutes when Oromis fal- 
tered, his narrow features clamped in a brief grimace. Eragon recognized 
the symptoms of Oromis’s mysterious illness and lashed out with Zar’roc. 
It was a low thing to do, but Eragon was so frustrated, he was willing to 
take advantage of any opening, no matter how unfair, just to have the sat- 
isfaction of marking Oromis at least once. 


Zarroc never reached its target. As Eragon twisted, he overextended 
and strained his back. 


The pain was upon him without warning. 


The last thing he heard was Saphira shouting, Eragon! 


Despite the intensity of the fit, Eragon remained conscious throughout 
his ordeal. Not that he was aware of his surroundings, only the fire that 
burned in his flesh and prolonged each second into an eternity. The worst 
part was that he could do nothing to end his suffering but wait... and 
wait... 


321 


Eragon lay panting in the cold mud. He blinked as his vision came into 
focus and he saw Oromis sitting on a stool next to him. Pushing himself 
onto his knees, Eragon surveyed his new tunic with a mixture of regret 
and disgust. The fine russet cloth was caked with dirt from his convul- 
sions on the ground. Muck filled his hair as well. 


He could sense Saphira in his mind, radiating concern as she waited for 
him to notice her. How can you continue like this? she fretted. It’ll destroy 
you. 


Her misgivings undermined Eragon’s remaining fortitude. Saphira had 
never before expressed doubt that he would prevail, not at Dras-Leona, 
Gil’ead, or Farthen Dar, nor with any of the dangers they had encoun- 
tered. Her confidence had given him courage. Without it he was truly 


afraid. 

You should concentrate on your lesson, he said. 

I should concentrate on you. 

Leave me alone! He snapped at her like a wounded animal that wants 
to nurse its injuries in silence and in dark. She fell silent, leaving just 
enough of their connection intact so that he was vaguely aware of Glaedr 


teaching her about fireweed, which she could chew to help her digestion. 


Eragon combed the mud from his hair with his fingers, then spat out a 
globule of blood. “Bit my tongue.” 


Oromis nodded as if it were to be expected. “Do you require healing?” 

“No.” 

“Very well. Tend to your sword, then bathe and go to the stump in the 
glade and listen to the thoughts of the forest. Listen, and when you hear 
no more, come tell me what you have learned.” 

“Yes, Master.” 

As he sat on the stump, Eragon found that his turbulent thoughts and 


emotions prevented him from mustering the concentration to open his 
mind and sense the creatures in the hollow. Nor was he interested in do- 


322 


ing So. 


Still, the peaceful quality of his surroundings gradually ameliorated his 
resentment, confusion, and stubborn anger. It did not make him happy, 
but it did bring him a certain fatalistic acceptance. This is my lot in life, 
and I'd better get used to it because it’s not about to improve in the foresee- 
able future. 


After a quarter of an hour, his faculties had regained their usual acuity, 
so he resumed studying the colony of red ants that he had discovered the 
day before. He also tried to be aware of everything else that was happen- 
ing in the glade, as Oromis had instructed. 


Eragon met with limited success. If he relaxed and allowed himself to 
absorb input from all the consciousnesses nearby, thousands of images 
and feelings rushed into his head, piling on top of one another in quick 
flashes of sound and color, touch and smell, pain and pleasure. The 
amount of information was overwhelming. Out of pure habit, his mind 
would snatch one subject or another from the torrent, excluding all the 
rest before he noticed his lapse and wrenched himself back into a state of 
passive receptivity. The cycle repeated itself every few seconds. 


Despite that, he was able to improve his understanding of the ants’ 
world. He got his first clue as to their genders when he deduced that the 
huge ant in the heart of their underground lair was laying eggs, one every 
minute or so, which made it—her—a female. And when he accompanied 
a group of the red ants up the stem of their rosebush, he got a vivid 
demonstration of the kind of enemies they faced: something darted out 
from underneath a leaf and killed one of the ants he was bound to. It was 
hard for him to guess exactly what the creature was, since the ants only 
saw fragments of it and, in any case, they placed more emphasis on smell 
than vision. If they had been people, he would have said that they were 
attacked by a terrifying monster the size of a dragon, which had jaws as 
powerful as the spiked portcullis at Teirm and could move with whip- 
lash speed. 


The ants ringed in the monster like grooms working to capture a run- 
away horse. They darted at it with a total lack of fear, nipping at its 
knobbed legs and withdrawing an instant before they were caught in the 
monster's iron pincers. More and more ants joined the throng. They 
worked together to overpower the intruder, never faltering, even when 
two were caught and killed and when several of their brethren fell off the 
stem to the ground below. 


323 


It was a desperate battle, with neither side willing to give quarter. Only 
escape or victory would save the combatants from a horrible death. Er- 
agon followed the fray with breathless anticipation, awed by the ants’ 
bravery and how they continued to fight in spite of injuries that would 
incapacitate a human. Their feats were heroic enough to be sung about 
by bards throughout the land. 


Eragon was so engrossed by the contest that when the ants finally pre- 
vailed, he loosed an elated cry so loud, it roused the birds from their 
roosts among the trees. 


Out of curiosity, he returned his attention to his own body, then 
walked to the rosebush to view the dead monster for himself. What he 
saw was an ordinary brown spider with its legs curled into a fist being 
transported by the ants down to their nest for food. 


Amazing. 


He started to leave, but then realized that once again he had neglected 
to keep watch over the myriad other insects and animals in the glade. He 
closed his eyes and whirled through the minds of several dozen beings, 
doing his best to memorize as many interesting details as he could. It was 
a poor substitute for prolonged observation, but he was hungry and he 
had already exhausted his assigned hour. 


When Eragon rejoined Oromis in his hut, the elf asked, “How went it?” 


“Master, I could listen night and day for the next twenty years and still 
not know everything that goes on in the forest.” 


Oromis raised an eyebrow. “You have made progress.” After Eragon de- 
scribed what he had witnessed, Oromis said, “But still not enough, I fear. 
You must work harder, Eragon. I know you can. You are intelligent and 
persistent, and you have the potential to be a great Rider. As difficult as 
it is, you have to learn to put aside your troubles and concentrate entirely 
on the task at hand. Find peace within yourself and let your actions flow 
from there.” 


“I’m doing my best.” 
“No, this isn’t your best. We shall recognize your best when it appears.” 
He paused thoughtfully. “Perhaps it would help if you had a fellow stu- 


dent to compete with. Then we might see your best.... I will think on the 
matter.” 


324 


From his cupboards, Oromis produced a loaf of freshly baked bread, a 
wood jar of hazelnut butter—which the elves used in place of actual but- 
ter—and a pair of bowls that he ladled full of a vegetable stew that had 
been simmering in a pot hung over a bed of coals in the corner fireplace. 


Eragon looked at the stew with distaste; he was sick of the elves’ fare. 
He longed for meat, fish, or fowl, something hearty that he could sink his 
teeth into, not this endless parade of plants. “Master,” he asked to distract 
himself, “why do you have me meditate? Is it so that I will understand 
the doings of the animals and insects, or is there more to it than that?” 


“Can you think of no other motive?” Oromis sighed when Eragon shook 
his head. “Always it is thus with my new students, and especially with 
the human ones; the mind is the last muscle they train or use, and the 
one that they regard the least. Ask them about swordplay and they can 
list every blow from a duel a month old, but ask them to solve a problem 
or make a coherent statement and... well, I would be lucky to get more 
than a blank stare in return. You are still new to the world of gramarye— 
as magic is properly called—but you must begin to consider its full im- 
plications.” 


“How so?” 


“Imagine for a moment that you are Galbatorix, with all of his vast re- 
sources at your command. The Varden have destroyed your Urgal army 
with the help of a rival Dragon Rider, who you know was educated—at 
least in part—by one of your most dangerous and implacable foes, Brom. 
You are also aware that your enemies are massing in Surda for a possible 
invasion. Given that, what would be the easiest way to deal with these 
various threats, short of flying into battle yourself?” 


Eragon stirred his stew to cool it while he examined the issue. “It seems 
to me,” he said slowly, “that the easiest thing would be to train a corps of 
magicians—they wouldn't even have to be that powerful—force them to 
swear loyalty to me in the ancient language, then have them infiltrate 
Surda to sabotage the Varden’s efforts, poison wells, and assassinate 
Nasuada, King Orrin, and other key members of the resistance.” 


“And why hasn't Galbatorix done this yet?” 
“Because until now, Surda was of negligible interest to him, and be- 


cause the Varden have dwelled in Farthen Dir for decades, where they 
were able to examine every newcomer’s mind for duplicity, which they 


er) 


can’t do in Surda since its border and population are so large.” 


“Those are my very conclusions,” said Oromis. “Unless Galbatorix for- 
sakes his lair in Urd’baen, the greatest danger you're likely to encounter 
during the Varden’s campaign will come from fellow magicians. You 
know as well as I how difficult it is to guard against magic, especially if 
your opponent has sworn in the ancient language to kill you, no matter 
the cost. Instead of attempting to first conquer your mind, such a foe will 
simply cast a spell to obliterate you, even though—in the instant before 
you are destroyed—you will still be free to retaliate. However, you can- 
not fell your murderer if you don’t know who or where he is.” 


“So sometimes you don’t have to bother taking control of your oppo- 
nent’s mind?” 


“Sometimes, but it’s a risk to avoid.” Oromis paused to consume a few 
spoonfuls of stew. “Now, to address the heart of this issue, how do you 
defend yourself against anonymous enemies who can contravene any 
physical precautions and slay with a muttered word?” 


“I don’t see how, unless...” Eragon hesitated, then smiled. “Unless I was 
aware of the consciousnesses of all the people around me. Then I could 
sense if they meant me harm.” 

Oromis appeared pleased by his answer. “Even so, Eragon-finiarel. And 
that’s the answer to your question. Your meditations condition your 
mind to find and exploit flaws in your enemies’ mental armor, no matter 
how small.” 

“But won't another magic user know if I touch their mind?” 

“Aye, they will know, but most people won't. And as for the magicians, 
they will know, they will be afraid, and they will shield their minds from 


you out of their fear, and you will know them because of it.” 


“Isn’t it dangerous to leave your consciousness unguarded? If you're at- 
tacked mentally, you could easily be overwhelmed.” 


“It’s less dangerous than being blind to the world.” 


Eragon nodded. He tapped his spoon against his bowl in a measured 
meter of time, engrossed in his thoughts, then said, “It feels wrong.” 


“Oh? Explain yourself.” 


326 


“What about people’s privacy? Brom taught me to never intrude in 
someone’s mind unless it was absolutely necessary.... I guess I’m uncom- 
fortable with the idea of prying into people’s secrets... secrets that they 
have every right to keep to themselves.” He cocked his head. “Why didn’t 
Brom tell me about this if it’s so important? Why didn’t he train me in it 
himself?” 


“Brom told you,” said Oromis, “what was appropriate to tell you under 
the circumstances. Dipping into the pool of minds can prove addictive to 
those with a malicious personality or a taste for power. It was not taught 
to prospective Riders—though we had them meditate as you do 
throughout their training—until we were convinced that they were ma- 
ture enough to resist temptation. 


“It is an invasion of privacy, and you will learn many things from it that 
you never wanted to. However, this is for your own good and the good of 
the Varden. I can say from experience, and from watching other Riders 
experience the same, that this, above all else, will help you to understand 
what drives people. And understanding begets empathy and compassion, 
even for the meanest beggar in the meanest city of Alagaésia.” 


They were quiet for a while, eating, then Oromis asked, “Can you tell 
me, What is the most important mental tool a person can possess?” 


It was a serious question, and Eragon considered it for a reasonable span 
before he ventured to say, “Determination.” 


Oromis tore the loaf in half with his long white fingers. “I can under- 
stand why you arrived at that conclusion—determination has served you 
well in your adventures—but no. I meant the tool most necessary to 
choose the best course of action in any given situation. Determination is 
as common among men who are dull and foolish as it is among those 
who are brilliant intellects. So, no, determination cannot be what we're 
looking for.” 


This time Eragon treated the question as he would a riddle, counting 
the number of words, whispering them out loud to establish whether 
they rhymed, and otherwise examining them for hidden meaning. The 
problem was, he was no more than a mediocre riddler and had never 
placed very high in Carvahall’s annual riddle contest. He thought too lit- 
erally to work out the answers to riddles that he had not heard before, a 
legacy of Garrow’s practical upbringing. 


a7 


“Wisdom,” he finally said. “Wisdom is the most important tool for a 
person to possess.” 


“A fair guess, but, again, no. The answer is logic. Or, to put it another 
way, the ability to reason analytically. Applied properly, it can overcome 
any lack of wisdom, which one only gains through age and experience.” 


Eragon frowned. “Yes, but isn’t having a good heart more important 
than logic? Pure logic can lead you to conclusions that are ethically 
wrong, whereas if you are moral and righteous, that will ensure that you 
don’t act shamefully.” 


A razor-thin smile curled Oromis’s lips. “You confuse the issue. All I 
wanted to know was the most useful tool a person can have, regardless of 
whether that person is good or evil. I agree that it’s important to be of a 
virtuous nature, but I would also contend that if you had to choose be- 
tween giving a man a noble disposition or teaching him to think clearly, 
you'd do better to teach him to think clearly. Too many problems in this 
world are caused by men with noble dispositions and clouded minds. 


“History provides us with numerous examples of people who were 
convinced that they were doing the right thing and committed terrible 
crimes because of it. Keep in mind, Eragon, that no one thinks of himself 
as a villain, and few make decisions they think are wrong. A person may 
dislike his choice, but he will stand by it because, even in the worst cir- 
cumstances, he believes that it was the best option available to him at 
the time. 


“On its own, being a decent person is no guarantee that you will act 
well, which brings us back to the one protection we have against dema- 
gogues, tricksters, and the madness of crowds, and our surest guide 
through the uncertain shoals of life: clear and reasoned thinking. Logic 
will never fail you, unless you’re unaware of—or deliberately ignore—the 
consequences of your deeds.” 


“If elves are so logical,” said Eragon, “then you must all agree on what to 


do ” 


“Hardly,” averred Oromis. “Like every race, we adhere to a wide range 
of tenets, and, as a result, we often arrive at differing conclusions, even in 
identical situations. Conclusions, I might add, that make logical sense 
from each person's point of view. And although I wish it were otherwise, 
not all elves have trained their minds properly.” 


328 


“How do you intend to teach me this logic?” 


Oromis’s smile broadened. “By the oldest and most effective method: 
debating. I will ask you a question, then you will answer and defend your 
position.” He waited while Eragon refilled his bowl with stew. “For ex- 
ample, why do you fight the Empire?” 


The sudden change of topic caught Eragon off guard. He had a feeling 
that Oromis had just reached the subject that he had been driving toward 
all along. “As I said before, to help those who suffer from Galbatorix’s 
rule and, to a lesser extent, for personal vengeance.” 


“Then you fight for humanitarian reasons?” 
“What do you mean?” 


“That you fight to help the people who Galbatorix has harmed and to 
stop him from hurting any more.” 


“Exactly,” said Eragon. 


“Ah, but answer me this, my young Rider: Won't your war with Galba- 
torix cause more pain than it will ever prevent? The majority of people 
in the Empire live normal, productive lives untouched by their king’s 
madness. How can you justify invading their land, destroying their homes, 
and killing their sons and daughters?” 


Eragon gaped, stunned that Oromis could ask such a question— 
Galbatorix was evil —and stunned because no easy reply presented itself. 
He knew that he was in the right, but how could he prove it? “Don’t you 
believe that Galbatorix should be overthrown?” 

“That is not the question.” 


“You must believe it, though,” persisted Eragon. “Look what he did to 
the Riders.” 


Dunking his bread in his stew, Oromis resumed eating, letting Eragon 
fume in silence. When he finished, Oromis folded his hands in his lap and 
asked, “Have I upset you?” 


“Yes, you have.” 


“I see. Well then, continue to ponder the matter until you find an an- 


379 


swer. I expect it to be a convincing one.” 


33° 


BLACK MORNING GLORY 





They cleared the table and took the dishes outside, where they cleaned 
them with sand. Oromis crumbled what remained of the bread around 
his house for the birds to eat, then they returned inside. 


Oromis brought out pens and ink for Eragon, and they resumed his 
education of the Liduen Kvaedhi, the written form of the ancient lan- 
guage, which was so much more elegant than the humans’ or dwarves’ 
runes. Eragon lost himself in the arcane glyphs, happy to have a task that 
required nothing more strenuous than rote memorization. 


After hours spent bent over the paper sheets, Oromis waved a hand 
and said, “Enough. We will continue this tomorrow.” Eragon leaned back 
and rolled his shoulders while Oromis selected five scrolls from their 
nooks in the wall. “Two of these are in the ancient language, three are in 
your native tongue. They will help you to master both alphabets, as well 
as give you valuable information that would be tedious for me to vocal- 
ize.” 


“Vocalize?” 


With unerring accuracy, Oromis’s hand darted out and plucked a mas- 
sive sixth scroll from the wall, which he added to the pyramid in Eragon’s 
arms. “This is a dictionary. I doubt you can, but try to read it all.” 


When the elf opened the door for him to leave, Eragon said, “Master?” 
“Yes, Eragon?” 
“When will we start working with magic?” 


Oromis leaned on one arm against the doorway, caving in on himself as 
if he no longer possessed the will to remain upright. Then he sighed and 
said, “You must trust me to guide your training, Eragon. Still, I suppose it 
would be foolish of me to delay any longer. Come, leave the scrolls on 
the table, and let us go explore the mysteries of gramarye.” 


On the greensward before the hut, Oromis stood looking out over the 
Crags of Tel’naeir, his back to Eragon, his feet shoulder width apart, and 
his hands clasped in the small of his back. Without turning around, he 
asked, “What is magic?” 


331 


“The manipulation of energy through the use of the ancient language.” 


There was a pause before Oromis responded. “Technically, you are cor- 
rect, and many spellcasters never understand more than that. However, 
your description fails to capture the essence of magic. Magic is the art of 
thinking, not strength or language—you already know that a limited vo- 
cabulary is no obstacle to using magic. As with everything else you must 
master, magic relies on having a disciplined intellect. 


“Brom bypassed the normal training regimen and ignored the subtleties 
of gramarye to ensure that you had the skills you needed to remain alive. 
I too must distort the regimen in order to focus on the skills that you will 
likely require in the coming battles. However, whereas Brom taught you 
the crude mechanics of magic, I will teach you its finer applications, the 
secrets that were reserved for the wisest of the Riders: how you can kill 
with no more energy than moving your finger, the method by which you 
can instantaneously transport an item from one point to another, a spell 
that will allow you to identify poisons in your food and drink, a variation 
on scrying that allows you to hear as well as to see, how you can draw 
energy from your surroundings and thus preserve your own strength, and 
how you can maximize your strength in every possible way. 


“These techniques are so potent and dangerous, they were never shared 
with novice Riders such as yourself, but circumstances demand that I di- 
vulge them and trust that you won't abuse them.” Raising his right arm to 
his side, his hand a hooked claw, Oromis proclaimed, “Adurna!” 


Eragon watched as a sphere of water coalesced from the brook by the 
hut and floated through the air until it hovered between Oromis’s out- 
stretched fingers. 


The brook was dark and brown under the branches of the forest, but 
the sphere, removed from it, was as colorless as glass. Flecks of moss, dirt, 
and other bits of detritus floated inside the orb. 


Still gazing toward the horizon, Oromis said, “Catch.” He tossed the 
sphere back over his shoulder toward Eragon. 


Eragon tried to grab the ball, but as soon as it touched his skin, the wa- 
ter lost cohesion and splashed across his chest. 


“Catch it with magic,” said Oromis. Again, he cried, “Adurna!” and a 


sphere of water gathered itself from the surface of the brook and leaped 
into his hand like a trained hawk obeying its master. 


332 


This time Oromis threw the ball without warning. Eragon was pre- 
pared, though, and said, “Reisa du adurna,” even as he reached for the ball. 
It slowed to a halt a hairsbreadth from the skin of his palm. 


“An awkward word choice,” said Oromis, “but workable, nevertheless.” 
Eragon grinned and whispered, “Thrysta.” 


The ball reversed its course and sped toward the base of Oromis’s silver 
head. However, the sphere did not land where Eragon had intended, but 
rather shot past the elf, whipped around, and flew back at Eragon with 
increased velocity. 


The water remained as hard and solid as polished marble when it 
struck Eragon, producing a dull thunk as it collided with his skull. The 
blow knocked him sprawling on the turf, where he lay stunned, blinking 
as pulsing lights swam across the sky. 


“Yes,” said Oromis. “A better word might be letta or kodthr.” He finally 
turned to look at Eragon and raised an eyebrow with apparent surprise. 
“Whatever are you doing? Get up. We can't lay about all day.” 


“Yes, Master,” groaned Eragon. 


When Eragon got back on his feet, Oromis had him manipulate the wa- 
ter in various ways—shaping it into complex knots, changing the color of 
light that it absorbed or reflected, and freezing it in certain prescribed se- 
quences—none of which proved difficult for him. 


The exercises continued for so long that Eragon’s initial interest faded 
and was replaced by impatience and puzzlement. He was chary of of- 
fending Oromis, but he saw no point to what the elf was doing; it was as 
if Oromis were avoiding any spells that would require him to use more 
than a minimal amount of strength. I’ve already demonstrated the extent of 
my skills. Why does he persist in reviewing these fundamentals? He said, 
“Master, I know all of this. Can we not move on?” 


The muscles in Oromis’s neck hardened, and his shoulders were like 
chiseled granite for all they moved; even the elf’s breathing halted before 
he said, “Will you never learn respect, Eragon-vodhr? So be it!” Then he 
uttered four words from the ancient language in a voice so deep that 
their meaning escaped Eragon. 


333 


Eragon yelped as he felt each of his legs enveloped by pressure up to 
the knee, squeezing and constricting his calves in such a way that made it 
impossible for him to walk. His thighs and upper body were free to 
move, but other than that, it was as if he had been cast in lime mortar. 


“Free yourself,” said Oromis. 


Here now was a challenge that Eragon had never dealt with before: 
how to counter someone else’s spells. He could sever his invisible bonds 
using one of two different methods. The most effective would be if he 
knew how Oromis had immobilized him—whether by affecting his body 
directly or using an external source—for then he could redirect the ele- 
ment or force to disperse Oromis’s power. Or he could use a generic, 
vague spell to block whatever Oromis was doing. The downside to the 
tactic was that it would lead to a direct contest of strength between 
them. It had to happen sometime, thought Eragon. He entertained no hope 
of prevailing against an elf. 


Assembling the required phrase, he said, “Losna kalfya iet.” Release my 
calves. 


The surge of energy that deserted Eragon was greater than he had an- 
ticipated; he went from being moderately tired from the day’s pains and 
exertions to feeling as if he had hiked over rough terrain since morn. 
Then the pressure vanished from his legs, causing him to stagger as he re- 
gained his balance. 


Oromis shook his head. “Foolish,” he said, “very foolish. If I had com- 
mitted more to maintaining my spell, that would have killed you. Never 
use absolutes.” 


“Absolutes?” 


“Never word your spells so that only two outcomes are possible: suc- 
cess or death. If an enemy had trapped your legs and if he were stronger 
than you, then you would have expended all of your energy trying to 
break his spell. You would have died with no chance to abort the at- 
tempt once you realized that it was futile.” 


“How do I avoid that?” asked Eragon. 
“It’s safer to make the spell a process that you can terminate at your dis- 


cretion. Instead of saying release my calves, which is an absolute, you 
could say reduce the magic imprisoning my calves. A bit wordy, but you 


334 


could then decide how much you wanted your opponent’s spell de- 
creased and if it were safe to remove it entirely. We will try again.” 


The pressure returned to Eragon’s legs as soon as Oromis mouthed his 
inaudible invocation. Eragon was so tired, he doubted that he could pro- 
vide much opposition. Nevertheless, he reached for the magic. 


Before the ancient language left Eragon’s mouth, he became aware of a 
curious sensation as the weight constraining his legs lessened at a steady 
rate. It tickled and felt like he was being pulled out of a mire of cold, 
slick mud. He glanced at Oromis and saw the elf’s face scribed by passion, 
as if he clung to something precious that he could not bear to lose. A 
vein throbbed at one of Oromis’s temples. 


When Eragon’s arcane fetters ceased to exist, Oromis recoiled as if he 
had been pricked by a wasp and stood with his gaze fixed on his two 
hands, his thin chest heaving. For perhaps a minute, he remained thus, 
then he drew himself upright and walked to the very edge of the Crags of 
Tel’naeir, a lone figure outlined against the pale sky. 


Regret and sorrow welled in Eragon—the same emotions that had 
gripped him when he first saw Glaedr’s mutilated foreleg. He cursed 
himself for being so arrogant with Oromis, so oblivious to his infirmities, 
and for not placing more confidence in the elf’s judgment. I’m not the only 
one who must deal with past injuries. Eragon had not fully comprehended 
what it meant when Oromis said that all but the slightest magic escaped 
his grasp. Now he appreciated the depths of Oromis’s situation and the 
pain that it must cause him, especially for one of his race, who was born 
and bred with magic. 


Eragon went to Oromis, knelt, and bowed in the fashion of the 
dwarves, pressing his bruised forehead against the ground. “Ebrithil, I beg 
your pardon.” 


The elf gave no indication that he had heard. 


The two of them lingered in their respective positions while the sun 
declined before them, the birds sang their evening songs, and the air grew 
cool and moist. From the north came the faint offbeat thumps of Saphira 
and Glaedr’s wing strokes as they returned for the day. 


In a low, distant voice, Oromis said, “We will begin anew tomorrow, 


with this and other subjects.” From his profile, Eragon could tell that 
Oromis had regained his customary expression of impassive reserve. “Is 


335 


that agreeable to you?” 
“Yes, Master,” said Eragon, grateful for the question. 


“I think it best if, from now on, you endeavor to speak only in the an- 
cient language. We have little time at our disposal, and this is the fastest 
way for you to learn.” 


“Even when I talk to Saphira?” 
“Even then.” 


Adopting the elven tongue, Eragon vowed, “Then I will work cease- 
lessly until I not only think, but dream, in your language.” 


“If you achieve that,” said Oromis, replying in kind, “our venture may 
yet succeed.” He paused. “Instead of flying directly here in the morning, 
you will accompany the elf I send to guide you. He will take you to 
where those of Ellesméra practice swordplay. Stay for an hour, then con- 
tinue on as normal.” 


“Won't you teach me yourself?” asked Eragon, feeling slighted. 


“I have naught to teach. You are as good a swordsman as ever | have 
met. I know no more of fighting than you, and that which I possess and 
you do not, I cannot give you. All that remains for you is to preserve your 
current level of skill.” 


“Why can’t I do that with you... Master?” 


“Because I do not appreciate beginning the day with alarum and con- 
flict.” He looked at Eragon, then relented and added, “And because it will 
be good for you to become acquainted with others who live here. I am 
not representative of my race. But enough of that. Look, they approach.” 


The two dragons glided across the flat disk of the sun. First came 
Glaedr with a roar of wind, blotting out the sky with his massive bulk 
before he settled on the grass and folded his golden wings, then Saphira, 
as quick and agile as a sparrow beside an eagle. 


As they had that morning, Oromis and Glaedr asked a number of ques- 
tions to ensure that Eragon and Saphira had paid attention to each other’s 
lessons. They had not always, but by cooperating and sharing information 
between themselves, they were able to answer all of the questions. Their 


336 


only stumbling block was the foreign language they were required to 
communicate in. 


Better, rumbled Glaedr afterward. Much better. He bent his gaze toward 
Eragon. You and I will have to train together soon. 


“Of course, Skulblaka.” 


The old dragon snorted and crawled alongside Oromis, half hopping 
with his front leg to compensate for his missing limb. Darting forward, 
Saphira nipped at the end of Glaedr’s tail, tossing it into the air with a 
flip of her head, like she would to break the neck of a deer. She recoiled 
as Glaedr twisted round and snapped at her neck, exposing his enormous 
fangs. 


Eragon winced and, too late, covered his ears to protect them from 
Glaedr’s roar. The speed and intensity of Glaedr’s response suggested to 
Eragon that this was not the first time Saphira had annoyed him through- 
out the day. Instead of remorse, Eragon detected an excited playfulness in 
her—like a child with a new toy—and a near-blind devotion to the other 
dragon. 


“Contain yourself, Saphira!” said Oromis. Saphira pranced backward 
and settled on her haunches, though nothing in her demeanor expressed 
contrition. Eragon muttered a feeble excuse, and Oromis waved a hand 
and said, “Begone, both of you.” 


Without arguing, Eragon scrambled onto Saphira. He had to urge her to 
take flight, and once she did, she insisted on circling over the clearing 
three times before he got her to angle toward Ellesméra. 


What possessed you to bite him? he demanded. He thought he knew, but 
he wanted her to confirm it. 


I was only playing. 


It was the truth, since they spoke in the ancient language, yet he sus- 
pected that it was but a piece of a larger truth. Yes, and at what game? 
She tensed underneath him. You forget your duty. By... He searched for 
the right word. Unable to find it, he reverted to his native speech, By pro- 
voking Glaedr, you distract him, Oromis, and me—and hinder what we 
must accomplish. You’ve never been so thoughtless before. 


Do not presume to be my conscience. 


Sey, 


He laughed then, heedless for a moment of where he sat among the 
clouds, rolling to his side until he almost dropped from the peak of her 
shoulders. Oh, rich irony that, after the times you've told me what to do. I 
am your conscience, Saphira, as much as you are mine. You’ve had good 
reason to chastise and warn me in the past, and now I must do the same for 
you: stop pestering Glaedr with your attentions. 


She remained silent. 
Saphira? 

I hear you. 

I hope so. 


After a minute of peaceful flying, she said, Two seizures in one day. 
How are you now? 


Sore and ill. He grimaced. Some of it’s from the Rimgar and sparring, but 
mostly it’s the aftereffects of the pain. It’s like a poison, weakening my mus- 
cles and clouding my mind. I just hope that I can remain sane long enough 
to reach the end of this training. Afterward, though... I don't know what I'll 
do. I certainly can’t fight for the Varden like this. 


Don’t think about it, she counseled. You can do nothing about your con- 
dition, and you'll only make yourself feel worse. Live in the present, remem- 
ber the past, and fear not the future, for it doesn’t exist and never shall. 
There is only now. 


He patted her shoulder and smiled with resigned gratitude. To their 
right, a goshawk rode a warm air current while it patrolled the broken 
forest for signs of furred or feathered quarry. Eragon watched it, ponder- 
ing the question that Oromis had given him: How could he justify fight- 
ing the Empire when it would cause so much grief and agony? 

I have an answer, said Saphira. 


What is it? 


That Galbatorix has...She hesitated, then said, No, I won’t tell you. You 
should figure this out for yourself. 


Saphira! Be reasonable. 


338 


I am. If you don’t know why what we do is the right thing, you might as 
well surrender to Galbatorix for all the good you'll do. No matter how elo- 
quent his pleas, he could extract nothing more from her, for she blocked 
him from that part of her mind. 


Back in their eyrie, Eragon ate a light supper and was just about to 
open one of Oromis’s scrolls when a knock on the screen door disturbed 
his quiet. 


“Enter,” he said, hoping that Arya had returned to see him. 


She had. 


Arya greeted Eragon and Saphira, then said, “I thought that you might 
appreciate an opportunity to visit Tialdari Hall and the adjacent gardens, 
since you expressed interest in them yesterday. That is, if you aren't too 
tired.” She wore a flowing red kirtle trimmed and decorated with intri- 
cate designs wrought in black thread. The color scheme echoed the 
queen’s robes and emphasized the strong resemblance between mother 
and daughter. 


Eragon pushed aside the scrolls. “I'd be delighted to see them.” 
He means we'd be delighted, added Saphira. 


Arya looked surprised when both of them spoke in the ancient lan- 
guage, so Eragon explained Oromis’s command. “An excellent idea,” said 
Arya, joining them in the same language. “And it is more appropriate to 
speak thus while you stay here.” 


When all three of them had descended from the tree, Arya directed 
them westward toward an unfamiliar quadrant of Ellesméra. They en- 
countered many elves on the path, all of whom stopped to bow to 
Saphira. 


Eragon noticed once again that no elf children were to be seen. He 
mentioned this to Arya, and she said, “Aye, we have few children. Only 
two are in Ellesméra at the present, Dusan and Alanna. We treasure chil- 
dren above all else because they are so rare. To have a child is the greatest 
honor and responsibility that can be bestowed upon any living being.” 


339 


At last they arrived at a ribbed lancet arch—grown between two 
trees—which served as the entrance for a wide compound. Still in the 
ancient language, Arya chanted, “Root of tree, fruit of vine, let me pass by 
this blood of mine.” 


The two archway doors trembled, then swung outward, releasing five 
monarch butterflies that fluttered toward the dusky sky. Through the 
archway lay a vast flower garden arranged to look as pristine and natural 
as a wild meadow. The one element that betrayed artifice was the sheer 
variety of plants; many of the species were blooming out of season, or 
came from hotter or colder climates and would never have flourished 
without the elves’ magic. The scene was lit with the gemlike flameless 
lanterns, augmented by constellations of swirling fireflies. 


To Saphira, Arya said, “Mind your tail, that it does not sweep across the 
beds.” 


Advancing, they crossed the garden and pressed deep into a line of scat- 
tered trees. Before Eragon quite knew where he was, the trees became 
more numerous and then thickened into a wall. He found himself stand- 
ing on the threshold of a burnished wood hall without ever being con- 
scious of having gone inside. 


The hall was warm and homey—a place of peace, reflection, and com- 
fort. Its shape was determined by the tree trunks, which on the inside of 
the hall had been stripped of their bark, polished, and rubbed with oil 
until the wood gleamed like amber. Regular gaps between the trunks 
acted as windows. The scent of crushed pine needles perfumed the air. A 
number of elves occupied the hall, reading, writing, and, in one dark cor- 
ner, playing a set of reed pipes. They all paused and inclined their heads 
to acknowledge Saphira’s presence. 


“Here you would stay,” said Arya, “were you not Rider and dragon.” 
“It’s magnificent,” replied Eragon. 


Arya guided him and Saphira everywhere in the compound that was 
accessible to dragons. Each new room was a surprise; no two were alike, 
and each chamber found different ways to incorporate the forest in its 
construction. In one room, a silver brook trickled down the gnarled wall 
and flowed across the floor on a vein of pebbles and back out under the 
sky. In another, creepers blanketed the entire room, except for the floor, 
in a leafy green pelt adorned with trumpet-shaped flowers with the most 
delicate pink and white colors. Arya called it the Liani Vine. 


340 


They saw many great works of art, from fairths and paintings to sculp- 
tures and radiant mosaics of stained glass—all based on the curved shapes 
of plants and animals. 


Islanzadi met with them for a short time in an open pavilion joined to 
two other buildings by covered pathways. She inquired about the pro- 
gress of Eragon’s training and the state of his back, both of which he de- 
scribed with brief, polite phrases. This seemed to satisfy the queen, who 
exchanged a few words with Saphira and then departed. 


In the end, they returned to the garden. Eragon walked beside Arya— 
Saphira trailing behind—entranced by the sound of her voice as she told 
him about the different varieties of flowers, where they originated, how 
they were maintained, and, in many instances, how they had been altered 
with magic. She also pointed out the flowers that only opened their pet- 
als during the night, like a white datura. 


“Which one is your favorite?” he asked. 


Arya smiled and escorted him to a tree on the edge of the garden, by a 
pond lined with rushes. Around the tree’s lowest branch coiled a morning 
glory with three velvety black blossoms that were clenched shut. 


Blowing on them, Arya whispered, “Open.” 


The petals rustled as they unfurled, fanning their inky robes to expose 
the hoard of nectar in their centers. A starburst of royal blue filled the 
flowers’ throats, diffusing into the sable corolla like the vestiges of day 
into night. 


“Is it not the most perfect and lovely flower?” asked Arya. 


Eragon gazed at her, exquisitely aware of how close they were, and said, 
“Yes... it is.” Before his courage deserted him, he added, “As are you.” 


Eragon! exclaimed Saphira. 


Arya fixed her eyes upon him, studying him until he was forced to look 
away. When he dared face her again, he was mortified to see her wearing 
a faint smile, as if amused by his reaction. “You are too kind,” she mur- 
mured. Reaching up, she touched the rim of a blossom and glanced from 
it to him. “Faolin created this especially for me one summer solstice, long 


” 


ago. 


341 


He shuffled his feet and responded with a few unintelligible words, 
hurt and offended that she did not take his compliment more seriously. 
He wished he could turn invisible, and even considered trying to cast a 
spell that would allow him to do just that. 


In the end, he drew himself upright and said, “Please excuse us, Arya 
Svit-kona, but it is late, and we must return to our tree.” 


Her smile deepened. “Of course, Eragon. I understand.” She accompa- 
nied them to the main archway, opened the doors for them, and said, 
“Good night, Saphira. Good night, Eragon.” 

Good night, replied Saphira. 


Despite his embarrassment, Eragon could not help asking, “Will we see 
you tomorrow?” 


Arya tilted her head. “I think I shall be busy tomorrow.” Then the doors 
closed, cutting off his view of her as she returned to the main compound. 


Crouching low on the path, Saphira nudged Eragon in the side. Stop 
daydreaming and get on my back. Climbing up her left foreleg, he took 
his usual place, then clutched the neck spike in front of him as Saphira 
rose to her full height. After a few steps: How can you criticize my behav- 
ior with Glaedr and then go and do something like that? What were you 
thinking? 

You know how I feel about her, he grumbled. 

Pah! If you are my conscience and I am yours, then it’s my duty to tell 
you when you're acting like a deluded popinjay. You’re not using logic, like 
Oromis keeps telling us to. What do you really expect to happen between 
you and Arya? She’s a princess! 

And I’m a Rider. 

She's an elf; you're a human! 

I look more like an elf every day. 


Eragon, she’s over a hundred years old! 


I'll live as long as her or any elf. 


342 


Ah, but you haven't yet, and that’s the problem. You can’t overcome such 
a vast difference. She’s a grown woman with a century of experience, while 
you 're— 


What? What am I? he snarled. A child? Is that what you mean? 


No, not a child. Not after what you have seen and done since we were 
joined. But you are young, even by the reckoning of your short-lived race— 
much less by that of the dwarves, dragons, and elves. 


As are you. 


His retort silenced her for a minute. Then: I’m just trying to protect you, 
Eragon. That's all. I want you to be happy, and I’m afraid you won't be if 
you insist on pursuing Arya. 


The two of them were about to retire when they heard the trapdoor in 
the vestibule bang open and the jingle of mail as someone climbed inside. 
Zar roc in hand, Eragon threw back the screen door, ready to confront the 
intruder. 


His hand dropped as he saw Orik on the floor. The dwarf took a hearty 
draught from the bottle he wielded in his left hand, then squinted at Er- 
agon. “Bricks and bones, where be you? Ah, there you shtand. I wondered 
where you were. Couldn't find you, so I thought that given this fine do- 
lorous night, I might go find you... and here you are! What shall we talk 
about, you and I, now that we're together in this delectable bird’s nest?” 


Taking hold of the dwarfs free arm, Eragon pulled him upright, sur- 
prised, as he always was, by how dense Orik was, like a miniature boul- 
der. When Eragon removed his support, Orik swayed from one side to 
the other, achieving such precarious angles that he threatened to topple 
at the slightest provocation. 


“Come on in,” said Eragon in his own language. He closed the trapdoor. 
“You'll catch cold out here.” 


Orik blinked his round, deep-set eyes at Eragon. “I’ve not sheen you 


round my leafy exile, no I haven't. You've abandoned me to the company 
of elves... and misherable, dull company they are, yesh indeed.” 


343 


A touch of guilt made Eragon disguise himself with an awkward smile. 
He had forgotten the dwarf amid the goings-on. “I’m sorry I haven't vis- 
ited you, Orik, but my studies have kept me busy. Here, give me your 
cloak.” As he helped the dwarf out of his brown mantle, he asked, “What 


are you drinking?” 


“Faelnirv,” declared Orik. “A mosht wonderful, ticklish potion. The 
besht and greatest of the elves’ tricksty inventions; it gives you the gift of 
loquacion. Words float from your tongue like shoals of flapping min- 
nows, like flocks of breathlessh hummingbirds, like rivers of writhing 
shnakes.” He paused, apparently taken by the unique magnificence of his 
similes. As Eragon ushered him into the bedroom, Orik saluted Saphira 
with his bottle and said, “Greetings, O Irontooth. May your shcales shine 
as bright as the coals of Morgothal’s forge.” 


Greetings, Orik, said Saphira, laying her head on the rim of her bed. 
What has put you in this state? It is not like you. Eragon repeated her 
question. 


“What has put me in mine shtate?” repeated Orik. He dropped into the 
chair that Eragon provided—his feet dangling several inches above the 
ground—and began to shake his head. “Red cap, green cap, elves here and 
elves there. I drown in elvesh and their thrice-damned courtesy. Bloodless 
they be. Taciturn they are. Yesh sir, no shir, three bagsh full, sir, yet nary 
a pip more can I extract.” He looked at Eragon with a mournful expres- 
sion. “What am I to do while you meander through your instruction? Am 
I to sit and twiddle mine thumbs while I turn to shtone and join the 
shpirits of mine anshestors? Tell me, O sagacious Rider.” 


Have you no skills or hobbies that you might occupy yourself with? asked 
Saphira. 


“Aye,” said Orik. “I’m a fair enough smith by any who'd care to judge. 
But why should I craft bright armsh and armor for those who treasure 
them not? I’m usheless here. As usheless as a three-legged Feldtinost.” 


Eragon extended a hand toward the bottle. “May I?” Orik glanced be- 
tween him and the bottle, then grimaced and gave it up. The faelnirv was 
cold as ice as it ran down Eragon’s throat, stinging and smarting. He 
blinked as his eyes watered. After he indulged in a second quaff, he 
passed the bottle back to Orik, who seemed disappointed by how little 
of the concoction remained. 


“And what mischief,” asked Orik, “have you two managed to ferret out 


344 


of Oromis and yon bucolic woods?” 


The dwarf alternately chuckled and groaned as Eragon described his 
training, his misplaced blessing in Farthen Dtr, the Menoa tree, his back, 
and all else that had filled the past few days. Eragon ended with the topic 
that was dearest to him at the moment: Arya. Emboldened by the li- 
queur, he confessed his affection for her and described how she had dis- 
missed his advance. 


Wagging a finger, Orik said, “The rock beneath you is flawed, Eragon. 
Don't tempt fate. Arya...” He stopped, then growled and took another 
gulp of faelnirv. “Ah, it’s too late for thish. Who am I to say what is wis- 
dom and what isn’t?” 


Saphira had closed her eyes a while ago. Without opening them, she 
asked, Are you married, Orik? The question surprised Eragon; he had 
never stopped to wonder about Orik’s personal life. 


“Eta,” said Orik. “Although I’m promished to fair Hvedra, daughter of 
Thorgerd One-eye and Himinglada. We were to be wed thish spring, un- 
til the Urgals attacked and Hrothgar sent me on this accursed trip.” 


“Is she of Dirgrimst Ingeitum?” asked Eragon. 


“Of coursh!” roared Orik, pounding his fist on the side of the chair. 
“Thinkest thou I would marry outside my clan? She’s the granddaughter 
of mine aunt Vardrtn, Hrothgar’s coushin twice removed, with white, 
round calves as smooth as satin, cheeks as red as apples, and the pretti- 
esht dwarf maid who ever did exist.” 


Undoubtedly, said Saphira. 
“I’m sure it won't be long before you see her again,” said Eragon. 


“Hmph.” Orik squinted at Eragon. “Do you believe in giants? Tall giants, 
shtrong giants, thick and bearded giants with fingers like spadeses?” 


“I’ve never seen nor heard of them,” said Eragon, “except in stories. If 
they do exist, it’s not in Alagaésia.” 


“Ah, but they do! They do!” exclaimed Orik, waving the bottle about 


his head. “Tell me, O Rider, if a fearshome giant were to meet you on the 
garden path, what might he call you, if not dinner?” 


345 


“Eragon, I would presume.” 


“No, no. He’d call you a dwarf, for dwarf you'd be to him.” Orik guf- 
fawed and nudged Eragon in the ribs with his hard elbow. “See you now? 
Humans and elvesh are the giants. The land’s full of them, here, there, 
and everywhere, stomping about with their big feet and casting us in 
endless shadowses.” He continued laughing, rocking back in his chair until 
it tipped over and he fell to the floor with a solid thump. 


Helping him upright, Eragon said, “I think you'd better stay here for the 
night. You're in no condition to go down those stairs in the dark.” 


Orik agreed with cheery indifference. He allowed Eragon to remove his 
mail and bundle him onto one side of the bed. Afterward, Eragon sighed, 
covered the lights, and lay on his side of the mattress. 


He fell asleep hearing the dwarf mutter, “.... Hvedra... Hvedra... 
Hvedra...” 


346 


THE NATURE OF EVIL 





Bright morning arrived all too soon. 


Jolted to awareness by the buzz of the vibrating timepiece, Eragon 
grabbed his hunting knife and sprang out of bed, expecting an attack. He 
gasped as his body shrieked with protest from the abuse of the past two 
days. 


Blinking away tears, Eragon rewound the timepiece. Orik was gone; the 
dwarf must have slipped away in the wee hours of the morning. With a 
groan, Eragon hobbled to the wash closet for his daily ablutions, like an 
old man afflicted by rheumatism. 


He and Saphira waited by the tree for ten minutes before they were 
met by a solemn, black-haired elf. The elf bowed, touched two fingers to 
his lips—which Eragon mirrored—and then preempted Eragon by saying, 
“May good fortune rule over you.” 


“And may the stars watch over you,” replied Eragon. “Did Oromis send 
you?” 


The elf ignored him and said to Saphira, “Well met, dragon. I am Vanir 
of House Haldthin.” Eragon scowled with annoyance. 


Well met, Vanir. 


Only then did the elf address Eragon: “I will show you where you may 
practice with your blade.” He strode away, not waiting for Eragon to 
catch up. 


The sparring yard was dotted with elves of both sexes fighting in pairs 
and groups. Their extraordinary physical gifts resulted in flurries of blows 
so quick and fast, they sounded like bursts of hail striking an iron bell. 
Under the trees that fringed the yard, individual elves performed the 
Rimgar with more grace and flexibility than Eragon thought he would 
ever achieve. 


After everyone on the field stopped and bowed to Saphira, Vanir un- 
sheathed his narrow blade. “If you will guard your sword, Silver Hand, we 
can begin.” 


Eragon eyed the inhuman swordsmanship of the other elves with trepi- 


347 


dation. Why do I have to do this? he asked. I'll just be humiliated. 
You'll be fine, said Saphira, yet he could sense her concern for him. 
Right. 


As he prepared Zar’roc, Eragon’s hands trembled with dread. Instead of 
throwing himself into the fray, he fought Vanir from a distance, dodging, 
sidestepping, and doing everything possible to avoid triggering another fit. 
Despite Eragon’s evasions, Vanir touched him four times in rapid succes- 
sion—once each on his ribs, shin, and both shoulders. 


Vanir’s initial expression of stoic impassivity soon devolved into open 
contempt. Dancing forward, he slid his blade up Zar’roc’s length while at 
the same time twirling Zar’roc in a circle, wrenching Eragon’s wrist. Er- 
agon allowed Zar’roc to fly out of his hand rather than resist the elf’s su- 
perior strength. 


Vanir dropped his sword onto Eragon’s neck and said, “Dead.” Shrug- 
ging off the sword, Eragon trudged over to retrieve Zar’roc. “Dead,” said 
Vanir. “How do you expect to defeat Galbatorix like this? I expected 
better, even from a weakling human.” 


“Then why don't you fight Galbatorix yourself instead of hiding in Du 
Weldenvarden?” 


Vanir stiffened with outrage. “Because,” he said, cool and haughty, “I’m 
not a Rider. And if I were, I would not be such a coward as you.” 


No one moved or spoke on the field. 


His back to Vanir, Eragon leaned on Zar'roc and craned his neck to- 
ward the sky, snarling to himself. He knows nothing. This is just one more 
test to overcome. 


“Coward, I say. Your blood is as thin as the rest of your race’s. I think 
that Saphira was confused by Galbatorix’s wiles and made the wrong 
choice of Rider.” The spectating elves gasped at Vanir’s words and mut- 
tered among themselves with open disapproval for his atrocious breach 
of etiquette. 


Eragon ground his teeth. He could stand insults to himself, but not to 


Saphira. She was already moving when his pent-up frustration, fear, and 
pain burst within him and he whirled around, the tip of Zar’roc whistling 


348 


through the air. 


The blow would have killed Vanir had he not blocked it at the last 
second. He looked surprised by the ferocity of the attack. Holding noth- 
ing in reserve, Eragon drove Vanir to the center of the field, jabbing and 
slashing like a madman—determined to hurt the elf however he could. 
He nicked Vanir on the hip with enough force to draw blood, even with 
Zar'roc’s blunted edge. 


At that instant, Eragon’s back ruptured in an explosion of agony so in- 
tense, he experienced it with all five senses: as a deafening, crashing wa- 
terfall of sound; a metallic taste that coated his tongue; an acrid, eye- 
watering stench in his nostrils, redolent of vinegar; pulsing colors; and, 
above all, the feeling that Durza had just laid open his back. 


He could see Vanir standing over him with a derisive sneer. It occurred 
to Eragon that Vanir was very young. 


After the seizure, Eragon wiped the blood from his mouth with his 
hand and showed it to Vanir, asking, “Thin enough?” Vanir did not deign 
to respond, but rather sheathed his sword and walked away. 


“Where are you going?” demanded Eragon. “We have unfinished busi- 
ness, you and I.” 


“You are in no fit condition to spar,” scoffed the elf. 

“Try me.” Eragon might be inferior to the elves, but he refused to give 
them the satisfaction of fulfilling their low expectations of him. He 
would earn their respect through sheer persistence, if nothing else. 

He insisted on completing Oromis’s assigned hour, after which Saphira 
marched up to Vanir and touched him on the chest with the point of 
one of her ivory talons. Dead, she said. Vanir paled. The other elves 
edged away from him. 

Once they were in the air, Saphira said, Oromis was right. 


About what? 


You give more of yourself when you have an opponent. 


349 


At Oromis’s hut, the day resumed its usual pattern: Saphira accompa- 
nied Glaedr for her instruction while Eragon remained with Oromis. 


Eragon was horrified when he discovered that Oromis expected him to 
do the Rimgar in addition to his earlier exercises. It took all of his courage 
to obey. His apprehension proved groundless, though, for the Dance of 
Snake and Crane was too gentle to injure him. 


That, coupled with his meditation in the secluded glade, provided Er- 
agon with his first opportunity since the previous day to order his 
thoughts and consider the question that Oromis had posed him. 


While he did, he observed his red ants invade a smaller, rival anthill, 
overrunning the inhabitants and stealing their resources. By the end of the 
massacre, only a handful of the rival ants were left alive, alone and pur- 
poseless in the vast and hostile pine-needle barrens. 


Like the dragons in Alagaésia, thought Eragon. His connection to the 
ants vanished as he considered the dragons’ unhappy fate. Bit by bit, an 
answer to his problem revealed itself to him, an answer that he could live 
with and believe in. 


He finished his meditations and returned to the hut. This time Oromis 
seemed reasonably satisfied with what Eragon had accomplished. 


As Oromis served the midday meal, Eragon said, “I know why fighting 
Galbatorix is worth it, though thousands of people may die.” 


“Oh?” Oromis seated himself. “Do tell me.” 


“Because Galbatorix has already caused more suffering over the past 
hundred years than we ever could in a single generation. And unlike a 
normal tyrant, we cannot wait for him to die. He could rule for centuries 
or millennia—persecuting and tormenting people the entire time—unless 
we stop him. If he became strong enough, he would march on the 
dwarves and you here in Du Weldenvarden and kill or enslave both races. 
And...” Eragon rubbed the heel of his palm against the edge of the table, 
“. because rescuing the two eggs from Galbatorix is the only way to save 
the dragons.” 


The strident warble of Oromis’s teakettle intruded, escalating in vol- 
ume until Eragon’s ears rang. Standing, Oromis hooked the kettle off the 


phe 


cookfire and poured the water for blueberry tea. The creases around his 
eyes softened. “Now,” he said, “you understand.” 


“I understand, but I take no pleasure in it.” 


“Nor should you. But now we can be confident that you won't shrink 
from the path when you are confronted by the injustices and atrocities 
that the Varden will inevitably commit. We cannot afford to have you 
consumed by doubts when your strength and focus are most needed.” 
Oromis steepled his fingers and gazed into the dark mirror of his tea, con- 
templating whatever he saw in its tenebrous reflection. “Do you believe 
that Galbatorix is evil?” 


“Of course!” 
“Do you believe that he considers himself evil?” 
“No, I doubt it.” 


Oromis tapped his forefingers against each other. “Then you must also 
believe that Durza was evil?” 


The fragmented memories Eragon had gleaned from Durza when they 
fought in Tronjheim returned to him now, reminding him how the young 
Shade—Carsaib, then—had been enslaved by the wraiths he had sum- 
moned to avenge the death of his mentor, Haeg. “He wasn’t evil himself, 
but the spirits that controlled him were.” 


“And what of the Urgals?” asked Oromis, sipping his tea. “Are they 
evil?” 


Eragon’s knuckles whitened as he gripped his spoon. “When I think of 
death, I see an Urgal’s face. They’re worse than beasts. The things they 
have done...” He shook his head, unable to continue. 


“Eragon, what kind of opinion would you form of humans if all you 
knew of them were the actions of your warriors on the field of battle?” 


“That’s not...” He took a deep breath. “It’s different. Urgals deserve to be 
wiped out, every last one of them.” 


“Even their females and children? The ones who haven’t harmed you 


and likely never will? The innocents? Would you kill them and condemn 
an entire race to the void?” 


351 


“They wouldn't spare us, given the chance.” 


“Eragon!” exclaimed Oromis in biting tones. “I never want to hear you 
use that excuse again, that because someone else has done—or would 
do—something means that you should too. It’s lazy, repugnant, and in- 
dicative of an inferior mind. Am I clear?” 


“Yes, Master.” 


The elf raised his mug to his lips and drank, his bright eyes fixed on Er- 
agon the entire time. “What do you actually know of Urgals?” 


“I know their strengths, weaknesses, and how to kill them. It’s all I need 
to know.” 


“Why do they hate and fight humans, though? What about their history 
and legends, or the way in which they live?” 


“Does it matter?” 


Oromis sighed. “Just remember,” he said gently, “that at a certain point, 
your enemies may have to become your allies. Such is the nature of life.” 


Eragon resisted the urge to argue. He swirled his own tea in its mug, ac- 
celerating the liquid into a black whirlpool with a white lens of foam at 
the bottom of the vortex. “Is that why Galbatorix enlisted the Urgals?” 


“That is not an example I would have chosen, but yes.” 


“It seems strange that he befriended them. After all, they were the ones 
who killed his dragon. Look what he did to us, the Riders, and we 
weren't even responsible for his loss.” 


“Ah,” said Oromis, “mad Galbatorix may be, but he’s still as cunning as 
a fox. I guess that he intended to use the Urgals to destroy the Varden 
and the dwarves—and others, if he had triumphed in Farthen Dar— 
thereby removing two of his enemies while simultaneously weakening 
the Urgals so that he could dispose of them at his leisure.” 


Study of the ancient language devoured the afternoon, whereupon they 
took up the practice of magic. Much of Oromis’s lectures concerned the 


352 


proper way in which to control various forms of energy, such as light, 
heat, electricity, and even gravity. He explained that since these forces 
consumed strength faster than any other type of spell, it was safer to find 
them already in existence in nature and then shape them with gramarye, 
instead of trying to create them from nothing. 


Abandoning the subject, Oromis asked, “How would you kill with 
magic?” 


“I’ve done it many ways,” said Eragon. “I’ve hunted with a pebble— 
moving and aiming it with magic—as well as using the word jierda to 
break Urgals’ legs and necks. Once, with thrysta, I stopped a man’s heart.” 


“There are more efficient methods,” revealed Oromis. “What does it 
take to kill a man, Eragon? A sword through the chest? A broken neck? 
The loss of blood? All it takes is for a single artery in the brain to be 
pinched off, or for certain nerves to be severed. With the right spell, you 
could obliterate an army.” 


“I should have thought of that in Farthen Dar,” said Eragon, disgusted 
with himself. Not just Farthen Dir either, but also when the Kull chased us 
from the Hadarac Desert. “Again, why didn’t Brom teach me this?” 


“Because he did not expect you to face an army for months or years to 
come; it is not a tool given to untested Riders.” 


“If it’s so easy to kill people, though, what’s the point of us or Galba- 
torix raising an army?” 


“To be succinct, tactics. Magicians are vulnerable to physical attack 
when they are embroiled in their mental struggles. Therefore, they need 
warriors to protect them. And the warriors must be shielded, at least in 
part, from magical attacks, else they would be slain within minutes. 
These limitations mean that when armies confront one another, their 
magicians are scattered throughout the bulk of their forces, close to the 
edge but not so close as to be in danger. The magicians on both sides 
open their minds and attempt to sense if anyone is using or is about to 
use magic. Since their enemies might be beyond their mental reach, ma- 
gicians also erect wards around themselves and their warriors to stop or 
lessen long-range attacks, such as a pebble sent flying toward their head 
from a mile away.” 


“Surely one man can’t defend an entire army,” said Eragon. 


530 


“Not alone, but with enough magicians, you can provide a reasonable 
amount of protection. The greatest danger in this sort of conflict is that a 
clever magician may think of a unique attack that can bypass your wards 
without tripping them. That itself could be enough to decide a battle. 


“Also,” said Oromis, “you must keep in mind that the ability to use 
magic is exceedingly rare among the races. We elves are no exception, 
although we have a greater allotment of spellweavers than most, as a re- 
sult of oaths we bound ourselves with centuries ago. The majority of 
those blessed with magic have little or no appreciable talent; they strug- 
gle to heal even so much as a bruise.” 


Eragon nodded. He had encountered magicians like that in the Varden. 
“But it still takes the same amount of energy to accomplish a task.” 


“Energy, yes, but lesser magicians find it harder than you or I do to feel 
the flow of magic and immerse themselves in it. Few magicians are strong 
enough to pose a threat to an entire army. And those who are usually 
spend the bulk of their time during battles evading, tracking, or fighting 
their opposites, which is fortunate from the standpoint of ordinary war- 
riors, else they would all soon be killed.” 


Troubled, Eragon said, “The Varden don’t have many magicians.” 
“That is one reason why you are so important.” 


A moment passed as Eragon reflected on what Oromis had told him. 
“These wards, do they only drain energy from you when they are acti- 
vated?” 


“Aye.” 


“Then, given enough time, you could acquire countless layers of wards. 
You could make yourself...” He struggled with the ancient language as he 
attempted to express himself. “... untouchable?... impregnable?... impreg- 
nable to any assault, magical or physical.” 


“Wards,” said Oromis, “rely upon the strength of your body. If that 
strength is exceeded, you die. No matter how many wards you have, you 
will only be able to block attacks so long as your body can sustain the 
output of energy.” 


“And Galbatorix’s strength has been increasing each year.... How is that 
possible?” 


354 


It was a rhetorical question, yet when Oromis remained silent, his al- 
mond eyes fixed on a trio of swallows pirouetting overhead, Eragon real- 
ized that the elf was considering how best to answer him. The birds 
chased each other for several minutes. When they flitted from view, 
Oromis said, “It is not appropriate to have this discussion at the present.” 


“Then you know?” exclaimed Eragon, astonished. 


“I do. But that information must wait until later in your training. You 
are not ready for it.” Oromis looked at Eragon, as if expecting him to ob- 
ject. 


Eragon bowed. “As you wish, Master.” He could never prize the infor- 
mation out of Oromis until the elf was willing to share it, so why try? 
Still, he wondered what could be so dangerous that Oromis dared not tell 
him, and why the elves had kept it secret from the Varden. Another 
thought presented itself to him, and he said, “If battles with magicians are 
conducted like you said, then why did Ajihad let me fight without wards 
in Farthen Dir? I didn’t even know that I needed to keep my mind open 
for enemies. And why didn’t Arya kill most or all of the Urgals? No ma- 
gicians were there to oppose her except for Durza, and he couldn't have 
defended his troops when he was underground.” 


“Did not Ajihad have Arya or one of Du Vrangr Gata set defenses 
around you?” demanded Oromis. 


“No, Master.” 
“And you fought thus?” 
“Yes, Master.” 


Oromis’s eyes unfocused, withdrawing into himself as he stood mo- 
tionless on the greensward. He spoke without warning: “I have consulted 
Arya, and she says that the Twins of the Varden were ordered to assess 
your abilities. They told Ajihad you were competent in all magic, includ- 
ing wards. Neither Ajihad nor Arya doubted their judgment on that mat- 
ter.” 


“Those smooth-tongued, bald-pated, tick-infested, treacherous dogs,” 


swore Eragon. “They tried to get me killed!” Reverting to his own lan- 
guage, he indulged in several more pungent oaths. 


355 


“Do not befoul the air,” said Oromis mildly. “It ill becomes you.... In any 
case, I suspect the Twins allowed you into battle unprotected not so you 
would be killed, but so that Durza could capture you.” 


“What?” 


“By your own account, Ajihad suspected that the Varden had been be- 
trayed when Galbatorix began persecuting their allies in the Empire with 
near-perfect accuracy. The Twins were privy to the identities of the 
Varden’s collaborators. Also, the Twins lured you to the heart of Tron- 
jheim, thereby separating you from Saphira and placing you within 
Durza’s reach. That they were traitors is the logical explanation.” 


“If they were traitors,” said Eragon, “it doesn’t matter now; they’re long 


dead.” 

Oromis inclined his head. “Even so. Arya said that the Urgals did have 
magicians in Farthen Dtr and that she fought many of them. None of 
them attacked you?” 


“No, Master.” 


“More evidence that you and Saphira were left for Durza to capture 
and take to Galbatorix. The trap was well laid.” 


Over the next hour, Oromis taught Eragon twelve methods to kill, 
none of which took more energy than lifting an ink-laden pen. As he fin- 
ished memorizing the last one, a thought struck Eragon that caused him 
to grin. “The Ra’zac won't stand a chance the next time they cross my 
path.” 

“You must still be wary of them,” cautioned Oromis. 

“Why? Three words and they'll be dead.” 

“What do ospreys eat?” 


Eragon blinked. “Fish, of course.” 


“And if a fish were slightly faster and more intelligent than its brethren, 
would it be able to escape a hunting osprey?” 


“I doubt it,” said Eragon. “At least not for very long.” 


356 


“Just as ospreys are designed to be the best possible hunters of fish, 
wolves are designed to be the best hunters of deer and other large game, 
and every animal is gifted to best suit its purpose. So too are the Ra’zac 
designed to prey upon humans. They are the monsters in the dark, the 
dripping nightmares that haunt your race.” 


The back of Eragon’s neck prickled with horror. “What manner of crea- 
tures are they?” 


“Neither elf; man; dwarf; dragon; furred, finned, or feathered beast; rep- 
tile; insect; nor any other category of animal.” 


Eragon forced a laugh. “Are they plants, then?” 


“Nor that either. They reproduce by laying eggs, like dragons. When 
they hatch, the young—or pupae—grow black exoskeletons that mimic 
the human form. It’s a grotesque imitation, but convincing enough to let 
the Ra’zac approach their victims without undo alarm. All areas where 
humans are weak, the Ra’zac are strong. They can see on a cloudy night, 
track a scent like a bloodhound, jump higher, and move faster. However, 
bright light pains them and they have a morbid fear of deep water, for 
they cannot swim. Their greatest weapon is their evil breath, which fogs 
the minds of humans—incapacitating many—though it is less potent on 
dwarves, and elves are immune altogether.” 


Eragon shivered as he remembered his first sight of the Ra’zac in Car- 
vahall and how he had been unable to flee once they noticed him. “It felt 
like a dream where I wanted to run but I couldn’t move, no matter how 
hard I tried.” 


“As good a description as any,” said Oromis. “Though the Ra’zac cannot 
use magic, they are not to be underestimated. If they know that you hunt 
them, they will not reveal themselves but keep to the shadows, where 
they are strong, and plot to ambush you as they did by Dras-Leona. Even 
Brom’s experience could not protect him from them. Never grow over- 
confident, Eragon. Never grow arrogant, for then you will be careless and 
your enemies will exploit your weakness.” 


“Yes, Master.” 
Oromis fixed Eragon with a steady gaze. “The Ra’zac remain pupae for 
twenty years while they mature. On the first full moon of their twentieth 


year, they shed their exoskeletons, spread their wings, and emerge as 
adults ready to hunt all creatures, not just humans.” 


357 


“Then the Ra’zac’s mounts, the ones they fly on, are really...” 


“Aye, their parents.” 


358 


IMAGE OF PERFECTION 





At last I understand the nature of my enemies, thought Eragon. He had 
feared the Ra’zac ever since they first appeared in Carvahall, not only be- 
cause of their villainous deeds but because he knew so little about the 
creatures. In his ignorance, he credited the Ra’zac with more powers than 
they actually possessed and regarded them with an almost superstitious 
dread. Nightmares indeed. But now that Oromis’s explanation had 
stripped away the Ra’zac’s aura of mystery, they no longer seemed quite 
so formidable. The fact that they were vulnerable to light and water 
strengthened Eragon’s conviction that when next they met, he would de- 
stroy the monsters that had killed Garrow and Brom. 


“Are their parents called Ra’zac as well?” he asked. 


Oromis shook his head. “Lethrblaka, we named them. And whereas 
their offspring are narrow-minded, if cunning, Lethrblaka have all the in- 
telligence of a dragon. A cruel, vicious, and twisted dragon.” 


“Where do they come from?” 


“From whatever land your ancestors abandoned. Their depredations 
may have been what forced King Palancar to emigrate. When we, the 
Riders, became aware of the Ra’zac’s foul presence in Alagaésia, we did 
our best to eradicate them, as we would leaf blight. Unfortunately, we 
were only partially successful. Two Lethrblaka escaped, and they along 
with their pupae are the ones who have caused you so much grief. After 
he killed Vrael, Galbatorix sought them out and bargained for their ser- 
vices in return for his protection and a guaranteed amount of their favor- 
ite food. That is why Galbatorix allows them to live by Dras-Leona, one 
of the Empire’s largest cities.” 


Eragon’s jaw tightened. “They have much to answer for.” And they will, 
if I have my way. 


“That they do,” Oromis agreed. Returning to the hut, he stepped 
through the black shadow of the doorway, then reappeared carrying a 
half-dozen slate tablets about a half-foot wide and a foot high. He pre- 
sented one to Eragon. “Let us abandon such unpleasant topics for a time. I 
thought you might enjoy learning how to make a fairth. It is an excellent 
device for focusing your thoughts. The slate is impregnated with enough 
ink to cover it with any combination of colors. All you need do is con- 
centrate upon the image that you wish to capture and then say, ‘Let that 


S59 


>” 


which I see in my mind’s eye be replicated on the surface of this tablet. 
As Eragon examined the clay-smooth slate, Oromis gestured at the clear- 
ing. “Look about you, Eragon, and find something worth preserving.” 


The first objects that Eragon noticed seemed too obvious, too banal to 
him: a yellow lily by his feet, Oromis’s overgrown hut, the white stream, 
and the landscape itself. None were unique. None would give an observer 
an insight into the subject of the fairth or he who had created it. Things 
that change and are lost, that is what's worth preserving, he thought. His 
eye alighted upon the pale green nubs of spring growth at the tip of a 
tree’s branches and then the deep, narrow wound that seamed the trunk 
where a storm had broken a bough, tearing off a rope of bark with it. 
Translucent orbs of sap encrusted the seam, catching and refracting the 
light. 


Eragon positioned himself alongside the trunk so that the rotund galls 
of the tree’s congealed blood bulged out in silhouette and were framed by 
a cluster of shiny new needles. Then he fixed the scene in his mind as 
best he could and uttered the spell. 


The surface of the gray tablet brightened as splashes of color bloomed 
across it, blending and mixing to produce the proper array of hues. When 
the pigments at last stopped moving, Eragon found himself looking at a 
strange copy of what he had wanted to reproduce. The sap and needles 
were rendered with vibrant, razor-sharp detail, while all else was slurred 
and bleary, as if seen through half-opened eyes. It was far removed from 
the universal clarity of Oromis’s fairth of Ilirea. 


At a sign from Oromis, Eragon handed the tablet to him. The elf stud- 
ied it for a minute, then said, “You have an unusual way of thinking, Er- 
agon-finiarel. Most humans have difficulty achieving the proper concen- 
tration to create a recognizable image. You, on the other hand, seem to 
observe nearly everything about whatever interests you. It’s a narrow fo- 
cus, though. You have the same problem here that you do with your 
meditation. You must relax, broaden your field of vision, and allow your- 
self to absorb everything around you without judging what is important 
or not.” Setting aside the picture, Oromis took a second, blank tablet 
from the grass and gave it to Eragon. “Try again with what I—’” 


“Hail, Rider!” 
Startled, Eragon turned and saw Orik and Arya emerge side by side 


from the forest. The dwarf raised his arm in greeting. His beard was 
freshly trimmed and braided, his hair was pulled back into a neat pony- 


360 


tail, and he wore a new tunic—courtesy of the elves—that was red and 
brown and embroidered with gold thread. His appearance gave no indica- 
tion of his condition the previous night. 


Eragon, Oromis, and Arya exchanged the traditional greeting, then, 
abandoning the ancient language, Oromis asked, “To what may I attribute 
this visit? You are both welcome to my hut, but as you can see, I am in 
the midst of working with Eragon, and that is of paramount importance.” 


“I apologize for disturbing you, Oromis-elda,” said Arya, “but—’” 

“The fault is mine,” said Orik. He glanced at Eragon before continuing: 
“I was sent here by Hrothgar to ensure that Eragon receives the instruc- 
tion he is due. I have no doubt that he is, but I am obliged to see his 
training with my own eyes so that when I return to Tronjheim, I may 


give my king a true account of events.” 


Oromis said, “That which I teach Eragon is not to be shared with any- 
one else. The secrets of the Riders are for him alone.” 


“And I understand that. However, we live in uncertain times; the stone 
that once was fixed and solid is now unstable. We must adapt to survive. 
So much depends on Eragon, we dwarves have a right to verify that his 
training proceeds as promised. Do you believe our request is an unrea- 
sonable one?” 

“Well spoken, Master Dwarf,” said Oromis. He tapped his fingers to- 
gether, inscrutable as always. “May I assume, then, that this is a matter of 
duty for you?” 

“Duty and honor.” 

“And neither will allow you to yield on this point?” 


“I fear not, Oromis-elda,” said Orik. 


“Very well. You may stay and watch for the duration of this lesson. 
Will that satisfy you?” 


Orik frowned. “Are you near the end of the lesson?” 
“We have just begun.” 


“Then yes, I will be satisfied. For the moment, at least.” 


361 


While they spoke, Eragon tried to catch Arya’s eye, but she kept her at- 
tention centered on Oromis. 


“. Eragon!” 
He blinked, jolted out of his reverie. “Yes, Master?” 


“Don’t wander, Eragon. I want you to make another fairth. Keep your 
mind open, like I told you before.” 


“Yes, Master.” Eragon hefted the tablet, his hands slightly damp at the 
thought of having Orik and Arya there to judge his performance. He 
wanted to do well in order to prove that Oromis was a good teacher. 
Even so, he could not concentrate on the pine needles and sap; Arya 
tugged at him like a lodestone, drawing his attention back to her when- 
ever he thought of something else. 


At last he realized that it was futile for him to resist the attraction. He 
composed an image of her in his head—which took but a heartbeat, since 
he knew her features better than his own—and voiced the spell in the 
ancient language, pouring all of his adoration, love, and fear of her into 
the currents of fey magic. 


The result left him speechless. 


The fairth depicted Arya’s head and shoulders against a dark, indistinct 
background. She was bathed in firelight on her right side and gazed out at 
the viewer with knowing eyes, appearing not just as she was but as he 
thought of her: mysterious, exotic, and the most beautiful woman he had 
ever seen. It was a flawed, imperfect picture, but it possessed such inten- 
sity and passion that it evoked a visceral response from Eragon. Is this 
how I really see her? Whoever this woman was, she was so wise, so pow- 
erful, and so hypnotic, she could consume any lesser man. 


From a great distance, he heard Saphira whisper, Be careful... 

“What have you wrought, Eragon?” demanded Oromis. 

“I... I don’t know.” Eragon hesitated as Oromis extended his hand for 
the fairth, reluctant to let the others examine his work, especially Arya. 


After a long, terrifying pause, Eragon pried his fingers off the tablet and 
released it to Oromis. 


The elf’s expression grew stern as he looked at the fairth, then back at 
Eragon, who quailed under the weight of his stare. Without a word, 
Oromis handed the tablet to Arya. 


Her hair obscured her face as she bowed over the tablet, but Eragon 
saw cords and veins ridge her hands as she clenched the slate. It shook in 
her grip. 


“Well, what is it?” asked Orik. 


Raising the fairth over her head, Arya hurled it against the ground, shat- 
tering the picture into a thousand pieces. Then she drew herself upright 
and, with great dignity, walked past Eragon, across the clearing, and into 
the tangled depths of Du Weldenvarden. 


Orik picked up one of the fragments of slate. It was blank. The image 
had vanished when the tablet broke. He tugged his beard. “In all the dec- 
ades I’ve known her, Arya has never lost her temper like that. Never. 
What did you do, Eragon?” 


Dazed, Eragon said, “A portrait of her.” 

Orik frowned, obviously puzzled. “A portrait? Why would that—’” 

“I think it would be best if you left now,” said Oromis. “The lesson is 
over, in any case. Come back tomorrow or the day after if you want a 
better idea of Eragon’s progress.” 

The dwarf squinted at Eragon, then nodded and brushed the dirt from 
his palms. “Yes, I believe I’ll do that. Thank you for your time, Oromis- 
elda. I appreciate it.” As he headed back toward Ellesméra, he said over 
his shoulder to Eragon, “I'll be in the common room of Tialdari Hall, if 
you want to talk.” 

When Orik was gone, Oromis lifted the hem of his tunic, knelt, and 
began to gather up the remains of the tablet. Eragon watched him, unable 
to move. 

“Why?” he asked in the ancient language. 


“Perhaps,” said Oromis, “Arya was frightened by you.” 


“Frightened? She never gets frightened.” Even as he said it, Eragon knew 
that it was not true. She just concealed her fear better than most. Drop- 


363 


ping to one knee, he took a piece of the fairth and pressed it into 
Oromis’s palm. “Why would I frighten her?” he asked. “Please, tell me.” 


Oromis stood and walked to the edge of the stream, where he scattered 
the fragments of slate over the bank, letting the gray flakes trickle 
through his fingers. “Fairths only show what you want them to. It’s possi- 
ble to lie with them, to create a false image, but to do so requires more 
skill than you yet have. Arya knows this. She also knows, then, that your 
fairth was an accurate representation of your feelings for her.” 


“But why would that frighten her?” 


Oromis smiled sadly. “Because it revealed the depth of your infatua- 
tion.” He pressed his fingertips together, forming a series of arches. “Let 
us analyze the situation, Eragon. While you are old enough to be consid- 
ered a man among your people, in our eyes, you are no more than a 
child.” Eragon frowned, hearing echoes of Saphira’s words from the pre- 
vious night. “Normally, I would not compare a human’s age to an elfs, 
but since you share our longevity, you must also be judged by our stan- 


dards. 


“And you are a Rider. We rely upon you to help us defeat Galbatorix; 
it could be disastrous for everyone in Alagaésia if you are distracted from 
your studies. 


“Now then,” said Oromis, “how should Arya have responded to your 
fairth? It’s clear that you see her in a romantic light, yet—while I have no 
doubt Arya is fond of you—a union between the two of you is impossi- 
ble due to your own youth, culture, race, and responsibilities. Your inter- 
est has placed Arya in an uncomfortable position. She dare not confront 
you, for fear of disrupting your training. But, as the queen’s daughter, she 
cannot ignore you and risk offending a Rider—especially one upon which 
so much depends.... Even if you were a fit match, Arya would refrain 
from encouraging you so that you could devote all of your energy to the 
task at hand. She would sacrifice her happiness for the greater good.” 
Oromis’s voice thickened: “You must understand, Eragon, that slaying 
Galbatorix is more important than any one person. Nothing else matters.” 
He paused, his gaze gentle, then added, “Given the circumstances, is it so 
strange Arya was frightened that your feelings for her could endanger 
everything we have worked for?” 


Eragon shook his head. He was ashamed that his behavior had caused 


Arya distress, and dismayed by how reckless and juvenile he had been. I 
could have avoided this entire mess if I'd just kept better control of myself. 


364 


Touching him on the shoulder, Oromis guided him back inside the hut. 
“Think not that I am devoid of sympathy, Eragon. Everyone experiences 
ardor like yours at one point or another during their lives. It’s part of 
growing up. I also know how hard it is for you to deny yourself the usual 
comforts of life, but it’s necessary if we are to prevail.” 


“Yes, Master.” 


They sat at the kitchen table, and Oromis began to lay out writing ma- 
terials for Eragon to practice the Liduen Kvaedhi. “It would be unreason- 
able of me to expect you to forget your fascination with Arya, but I do 
expect you to prevent it from interfering with my instruction again. Can 
you promise me that?” 


“Yes, Master. I promise.” 


“And Arya? What would be the honorable thing to do about her pre- 
dicament?” 


Eragon hesitated. “I don’t want to lose her friendship.” 
“No.” 


“Therefore... I will go to her, I will apologize, and I will reassure her 
that I never intend to cause her such hardship again.” It was difficult for 
him to say, but once he did, he felt a sense of relief, as if acknowledging 
his mistake cleansed him of it. 


Oromis appeared pleased. “By that alone, you prove that you have ma- 
tured.” 


The sheets of paper were smooth underneath Eragon’s hands as he 
pressed them flat against the tabletop. He stared at the blank white ex- 
panse for a moment, then dipped a quill in ink and began to transcribe a 
column of glyphs. Each barbed line was like a streak of night against the 
paper, an abyss into which he could lose himself and try to forget his 
confused feelings. 


365 


THE OBLITERATOR 





The following morn, Eragon went looking for Arya in order to apolo- 
gize. He searched for over an hour without success. It seemed as if she 
had vanished among the many hidden nooks within Ellesméra. He caught 
a glimpse of her once as he paused by the entrance to Tialdari Hall and 
called out to her, but she slipped away before he could reach her side. 
She’s avoiding me, he finally realized. 


As the days rolled by, Eragon embraced Oromis’s training with a zeal 
that the elder Rider praised, devoting himself to his studies in order to 
distract himself from thoughts of Arya. 


Night and day, Eragon strove to master his lessons. He memorized the 
words of making, binding, and summoning; learned the true names of 
plants and animals; and studied the perils of transmutation, how to call 
upon the wind and the sea, and the myriad skills needed to understand 
the forces of the world. At spells that dealt with the great energies—such 
as light, heat, and magnetism—he excelled, for he possessed the talent to 
judge nigh exactly how much strength a task required and whether it 
would exceed that of his body. 


Occasionally, Orik would come and watch, standing without comment 
by the edge of the clearing while Oromis tutored Eragon, or while Eragon 
struggled alone with a particularly difficult spell. 


Oromis set many challenges before him. He had Eragon cook meals 
with magic, in order to teach him finer control of his gramarye; Eragon’s 
first attempts resulted in a blackened mess. The elf showed Eragon how 
to detect and neutralize poisons of every sort and, from then on, Eragon 
had to inspect his food for the different venoms Oromis was liable to slip 
into it. More than once Eragon went hungry when he could not find the 
poison or was unable to counteract it. Twice he became so sick, Oromis 
had to heal him. And Oromis had Eragon cast multiple spells simultane- 
ously, which required tremendous concentration to keep the spells di- 
rected at their intended targets and prevent them from shifting among 
the items Eragon wanted to affect. 


Oromis devoted long hours to the craft of imbuing matter with energy, 
either to be released at a later time or to give an object certain attributes. 
He said, “This is how Rhunén charmed the Riders’ swords so they never 
break or dull; how we sing plants into growing as we desire; how a trap 
might be set in a box, only to be triggered when the box is opened; how 


366 


we and the dwarves make the Erisdar, our lanterns; and how you may 
heal one who is injured, to name but a few uses. These are the most po- 
tent of spells, for they can lie dormant for a thousand years or more and 
are difficult to perceive or avert. They permeate much of Alagaésia, 
shaping the land and the destiny of those who live here.” 


Eragon asked, “You could use this technique to alter your body, 
couldn't you? Or is that too dangerous?” 


Oromis’s lips quirked in a faint smile. “Alas, you have stumbled upon 
elves’ greatest weakness: our vanity. We love beauty in all its forms, and 
we seek to represent that ideal in our appearance. That is why we are 
known as the Fair Folk. Every elf looks exactly as he or she wishes to. 
When elves learn the spells for growing and molding living things, they 
often choose to modify their appearance to better reflect their personali- 
ties. A few elves have gone beyond mere aesthetic changes and altered 
their anatomy to adapt to various environments, as you will see during 
the Blood-oath Celebration. Oftentimes, they are more animal than elf. 


“However, transferring power to a living creature is different from 
transferring power to an inanimate object. Very few materials are suit- 
able for storing energy; most either allow it to dissipate or become so 
charged with force that when you touch the object, a bolt of lightning 
drives through you. The best materials we have found for this purpose 
are gemstones. Quartz, agates, and other lesser stones are not as efficient 
as, say, a diamond, but any gem will suffice. That is why Riders’ swords 
always have a jewel set in their pommels. It is also why your dwarf neck- 
lace—which is entirely metal—must sap your strength to fuel its spell, 
since it can hold no energy of its own.” 


When not with Oromis, Eragon supplemented his education by reading 
the many scrolls the elf gave him, a habit he soon became addicted to. 
Eragon’s rearing—limited as it was by Garrow’s scant tutelage—had ex- 
posed him only to the knowledge needed to run a farm. The information 
he discovered on the miles of paper flooded into him like rain on parched 
desert, sating a previously unknown thirst. He devoured texts on geogra- 
phy, biology, anatomy, philosophy, and mathematics, as well as memoirs, 
biographies, and histories. More important than mere facts was his intro- 
duction to alternative ways of thinking. They challenged his beliefs and 
forced him to reexamine his assumptions about everything from the 
rights of an individual within society to what caused the sun to move 
across the sky. 


He noticed that a number of scrolls concerned Urgals and their culture. 


367 


Eragon read them and made no mention of it, nor did Oromis broach the 
topic. 


From his studies, Eragon learned much about the elves, a subject that 
he avidly pursued, hoping that it would help him to better understand 
Arya. To his surprise, he discovered that the elves did not practice mar- 
riage, but rather took mates for however long they wanted, whether it be 
for a day or a century. Children were rare, and having a child was consid- 
ered by the elves to be the ultimate vow of love. 


Eragon also learned that since their two races had first met, only a 
handful of elf-human couples had existed: mainly human Riders who 
found appropriate mates among the elves. However, as best he could tell 
from the cryptic records, most such relationships ended in tragedy, either 
because the lovers were unable to relate to one another or because the 
humans aged and died while the elves escaped the ravages of time. 


In addition to nonfiction, Oromis presented Eragon with copies of the 
elves’ greatest songs, poems, and epics, which captured Eragon’s imagina- 
tion, for the only stories he was familiar with were the ones Brom had 
recited in Carvahall. He savored the epics as he might a well-cooked 
meal, lingering over The Deed of Géda or The Lay of Umhodan so as to 
prolong his enjoyment of the tales. 


Saphira’s own training proceeded apace. Linked as he was to her mind, 
Eragon got to watch as Glaedr put her through an exercise regimen every 
bit as strenuous as his. She practiced hovering in the air while lifting 
boulders, as well as sprints, dives, and other acrobatics. To increase her 
endurance, Glaedr had her breathe fire for hours upon a natural stone pil- 
lar in an attempt to melt it. At first Saphira could only maintain the 
flames for a few minutes at a time, but before long the blistering torch 
roared from her maw for over a half hour uninterrupted, heating the pil- 
lar white-hot. Eragon was also privy to the dragon lore Glaedr imparted 
to Saphira, details about the dragons’ lives and history that comple- 
mented her instinctual knowledge. Much of it was incomprehensible to 
Eragon, and he suspected that Saphira concealed even more from him, 
secrets of her race that dragons shared with no one but themselves. One 
thing he did glean, and that Saphira treasured, was the name of her sire, 
Iormtngr, and her dam, Vervada, which meant Storm-cleaver in the old 
speech. While Iormtingr had been bound to a Rider, Vervada was a wild 
dragon who had laid many eggs but entrusted only one to the Riders: 
Saphira. Both dragons perished in the Fall. 


Some days Eragon and Saphira would fly with Oromis and Glaedr, 


368 


practicing aerial combat or visiting crumbling ruins hidden within Du 
Weldenvarden. Other days they would reverse the usual order of things, 
and Eragon would accompany Glaedr while Saphira remained on the 
Crags of Tel’naeir with Oromis. 


Each morning Eragon sparred with Vanir, which, without exception, 
ignited one or more of Eragon’s seizures. To make matters worse, the elf 
continued to treat Eragon with haughty condescension. He delivered 
oblique slights that, on the surface, never exceeded the bounds of polite- 
ness, and he refused to be drawn to anger no matter how Eragon needled 
him. Eragon hated him and his cool, mannered bearing. It seemed as if 
Vanir was insulting him with every movement. And Vanir’s compan- 
ions—who, as best Eragon could tell, were of a younger generation of 
elves—shared his veiled distaste for Eragon, though they never displayed 
aught but respect for Saphira. 


Their rivalry came to a head when, after defeating Eragon six times in a 
row, Vanir lowered his sword and said, “Dead yet again, Shadeslayer. 
How repetitive. Do you wish to continue?” His tone indicated that he 
thought it would be pointless. 


“Aye,” grunted Eragon. He had already suffered an episode with his 
back and was in no mood to bandy words. 


Still, when Vanir said, “Tell me, as I am curious: How did you kill 
Durza when you are so slow? I cannot fathom how you managed it,” Er- 
agon felt compelled to reply: “I caught him by surprise.” 


“Forgive me; I should have guessed trickery was involved.” 


Eragon fought the impulse to grind his teeth. “If I were an elf or you a 
human, you would not be able to match my blade.” 


“Perhaps,” said Vanir. He assumed his ready position and, within the 
span of three seconds and two blows, disarmed Eragon. “But I think not. 
You should not boast to a better swordsman, else he may decide to pun- 
ish your temerity.” 


Eragon’s temper broke then, and he reached deep within himself and 
into the torrent of magic. He released the pent-up energy with one of the 
twelve minor words of binding, crying “Malthinae!” to chain Vanir’s legs 
and arms in place and hold his jaw shut so that he could not utter a coun- 
terspell. The elf’s eyes bulged with outrage. 


369 


Eragon said, “And you should not boast to one who is more skilled in 
magic than you.” 


Vanir's dark eyebrows met. 


Without warning or a whisper of a sound, an invisible force clouted Er- 
agon on the chest and threw him ten yards across the grass, where he 
landed upon his side, driving the wind from his lungs. The impact dis- 
rupted Eragon’s control of the magic and freed Vanir. 


How did he do that? 


Advancing upon him, Vanir said, “Your ignorance betrays you, human. 
You do not know whereof you speak. To think that you were chosen to 
succeed Vrael, that you were given his quarters, that you have had the 
honor to serve the Mourning Sage...” He shook his head. “It sickens me 
that such gifts are bestowed upon one so unworthy. You do not even un- 
derstand what magic is or how it works.” 


Eragon’s anger resurged like a crimson tide. “What,” he said, “have I ever 
done to wrong you? Why do you despise me so? Would you prefer it if 
no Rider existed to oppose Galbatorix?” 


“My opinions are of little consequence.” 
“I agree, but I would hear them.” 


“Listening, as Nuala wrote in Convocations, is the path to wisdom only 
when the result of a conscious decision and not a void of perception.” 


“Straighten your tongue, Vanir, and give me an honest answer!” 


Vanir smiled coldly. “As you command, O Rider.” Drawing near so that 
only Eragon could hear his soft voice, the elf said, “For eighty years after 
the fall of the Riders, we held no hope of victory. We survived by hiding 
ourselves through deceit and magic, which is but a temporary measure, 
for eventually Galbatorix will be strong enough to march upon us and 
sweep aside our defenses. Then, long after we had resigned ourselves to 
our fate, Brom and Jeod rescued Saphira’s egg, and once again a chance 
existed to defeat the foul usurper. Imagine our joy and celebration. We 
knew that in order to withstand Galbatorix, the new Rider had to be 
more powerful than any of his predecessors, more powerful than even 
Vrael. Yet how was our patience rewarded? With another human like 
Galbatorix. Worse... a cripple. You doomed us all, Eragon, the instant you 


37° 


touched Saphira’s egg. Do not expect us to welcome your presence.” 
Vanir touched his lips with his first and second finger, then sidestepped 
Eragon and walked off the sparring field, leaving Eragon rooted in place. 


He's right, thought Eragon. I’m ill suited for this task. Any of these elves, 
even Vanir, would make a better Rider than me. 


Emanating outrage, Saphira broadened the contact between them. Do 
you think so little of my judgment, Eragon? You forget that when I was in 
my egg, Arya exposed me to each and every one of these elves—as well as 
many of the Varden’s children—and that I rejected them all. I wouldn't 
have chosen someone to be my Rider unless they could help your race, mine, 
and the elves, for the three of us share an intertwined fate. You were the 
right person, at the right place, at the right time. Never forget that. 


If ever that were true, he said, it was before Durza injured me. Now I see 
naught but darkness and evil in our future. I won’t give up, but I despair 
that we may not prevail. Perhaps our task is not to overthrow Galbatorix 
but to prepare the way for the next Rider chosen by the remaining eggs. 


At the Crags of Tel’naeir, Eragon found Oromis at the table in his hut, 
painting a landscape with black ink along the bottom edge of a scroll he 
had finished writing. 


Eragon bowed and knelt. “Master.” 


Fifteen minutes elapsed before Oromis finished limning the tufts of 
needles on a gnarled juniper tree, laid aside his ink, cleaned his sable 
brush with water from a clay pot, and then addressed Eragon, saying, 
“Why have you come so early?” 


“I apologize for disturbing you, but Vanir abandoned our contest part- 
way through and I did not know what to do with myself.” 


“Why did Vanir leave, Eragon-vodhr?” 


Oromis folded his hands in his lap while Eragon described the encoun- 
ter, ending with: “I should not have lost control, but I did, and I looked all 
the more foolish because of it. I have failed you, Master.” 


“You have,” agreed Oromis. “Vanir may have goaded you, but that was 
no reason to respond in kind. You must keep a better hold over your 
emotions, Eragon. It could cost you your life if you allow your temper to 
sway your judgment during battle. Also, such childish displays do nothing 


of 


but vindicate those elves who are opposed to you. Our machinations are 
subtle and allow little room for such errors.” 


“I am sorry, Master. It won't happen again.” 


As Oromis seemed content to wait in his chair until the time when 
they normally performed the Rimgar, Eragon seized the opportunity to 
ask, “How could Vanir have worked magic without speaking?” 


“Did he? Perhaps another elf decided to assist him.” 


Eragon shook his head. “During my first day in Ellesméra, I also saw Is- 
lanzadi summon a downpour of flowers by clapping her hands, nothing 
more. And Vanir said that I didn’t understand how magic works. What 
did he mean?” 


“Once again,” said Oromis, resigned, “you grasp at knowledge that you 
are not prepared for. Yet, because of our circumstances, I cannot deny it 
to you. Only know this: that which you ask for was not taught to Rid- 
ers—and is not taught to our magicians—until they had, and have, mas- 
tered every other aspect of magic, for this is the secret to the true nature 
of magic and the ancient language. Those who know it may acquire great 
power, yes, but at a terrible risk.” He paused for a moment. “How is the 
ancient language bound to magic, Eragon-vodhr?” 


“The words of the ancient language can release the energy stored within 
your body and thus activate a spell.” 


“Ah. Then you mean that certain sounds, certain vibrations in the air, 
somehow tap into this energy? Sounds that might be produced at random 
by any creature or thing?” 

“Yes, Master.” 

“Does not that seem absurd?” 

Confused, Eragon said, “It doesn’t matter if it seems absurd, Master; it 
just is. Should I think it absurd that the moon wanes and waxes, or that 
the seasons turn, or that birds fly south in the winter?” 

“Of course not. But how could mere sound do so much? Can particular 


patterns of pitch and volume really trigger reactions that allow us to ma- 
nipulate energy?” 


374 


“But they do.” 


“Sound has no control over magic. Saying a word or phrase in this lan- 
guage is not what’s important, it’s thinking them in this language.” With a 
flick of his wrist, a golden flame appeared over Oromis’s palm, then dis- 
appeared. “However, unless the need is dire, we still utter our spells out 
loud to prevent stray thoughts from disrupting them, which is a danger to 
even the most experienced magic user.” 


The implications staggered Eragon. He thought back to when he almost 
drowned under the waterfall of the lake Késtha-mérna and how he had 
been unable to access magic because of the water surrounding him. If I 
had known this then, I could have saved myself, he thought. “Master,” he 
said, “if sound does not affect magic, why, then, do thoughts?” 


Now Oromis smiled. “Why indeed? I must point out that we ourselves 
are not the source of magic. Magic can exist on its own, independent of 
any spell, such as the werelights in the bogs by Aroughs, the dream well 
in Mani’s Caves in the Beor Mountains, and the floating crystal on Eoam. 
Wild magic such as this is treacherous, unpredictable, and often stronger 
than any we can cast. 


“Eons ago, all magic was thus. To use it required nothing but the ability 
to sense magic with your mind—which every magician must possess— 
and the desire and strength to use it. Without the structure of the ancient 
language, magicians could not govern their talent and, as a result, loosed 
many evils upon the land, killing thousands. Over time they discovered 
that stating their intentions in their language helped them to order their 
thoughts and avoid costly errors. But it was no foolproof method. Even- 
tually, an accident occurred so horrific that it almost destroyed every liv- 
ing being in the world. We know of the event from fragments of manu- 
scripts that survived the era, but who or what cast the fatal spell is hid- 
den from us. The manuscripts say that, afterward, a race called the Grey 
Folk—not elves, for we were young then—gathered their resources and 
wrought an enchantment, perhaps the greatest that was or ever shall be. 
Together the Grey Folk changed the nature of magic itself. They made it 
so that their language, the ancient language, could control what a spell 
does... could actually limit the magic so that if you said burn that door and 
by chance looked at me and thought of me, the magic would still burn 
the door, not me. And they gave the ancient language its two unique 
traits, the ability to prevent those who speak it from lying and the ability 
to describe the true nature of things. How they did this remains a mys- 


tery. 


373 


“The manuscripts differ on what happened to the Grey Folk when they 
completed their work, but it seems that the enchantment drained them 
of their power and left them but a shadow of themselves. They faded 
away, choosing to live in their cities until the stones crumbled to dust or 
to take mates among the younger races and so pass into darkness.” 


“Then,” said Eragon, “it is still possible to use magic without the ancient 
language?” 


“How do you think Saphira breathes fire? And, by your own account, 
she used no word when she turned Brom’s tomb to diamond nor when 
she blessed the child in Farthen Dar. Dragons’ minds are different from 
ours; they need no protection from magic. They cannot use it con- 
sciously, aside from their fire, but when the gift touches them, their 
strength is unparalleled.... You look troubled, Eragon. Why?” 


Eragon stared down at his hands. “What does this mean for me, Mas- 
ter?” 


“It means that you will continue to study the ancient language, for you 
can accomplish much with it that would be too complex or too danger- 
ous otherwise. It means that if you are captured and gagged, you can still 
call upon magic to free yourself, as Vanir did. It means that if you are 
captured and drugged and cannot recall the ancient language, yes, even 
then, you may cast a spell, though only in the gravest circumstances. And 
it means that if you would cast a spell for that which has no name in the 
ancient language, you can.” He paused. “But beware the temptation to use 
these powers. Even the wisest among us hesitate to trifle with them for 
fear of death or worse.” 


The next morning, and every morning thereafter so long as he stayed in 
Ellesméra, Eragon dueled with Vanir, but he never lost his temper again, 
no matter what the elf did or said. 


Nor did Eragon feel like devoting energy to their rivalry. His back 
pained him more and more frequently, driving him to the limits of his 
endurance. The debilitating attacks sensitized him; actions that previously 
had caused him no trouble could now leave him writhing on the ground. 
Even the Rimgar began to trigger the seizures as he advanced to more 
strenuous poses. It was not uncommon for him to suffer three or four 
such episodes in one day. 


374 


Eragon’s face grew haggard. He walked with a shuffle, his movements 
slow and careful as he tried to preserve his strength. It became hard for 
him to think clearly or to pay attention to Oromis’s lessons, and gaps be- 
gan to appear in his memory that he could not account for. In his spare 
time, he took up Orik’s puzzle ring again, preferring to concentrate upon 
the baffling interlocked rings rather than his condition. When she was 
with him, Saphira insisted that he ride upon her back and did everything 
that she could to make him comfortable and to save him effort. 


One morning, as he clung to a spike on her neck, Eragon said, I have a 
new name for pain. 


What's that? 

The Obliterator. Because when you're in pain, nothing else can exist. Not 
thought. Not emotion. Only the drive to escape the pain. When it’s strong 
enough, the Obliterator strips us of everything that makes us who we are, 
until we're reduced to creatures less than animals, creatures with a single 
desire and goal: escape. 


A good name, then. 


I’m falling apart, Saphira, like an old horse that’s plowed too many fields. 
Keep hold of me with your mind, or I may drift apart and forget who I am. 


I will never let go of you. 

Soon afterward, Eragon fell victim to three bouts of agony while fight- 
ing Vanir and then two more during the Rimgar. As he uncurled from 
the clenched ball he had rolled into, Oromis said, “Again, Eragon. You 


must perfect your balance.” 


Eragon shook his head and growled in an undertone, “No.” He crossed 
his arms to hide his tremors. 


“What?” 

“No.” 

“Get up, Eragon, and try again.” 
“No! Do the pose yourself; I won't.” 


Oromis knelt beside Eragon and placed a cool hand on his cheek. Hold- 


375 


ing it there, he gazed at Eragon with such kindness, Eragon understood 
the depth of the elfs compassion for him, and that, if it were possible, 
Oromis would willingly assume Eragon’s pain to relieve his suffering. 
“Don’t abandon hope,” said Oromis. “Never that.” A measure of strength 
seemed to flow from him to Eragon. “We are the Riders. We stand be- 
tween the light and the dark, and keep the balance between the two. Ig- 
norance, fear, hate: these are our enemies. Deny them with all your 
might, Eragon, or we will surely fail.” He stood and extended a hand to- 
ward Eragon. “Now rise, Shadeslayer, and prove you can conquer the in- 
stincts of your flesh!” 


Eragon took a deep breath and pushed himself upright on one arm, 
wincing from the effort. He got his feet underneath himself, paused for a 
moment, then straightened to his full height and looked Oromis in the 
eye. 


The elf nodded with approval. 


Eragon remained silent until they finished the Rimgar and went to 
bathe in the stream, whereupon he said, “Master.” 


“Yes, Eragon?” 


“Why must I endure this torture? You could use magic to give me the 
skills I need, to shape my body as you do the trees and plants.” 


‘I could, but if I did, you would not understand how you got the body 
you had, your own abilities, nor how to maintain them. No shortcuts ex- 
ist for the path you walk, Eragon.” 


Cold water rushed over the length of Eragon’s body as he lowered him- 
self into the stream. He ducked his head under the surface, holding a rock 
so that he would not float away, and lay stretched out along the stream- 
bed, feeling like an arrow flying through the water. 


376 


NARDA 





Roran leaned on one knee and scratched his new beard as he looked 
down at Narda. 


The small town was dark and compact, like a crust of rye bread 
tamped into a crevasse along the coast. Beyond it, the wine-red sea glim- 
mered with the last rays of the dying sunset. The water fascinated him; it 
was utterly different from the landscape he was accustomed to. 


We made it. 


Leaving the promontory, Roran walked back to his makeshift tent, en- 
joying deep breaths of the salty air. They had camped high in the foothills 
of the Spine in order to avoid detection by anyone who might alert the 
Empire as to their whereabouts. 


As he strode among the clumps of villagers huddled beneath the trees, 
Roran surveyed their condition with sorrow and anger. The trek from 
Palancar Valley had left people sick, battered, and exhausted; their faces 
gaunt from lack of food; their clothes tattered. Most everyone wore rags 
tied around their hands to ward off frostbite during the frigid mountain 
nights. Weeks of carrying heavy packs had bowed once-proud shoulders. 
The worst sight was the children: thin and unnaturally still. 


They deserve better, thought Roran. I’d be in the clutches of the Ra’zac 
right now if they hadn't protected me. 


Numerous people approached Roran, most of whom wanted nothing 
more than a touch on the shoulder or a word of comfort. Some offered 
him bits of food, which he refused or, when they insisted, gave to some- 
one else. Those who remained at a distance watched with round, pale 
eyes. He knew what they said about him, that he was mad, that spirits 
possessed him, that not even the Ra’zac could defeat him in battle. 


Crossing the Spine had been even harder than Roran expected. The 
only paths in the forest were game trails, which were too narrow, steep, 
and meandering for their group. As a result, the villagers were often 
forced to chop their way through the trees and underbrush, a painstaking 
task that everyone despised, not least because it made it easy for the Em- 
pire to track them. The one advantage to the situation was that the exer- 
cise restored Roran’s injured shoulder to its previous level of strength, al- 
though he still had trouble lifting his arm at certain angles. 


S77 


Other hardships took their toll. A sudden storm trapped them on a 
bare pass high above the timberline. Three people froze in the snow: 
Hida, Brenna, and Nesbit, all of whom were quite old. That night was the 
first time Roran was convinced that the entire village would die because 
they had followed him. Soon after, a boy broke his arm in a fall, and then 
Southwell drowned in a glacier stream. Wolves and bears preyed upon 
their livestock on a regular basis, ignoring the watchfires that the villagers 
lit once they were concealed from Palancar Valley and Galbatorix’s hated 
soldiers. Hunger clung to them like a relentless parasite, gnawing at their 
bellies, devouring their strength, and sapping their will to continue. 


And yet they survived, displaying the same obstinacy and fortitude that 
kept their ancestors in Palancar Valley despite famine, war, and pesti- 
lence. The people of Carvahall might take an age and a half to reach a de- 
cision, but once they did, nothing could deter them from their course. 


Now that they had reached Narda, a sense of hope and accomplish- 
ment permeated the camp. No one knew what would happen next, but 
the fact that they had gotten so far gave them confidence. 


We won't be safe until we leave the Empire, thought Roran. And it’s up to 
me to ensure that we aren't caught. I’ve become responsible for everyone 
here.... A responsibility that he had embraced wholeheartedly because it 
allowed him to both protect the villagers from Galbatorix and pursue his 
goal of rescuing Katrina. It’s been so long since she was captured. How can 
she still be alive? He shuddered and pushed the thoughts away. True 
madness awaited him if he allowed himself to brood over Katrina’s fate. 


At dawn Roran, Horst, Baldor, Loring’s three sons, and Gertrude set out 
for Narda. They descended from the foothills to the town’s main road, 
careful to stay hidden until they emerged onto the lane. Here in the low- 
lands, the air seemed thick to Roran; it felt as if he were trying to breathe 
underwater. 


Roran gripped the hammer at his belt as they approached Narda’s gate. 
Two soldiers guarded the opening. They examined Roran’s group with 
hard eyes, lingering on their ragged clothes, then lowered their poleaxes 
and barred the entrance. 


“Where'd you be from?” asked the man on the right. He could not have 
been older than twenty-five, but his hair was already pure white. 


378 


Swelling his chest, Horst crossed his arms and said, “Roundabouts 
Teirm, if it please you.” 


“What brings you here?” 


“Trade. We were sent by shopkeepers who want to buy goods directly 
from Narda, instead of through the usual merchants.” 


“That so, eh? What goods?” 

When Horst faltered, Gertrude said, “Herbs and medicine on my part. 
The plants I’ve received from here have either been too old or moldy and 
spoiled. I have to procure a fresh supply.” 

“And my brothers and I,” said Darmmen, “came to bargain with your 
cobblers. Shoes made in the northern style are fashionable in Dras-Leona 


and Uri’baen.” He grimaced. “At least they were when we set out.” 


Horst nodded with renewed confidence. “Aye. And I’m here to collect 
a shipment of ironwork for my master.” 


“So you say. What about that one? What does he do?” asked the soldier, 
motioning toward Roran with his ax. 


“Pottery,” said Roran. 

“Pottery?” 

“Pottery.” 

“Why the hammer, then?” 

“How do you think the glaze on a bottle or jar gets cracked? It doesn’t 
happen by itself, you know. You have to hit it.” Roran returned the 
white-haired man’s stare of disbelief with a blank expression, daring him 


to challenge the statement. 


The soldier grunted and ran his gaze over them again. “Be as that may, 
you don’t look like tradesmen to me. Starved alley cats is more like it.” 


“We had difficulty on the road,” said Gertrude. 


“That I’d believe. If you came from Teirm, where be your horses?” 


3/2 


“We left them at our camp,” supplied Hamund. He pointed south, op- 
posite where the rest of the villagers were actually hidden. 


“Don't have the coin to stay in town, eh?” With a scornful chuckle, the 
soldier raised his ax and gestured for his companion to do likewise. “All 
right, you can pass, but don’t cause trouble or you'll be off to the stocks 
or worse.” 


Once through the gate, Horst pulled Roran to the side of the street and 
growled in his ear, “That was a fool thing to do, making up something as 
ridiculous as that. Cracking the glaze! Do you want a fight? We can’t—’ 
He stopped as Gertrude plucked at his sleeve. 


“Look,” murmured the healer. 


To the left of the entrance stood a six-foot-wide message board with a 
narrow shingle roof to protect the yellowing parchment underneath. Half 
the board was devoted to official notices and proclamations. On the 
other half hung a block of posters displaying sketches of various crimi- 
nals. Foremost among them was a drawing of Roran without a beard. 


Startled, Roran glanced around to make sure that no one in the street 
was close enough to compare his face to the illustration, then devoted his 
attention to the poster. He had expected the Empire to pursue them, but 
it was still a shock to encounter proof of it. Galbatorix must be expending 
an enormous amount of resources trying to catch us. When they were in 
the Spine, it was easy to forget that the outside world existed. I bet post- 
ers of me are nailed up throughout the Empire. He grinned, glad that he had 
stopped shaving and that he and the others had agreed to use false names 
while in Narda. 


A reward was inked at the bottom of the poster. Garrow never taught 
Roran and Eragon to read, but he did teach them their figures because, as 
he said, “You have to know how much you own, what it’s worth, and 
what you're paid for it so you don't get rooked by some two-faced 
knave.” Thus, Roran could see that the Empire had offered ten thousand 
crowns for him, enough to live in comfort for several decades. In a per- 
verse way, the size of the reward pleased him, giving him a sense of im- 
portance. 


Then his gaze drifted to the next poster in line. 


It was Eragon. 


380 


Roran’s gut clenched as if he had been struck, and for a few seconds he 
forgot to breathe. 


He’s alive! 


After his initial relief subsided, Roran felt his old anger about Eragon’s 
role in Garrow’s death and the destruction of their farm take its place, 
accompanied by a burning desire to know why the Empire was hunting 
Eragon. It must have something to do with that blue stone and the Ra’zac’s 
first visit to Carvahall. Once again, Roran wondered what kind of fiend- 
ish machinations he and the rest of Carvahall had become entangled in. 


Instead of a reward, Eragon’s poster bore two lines of runes. “What 
crime is he accused of?” Roran asked Gertrude. 


The skin around Gertrude’s eyes wrinkled as she squinted at the board. 
“Treason, the both of you. It says Galbatorix will bestow an earldom on 
whoever captures Eragon, but that those who try should take care be- 
cause he’s extremely dangerous.” 


Roran blinked with astonishment. Eragon? It seemed inconceivable un- 
til Roran considered how he himself had changed in the past few weeks. 
The same blood runs in our veins. Who knows, Eragon may have accom- 
plished as much or more than I have since he left. 


In a low voice, Baldor said, “If killing Galbatorix’s men and defying the 
Ra’zac only earns you ten thousand crowns—large as that is—what 
makes you worth an earldom?” 


“Buggering the king himself,” suggested Larne. 


“That’s enough of that,” said Horst. “Guard your tongue better, Baldor, 
or we'll end up in irons. And, Roran, don’t draw attention to yourself 
again. With a reward like that, people are bound to be watching strangers 
for anyone who matches your description.” Running a hand through his 
hair, Horst pulled up his belt and said, “Right. We all have jobs to do. Re- 
turn here at noon to report on your progress.” 


With that their party split into three. Darmmen, Larne, and Hamund 
set out together to purchase food for the villagers, both to meet present 
needs and to sustain them through the next stage of their journey. 
Gertrude—as she had told the guard—went to replenish her stock of 
herbs, unguents, and tinctures. And Roran, Horst, and Baldor headed 


381 


down the sloping streets to the docks, where they hoped to charter a ship 
that could transport the villagers to Surda or, at the very least, Teirm. 


When they reached the weathered boardwalk that covered the beach, 
Roran halted and stared out at the ocean, which was gray from low 
clouds and dotted with whitecaps from erratic wind. He had never imag- 
ined that the horizon could be so perfectly flat. The hollow boom of wa- 
ter knocking against the piles beneath his feet made it feel as if he stood 
upon the surface of a huge drum. The odor of fish—fresh, gutted, and 
rotting—overwhelmed every other smell. 


Glancing from Roran to Baldor, who was likewise entranced, Horst 
said, “Quite a sight, isn’t it?” 


“Aye,” said Roran. 
“Makes you feel rather small, doesn’t it?” 
“Aye,” said Baldor. 


Horst nodded. “I remember when I first saw the ocean, it had a similar 
effect on me.” 


“When was that?” asked Roran. In addition to the flocks of seagulls 
whirling over the cove, he noticed an odd type of bird perched upon the 
piers. The animal had an ungainly body with a striped beak that it kept 
tucked against its breast like a pompous old man, a white head and neck, 
and a sooty torso. One of the birds lifted its beak, revealing a leathery 
pouch underneath. 


“Bartram, the smith who came before me,” said Horst, “died when I was 
fifteen, a year before the end of my apprenticeship. I had to find a smith 
who was willing to finish another man’s work, so I traveled to Ceunon, 
which is built along the North Sea. There I met Kelton, a vile old man 
but good at what he did. He agreed to teach me.” Horst laughed. “By the 
time we were done, I wasn’t sure if I should thank him or curse him.” 


“Thank him, I should think,” said Baldor. “You never would have mar- 
ried Mother otherwise.” 


Roran scowled as he studied the waterfront. “There aren’t many ships,” 
he observed. Two craft were berthed at the south end of the port and a 
third at the opposite side with nothing but fishing boats and dinghies in 
between. Of the southern pair, one had a broken mast. Roran had no ex- 


382 


perience with ships but, to him, none of the vessels appeared large 
enough to carry almost three hundred passengers. 


Going from one ship to the next, Roran, Horst, and Baldor soon discov- 
ered that they were all otherwise engaged. It would take a month or 
more to repair the ship with the broken mast. The vessel beside it, the 
Waverunner, was rigged with leather sails and was about to venture north 
to the treacherous islands where the Seithr plant grew. And the Alba- 
tross, the last ship, had just arrived from distant Feinster and was getting 
its seams recaulked before departing with its cargo of wool. 


A dockworker laughed at Horst’s questions. “You're too late and too 
early at the same time. Most of the spring ships came and left two, three 
weeks ago. An’ another month, the nor’westers will start gusting, an’ then 
the seal and walrus hunters will return and we'll get ships from Teirm 
and the rest of the Empire to take the hides, meat, and oil. Then you 
might have a chance of hiring a captain with an empty hold. Meanwhile, 
we don’t see much more traffic than this.” 


Desperate, Roran asked, “Is there no other way to get goods from here 
to Teirm? It doesn’t have to be fast or comfortable.” 


“Well,” said the man, hefting the box on his shoulder, “if it doesn’t have 
to be fast an’ you're only going to Teirm, then you might try Clovis over 
there.” He pointed to a line of sheds that floated between two piers 
where boats could be stored. “He owns some barges that he ships grain 
on in the fall. The rest of the year, Clovis fishes for a living, like most 
everybody in Narda.” Then he frowned. “What kind of goods do you 
have? The sheep have already been shorn, an’ no crops are in as of yet.” 


“This and that,” said Horst. He tossed the man a copper. 


The dockworker pocketed it with a wink and a nudge. “Right you are, 
sir. This an’ that. I know a dodge when I see one. But no need to fear old 
Ulric; mum’s th’ word, it is. Be seeing you, then, sir.” He strolled off, 
whistling. 


As it turned out, Clovis was absent from the docks. After getting direc- 
tions, it took them a half hour to walk to his house on the other side of 
Narda, where they found Clovis planting iris bulbs along the path to his 
front door. He was a stout man with sunburned cheeks and a salt-and- 
pepper beard. An additional hour passed before they could convince the 
mariner that they really were interested in his barges, despite the season, 
and then troop back to the sheds, which he unlocked to reveal three 


383 


identical barges, the Merrybell, Edeline, and Red Boar. 


Each barge was seventy-five feet long, twenty feet wide, and painted 
rust red. They had open holds that could be covered with tarpaulins, a 
mast that could be erected in the center for a single square sail, and a 
block of above-decks cabins at the rear—or aft, as Clovis called it—of 
the craft. 


“Their draft be deeper than that of an inland scow,” explained Clovis, 
“so you needn't fear them capsizing in rough weather, though you'd do 
well to avoid being caught in a real tempest. These barges aren’t meant 
for the open sea. They're meant to stay within sight of land. And now be 
the worst time to launch them. By my honor, we've had nothing but 
thunderstorms every afternoon for a month.” 


“Do you have crews for all three?” asked Roran. 


“Well now... see, there’s a problem. Most of the men I employ left 
weeks ago to hunt seals, as they're wont to do. Since I need them only 
after the harvest, they’re free to come and go as they please for the rest of 
the year... I’m sure you fine gentlemen understand my position.” Clovis 
tried to smile, then glanced between Roran, Horst, and Baldor as if uncer- 
tain whom to address. 


Roran walked the length of the Edeline, examining it for damage. The 
barge looked old, but the wood was sound and the paint was fresh. “If we 
replace the missing men in your crews, how much would it cost to go to 
Teirm with all three barges?” 


“That depends,” said Clovis. “The sailors earn fifteen coppers per day, 
plus as much good food as they can eat and a dram of whisky besides. 
What your men earn be your own business. I won’t put them on my pay- 
roll. Normally, we also hire guards for each barge, but they’re—’ 


“They’re off hunting, yes,” said Roran. “We'll provide guards as well.” 

The knob in Clovis’s tanned throat jumped as he swallowed. “That'd be 
more than reasonable... so it would. In addition to the crew’s wages, I 
charge a fee of two hundred crowns, plus recompense for any damage to 
the barges on account of your men, plus—as both owner and captain— 


twelve percent of the total profit from sale of the cargo.” 


“Our trip will have no profit.” 


384 


That, more than anything, seemed to unnerve Clovis. He rubbed the 
dimple in his chin with his left thumb, began to talk twice, stopped, then 
finally said, “If that be the case, another four hundred crowns upon com- 
pletion of the voyage. What—if I may make so bold as to inquire—do 
you wish to transport?” 

We frighten him, thought Roran. “Livestock.” 

“Be it sheep, cattle, horses, goats, oxen... ?” 

“Our herds contain an assortment of animals.” 


“And why do you want to take them to Teirm?” 


“We have our reasons.” Roran almost smiled at Clovis’s confusion. 
“Would you consider sailing past Teirm?” 


“No! Teirm’s my limit, it is. ] don’t know the waters beyond, nor would 
I want to be gone any longer from my wife and daughter.” 


“When could you be ready?” 

Clovis hesitated and executed two little steps. “Mayhap five or six days. 
No... no, you'd better make it a week; I have affairs that I must attend to 
before departing.” 

“We'd pay an additional ten crowns to leave day after tomorrow.” 

“J don’t—’” 


“Twelve crowns.” 


“Day after tomorrow it is,” vowed Clovis. “One way or another, I'll be 
ready by then.” 


Trailing his hand along the barge’s gunwale, Roran nodded without 
looking back at Clovis and said, “May I have a minute alone to confer 
with my associates?” 


“As you wish, sir. I'll just go for a turn about the docks until you're 
done.” Clovis hurried to the door. Just as he exited the shed, he asked, 
‘I’m sorry, but what’d be your name again? I fear I missed it earlier, an’ 
my memory can be something dreadful.” 


385 


“Stronghammer. My name is Stronghammer.” 
“Ah, of course. A good name, that.” 


When the door closed, Horst and Baldor converged on Roran. Baldor 
said, “We can’t afford to hire him.” 


“We can't afford not to,” replied Roran. “We don’t have the gold to buy 
the barges, nor do I fancy teaching myself to handle them when every- 
one’s lives depend on it. It'll be faster and safer to pay for a crew.” 


“It’s still too expensive,” said Horst. 


Roran drummed his fingers against the gunwale. “We can pay Clovis’s 
initial fee of two hundred crowns. Once we reach Teirm, though, I sug- 
gest that we either steal the barges using the skills we learn during the 
trip or incapacitate Clovis and his men until we can escape through other 
means. That way, we avoid paying the extra four hundred crowns, as 
well as the sailors’ wages.” 


“I don’t like cheating a man out of honest work,” said Horst. “It goes 
against my fiber.” 


“I don't like it either, but can you think of an alternative?” 
“How would you get everyone onto the barges?” 


“Have them meet Clovis a league or so down the coast, out of sight of 
Narda.” 


Horst sighed. “Very well, we'll do it, but it leaves a bad taste in my 
mouth. Call Clovis back in, Baldor, and we'll seal this pact.” 


That evening, the villagers gathered around a small banked fire in order 
to hear what had transpired in Narda. From where he knelt on the 
ground, Roran stared at the pulsing coals while he listened to Gertrude 
and the three brothers describe their separate adventures. The news 
about Roran’s and Eragon’s posters caused murmurs of unease among the 
audience. 


When Darmmen finished, Horst took his place and, with short, brisk 
sentences, related the lack of proper ships in Narda, how the dockworker 


386 


recommended Clovis, and the deal that was brokered thereafter. How- 
ever, the moment Horst mentioned the word barges, the villagers’ cries of 
ire and discontent blotted out his voice. 


Marching to the forefront of the group, Loring raised his arms for atten- 
tion. “Barges?” said the cobbler. “Barges? We don’t want no stinking 
barges!” He spat by his foot as people clamored with agreement. 


“Everyone, be quiet!” said Delwin. “We'll be heard if we keep this up.” 
When the crackling fire was the loudest noise, he continued at a slower 
pace: “I agree with Loring. Barges are unacceptable. They’re slow and vul- 
nerable. And we'd be crammed together with a complete lack of privacy 
and no shelter to speak of for who knows how long. Horst, Elain is six 
months pregnant. You can’t expect her and others who are sick and in- 
firm to sit under the blazing sun for weeks on end.” 


“We can lash tarpaulins over the holds,” replied Horst. “It’s not much, 
but it’ll shield us from the sun and the rain.” 


Birgit’s voice cut through the crowd’s low babble: “I have another con- 
cern.” People moved aside as she walked to the fire. “What with the two 
hundred crowns Clovis is due and the money Darmmen and his brothers 
spent, we've used up most of our coin. Unlike those in cities, our wealth 
lies not in gold but in animals and property. Our property is gone and 
few animals are left. Even if we turn pirate and steal these barges, how 
can we buy supplies at Teirm or passage farther south?” 


“The important thing,” rumbled Horst, “is to get to Teirm in the first 
place. Once we're there, then we can worry about what to do next... It’s 
possible that we may have to resort to more drastic measures.” 


Loring’s bony face crumpled into a mass of wrinkles. “Drastic? What do 
you mean, drastic? We've already done drastic. This whole venture is 
drastic. I don’t care what you say; I won't use those confounded barges, 
not after what we've gone through in the Spine. Barges are for grain and 
animals. What we want is a ship with cabins and bunks where we can 
sleep in comfort. Why not wait another week or so and see if a ship ar- 
rives that we can bargain passage on? Where’s the harm in that, eh? Or 
why not—” He continued to rail for over fifteen minutes, amassing a 
mountain of objections before ceding to Thane and Ridley, who built 
upon his arguments. 


The conversation halted as Roran unfolded his legs and rose to his full 
height, silencing the villagers through his presence. They waited, breath- 


387 


less, hoping for another of his visionary speeches. 
“It’s this or walk,” he said. 


Then he went to bed. 


388 


THE HAMMER FALLS 





The moon floated high among the stars when Roran left the makeshift 
tent he shared with Baldor, padded to the edge of the camp, and replaced 
Albriech on watch. 


“Nothing to report,” whispered Albriech, then slipped off. 


Roran strung his bow and planted three goose-feather arrows upright in 
the loam, within easy reach, then wrapped himself in a blanket and 
curled against the rockface to his left. His position afforded him a good 
view down and across the dark foothills. 


As was his habit, Roran divided the landscape into quadrants, examin- 
ing each one for a full minute, always alert for the flash of movement or 
the hint of light that might betray the approach of enemies. His mind 
soon began to wander, drifting from subject to subject with the hazy 
logic of dreams, distracting him from his task. He bit the inside of his 
cheek to force himself to concentrate. Staying awake was difficult in such 
mild weather... 


Roran was just glad that he had escaped drawing lots for the two 
watches preceding dawn, because they gave you no opportunity to catch 
up on lost sleep afterward and you felt tired for the rest of the day. 


A breath of wind ghosted past him, tickling his ear and making the skin 
on the back of his neck prickle with an apprehension of evil. The intru- 
sive touch frightened Roran, obliterating everything but the conviction 
that he and the rest of the villagers were in mortal danger. He quaked as 
if with the ague, his heart pounded, and he had to struggle to resist the 
urge to break cover and flee. 


What’s wrong with me? It required an effort for him to even nock an ar- 
row. 


To the east, a shadow detached itself from the horizon. Visible only as 
a void among the stars, it drifted like a torn veil across the sky until it 
covered the moon, where it remained, hovering. Illuminated from be- 
hind, Roran could see the translucent wings of one of the Ra’zac’s 
mounts. 


The black creature opened its beak and uttered a long, piercing shriek. 
Roran grimaced with pain at the cry’s pitch and frequency. It stabbed at 


389 


his eardrums, turned his blood to ice, and replaced hope and joy with de- 
spair. The ululation woke the entire forest. Birds and beasts for miles 
around exploded into a yammering chorus of panic, including, to Roran’s 
alarm, what remained of the villagers’ herds. 


Staggering from tree to tree, Roran returned to the camp, whispering, 
“The Ra’zac are here. Be quiet and stay where you are,” to everyone he 
encountered. He saw the other sentries moving among the frightened vil- 
lagers, spreading the same message. 


Fisk emerged from his tent with a spear in hand and roared, “Are we 
under attack? What’s set off those blasted—” Roran tackled the carpenter 
to silence him, uttering a muffled bellow as he landed on his right shoul- 
der and pained his old injury. 


“Ra’zac,” Roran groaned to Fisk. 
Fisk went still and in an undertone asked, “What should I do?” 
“Help me to calm the animals.” 


Together they picked their way through the camp to the adjacent 
meadow where the goats, sheep, donkeys, and horses were bedded. The 
farmers who owned the bulk of the herds slept with their charges and 
were already awake and working to soothe the beasts. Roran thanked his 
paranoia that he had insisted on having the animals scattered along the 
edge of the meadow, where the trees and brush helped to camouflage 
them from unfriendly eyes. 


As he tried to pacify a clump of sheep, Roran glanced up at the terrible 
black shadow that still obscured the moon, like a giant bat. To his horror, 
it began to move toward their hiding place. If that creature screams again, 
we're doomed. 


By the time the Ra’zac circled overhead, most of the animals had qui- 
eted, except for one donkey, who insisted upon loosing a grating hee-haw. 
Without hesitation, Roran dropped to one knee, fit arrow to string, and 
shot the ass between the ribs. His aim was true, and the animal dropped 
without a sound. 


He was too late, though; the braying had already alerted the Ra’zac. The 


monster swung its head in the direction of the clearing and descended 
toward it with outstretched claws, preceded by its fetid stench. 


39° 


Now the time has come to see if we can slay a nightmare, thought Roran. 
Fisk, who was crouched beside him in the grass, hefted his spear, prepar- 
ing to hurl it once the brute was in range. 


Just as Roran drew his bow—in an attempt to begin and end the battle 
with a well-placed shaft—he was distracted by a commotion in the for- 
est. 


A mass of deer burst through the underbrush and stampeded across the 
meadow, ignoring villagers and livestock alike in their frantic desire to 
escape the Ra’zac. For almost a minute, the deer bounded past Roran, 
mincing the loam with their sharp hooves and catching the moonlight 
with their white-rimmed eyes. They came so close, he heard the soft 
gasps of their labored breathing. 


The multitude of deer must have hidden the villagers because, after 
one last circuit over the meadow, the winged monster turned to the 
south and glided farther down the Spine, melding into the night. 


Roran and his companions remained frozen in place, like hunted rab- 
bits, afraid that the Ra’zac’s departure might be a ruse to flush them into 
the open or that the creature’s twin might be close behind. They waited 
for hours, tense and anxious, barely moving except to string a bow. 


When the moon was about to set, the Ra’zac’s bone-chilling shriek 
echoed far in the distance... then nothing. 


We were lucky, decided Roran when he woke the next morning. And 
we can't count on luck to save us the next time. 


After the Ra’zac’s appearance, none of the villagers objected to travel- 
ing by barge. On the contrary, they were so eager to be off, many of them 
asked Roran if it was possible to set sail that day instead of the next. 


“I wish we could,” he said, “but too much has to be done.” 


Forgoing breakfast, he, Horst, and a group of other men hiked into 
Narda. Roran knew that he risked being recognized by accompanying 
them, but their mission was too important for him to neglect. Besides, he 
was confident that his current appearance was different enough from his 
portrait on the Empire’s poster that no one would equate one with the 


391 


other. 


They had no difficulty gaining entrance, as a different set of soldiers 
guarded the town gate, whereupon they went to the docks and delivered 
the two hundred crowns to Clovis, who was busy overseeing a gang of 
men as they readied the barges for sea. 


“Thank’ee, Stronghammer,” he said, tying the bag of coins to his belt. 
“There be nothing like yellow gold to brighten a man’s day.” He led them 
to a worktable and unrolled a chart of the waters surrounding Narda, 
complete with notations on the strength of various currents; locations of 
rocks, sandbars, and other hazards; and decades’ worth of sounding meas- 
urements. Drawing a line with his finger from Narda to a small cove di- 
rectly south of it, Clovis said, “Here’s where we'll meet your livestock. 
The tides are gentle this time o’ year, but we still don’t want to fight 
them an’ no bones about it, so we'll have to be on our way directly after 


the high tide.” 


“High tide?” said Roran. “Wouldn't it be easier to wait until low tide 
and let it carry us out?” 


Clovis tapped his nose with a twinkle in his eye. “Aye, it would, an’ so 
I've begun many a cruise. What I don’t want, though, is to be slung up on 
the beach, loading your animals, when the tide comes a-rushing back in 
and pushes us farther inland. There be no danger of that this way, but 
we'll have to move smart so as we're not left high an’ dry when the wa- 
ters recede. Assuming we do, the sea’ll work for us, eh?” 


Roran nodded. He trusted Clovis’s experience. “And how many men 
will you need to fill out your crews?” 


“Well, I managed to dig up seven lads—strong, true, an’ good seamen 
all—who have agreed to this venture, odd as it is. Mind you, most of the 
boys were at the bottom of their tankards when I cornered them last 
night, drinking off the pay from their last voyage, but they'll be sober as 
spinsters come morn; that I promise you. Seeing as seven were all I could 
find, I'd like four more.” 


“Four it is,” said Roran. “My men don’t know much about sailing, but 
they're able-bodied and willing to learn.” 


Clovis grunted. “I usually take on a brace of new lads each trip anyway. 


So long as they follow orders, they'll do fine; otherwise, they'll get a be- 
laying pin upsides the head, mark my words. As for guards, I'd like to 


392 


have nine—three per boat. An’ they'd better not be as green as your sail- 
ors, or I won't budge from the dock, not for all the whisky in the world.” 


Roran allowed himself a grim smile. “Every man who rides with me has 
proved himself in battle many times over.” 


“An’ they all answer to you, eh, young Stronghammer?” said Clovis. He 
scratched his chin, eyeing Gedric, Delwin, and the others who were new 
to Narda. “How many are with you?” 


“Enough.” 


“Enough, you say. I wonder.” He waved a hand. “Never you mind me; 
my tongue runs a league before my own common sense, or so my father 
used to tell me. My first mate, Torson, is at the chandler’s now, oversee- 
ing the purchase of goods and equipment. I understand you have feed for 
your livestock?” 


“Among other things.” 


“Then you'd best fetch them. We can load them into the holds once 
the masts are up.” 


Throughout the rest of the morning and afternoon, Roran and the vil- 
lagers with him labored to ferry the supplies—which Loring’s sons had 
procured—from the warehouse where it was stored into the sheds with 
the barges. 


As Roran trudged across the gangplank to the Edeline and lowered his 
bag of flour to the sailor waiting in the hold, Clovis observed, “Most of 
this t’aint feed, Stronghammer.” 


“No,” said Roran. “But it’s needed.” He was pleased that Clovis had the 
sense not to inquire further. 


When the last item had been stored away, Clovis beckoned to Roran. 
“You might as well go. Me and the boys will handle the rest. Just you 


remember to be at the docks three hours after dawn with every man jack 
you promised me, or we'll lose the tide.” 


“We'll be there.” 


a8 


Back in the foothills, Roran helped Elain and the others prepare for de- 
parture. It did not take long, as they were accustomed to breaking camp 
each morning. Then he picked twelve men to accompany him to Narda 
the next day. They were all good fighters, but he asked the best, like 
Horst and Delwin, to remain with the rest of the villagers in case soldiers 
found them or the Ra’zac returned. 


Once night fell, the two groups parted. Roran crouched on a boulder 
and watched Horst lead the column of people down through the foothills 
toward the cove where they would wait for the barges. 


Orval came up beside him and crossed his arms. “Do you think they'll 
be safe, Stronghammer?” Anxiety ran through his voice like a taut bow- 
string. 


Though he too was worried, Roran said, “I do. I’d bet you a barrel of ci- 
der that they'll still be asleep when we put ashore tomorrow. You can 
have the pleasure of waking up Nolla. How does that sound?” Orval 
smiled at the mention of his wife and nodded, appearing reassured. 


I hope I’m right. Roran remained on the boulder, hunched like a bleak 
gargoyle, until the dark line of villagers vanished from his sight. 


They woke an hour before sunrise, when the sky had just begun to 
brighten with pale green and the damp night air numbed their fingers. 
Roran splashed his face with water and then outfitted himself with his 
bow and quiver, his ever-present hammer, one of Fisk’s shields, and one 
of Horst’s spears. The others did likewise, with the addition of swords 
obtained during the skirmishes in Carvahall. 


Running as fast as they dared down the hummocky hills, the thirteen 
men soon arrived at the road to Narda and, shortly after that, the town’s 
main gate. To Roran’s dismay, the same two soldiers who had troubled 
them earlier stood guard by the entrance. As before, the soldiers lowered 
their poleaxes to block the way. 


“There be quite a bit more of you this time,” observed the white-haired 
man. “And not all the same ones either. Except for you.” He focused on 
Roran. “I suppose you expect me to believe that the spear and shield be 
for pottery as well?” 


394 


“No. We've been hired by Clovis to protect his barges from attack on 
the way to Teirm.” 


“You? Mercenaries?” The soldiers burst out laughing. “You said you 
were tradesmen.” 


“This pays better.” 


The white-haired man scowled. “You lie. I tried my hand at being a 
gentleman of fortune once. I spent more nights hungry than not. How 
large be your company of tradesmen anyway? Seven yesterday and twelve 
today—thirteen counting you. It seems too large for an expedition from a 
bunch of shopkeepers.” His eyes narrowed as he scrutinized Roran’s face. 
“You look familiar. What'd be your name, eh?” 


“Stronghammer.” 
“It wouldn't happen to be Roran, would—’ 


Roran jabbed forward with his spear, catching the white-haired soldier 
in the throat. Scarlet blood fountained. Releasing the spear, Roran drew 
his hammer and twisted round as he blocked the second soldier’s poleax 
with his shield. Swinging his hammer up and around, Roran crushed the 
man’s helm. 


He stood panting between the two corpses. Now I have killed ten. 


Orval and the other men stared at Roran with shock. Unable to bear 
their gazes, Roran turned his back on them and gestured at the culvert 
that ran beneath the road. “Hide the bodies before anyone sees,” he or- 
dered, brusque and harsh. As they hurried to obey, he examined the 
parapet on top of the wall for sentries. Fortunately, no one was visible 
there or in the street through the gate. He bent and pulled his spear free, 
wiping the blade clean on a tuft of grass. 


“Done,” said Mandel, clambering out of the ditch. Despite his beard, the 
young man appeared pale. 


Roran nodded and, steeling himself, faced his band. “Listen. We will 
walk to the docks at a quick but reasonable pace. We will not run. When 
the alarm is sounded—and someone may have heard the clash just 
now—act surprised and interested but not afraid. Whatever you do, give 
people no reason to suspect us. The lives of your families and friends de- 
pend on it. If we are attacked, your only duty is to see the barges 


395 


launched. Nothing else matters. Am I clear?” 
“Aye, Stronghammer,” they answered. 
“Then follow me.” 


As he strode through Narda, Roran felt so tense, he feared he might 
snap and explode into a thousand pieces. What have I made of myself? he 
wondered. He glanced from man to woman, child to man, man to dog in 
an effort to identify potential enemies. Everything around him appeared 
unnaturally bright and filled with detail; it seemed as if he could see the 
individual threads in people’s clothing. 


They reached the docks without incident, whereupon Clovis said, “You 
be early, Stronghammer. I like that in a man. It'll give us the opportunity 
to put things nice an’ shipshape before we head out.” 


“Can we leave now?” asked Roran. 


“You should know better'n that. Have to wait till the tide’s finished 
coming in, so we do.” Clovis paused then, taking his first good look at the 
thirteen of them, and said, “Why, what'd be the matter, Stronghammer? 
The lot of you look as if you saw the ghost of old Galbatorix himself.” 


“Nothing a few hours of sea air won't cure,” said Roran. In his current 
state, he could not smile, but he did let his features assume a more pleas- 
ant expression in order to reassure the captain. 


With a whistle, Clovis summoned two sailors from the boats. Both 
men were tanned the color of hazelnuts. “This’d be Torson, my first 
mate,” said Clovis, indicating the man to his right. Torson’s bare shoulder 
was decorated with a coiled tattoo of a flying dragon. “He'll be skipper of 
the Merrybell. And this black dog is Flint. He’s in command of the Ede- 
line. While you are on board, their word is law, as is mine on the Red 
Boar. You'll answer to them and me, not Stronghammer.... Well, give me 
a proper aye, aye if you heard me.” 


“Aye, aye,” said the men. 


“Now, which of you be my hands and which be my men-at-arms? For 
the life of me, I can’t tell you apart.” 


Ignoring Clovis’s admonishment that he was their commander, not Ro- 
ran, the villagers looked at Roran to see if they should obey. He nodded 


396 


his approval, and they divided into two factions, which Clovis proceeded 
to partition into even smaller groups as he assigned a certain number of 
villagers to each barge. 


For the next half hour, Roran worked alongside the sailors to finish 
preparing the Red Boar for departure, ears open for the first hint of alarm. 
We’re going to be captured or killed if we stay much longer, he thought, 
checking the height of the water against the piers. He mopped sweat 
from his brow. 


Roran started as Clovis gripped his forearm. 


Before he could stop himself, Roran pulled his hammer halfway out of 
his belt. The thick air clogged his throat. 


Clovis raised an eyebrow at his reaction. “I’ve been watching you, 
Stronghammer, and I'd be interested to know how you won such loyalty 
from your men. I’ve served with more captains than I care to recall, an’ 
not one commanded the level of obedience you do without raising his 


pipes.” 


Roran could not help it; he laughed. “I'll tell you how I did it; I saved 
them from slavery and from being eaten.” 


Clovis’s eyebrows rose almost to his hairline. “Did you now? There's a 
story I'd like to hear.” 


“No, you wouldn't.” 


After a minute, Clovis said, “No, maybe I wouldn't at that.” He glanced 
overboard. “Why, I'll be hanged. I do believe we can be on our way. Ah, 
and here’s my little Galina, punctual as ever.” 


The burly man sprang onto the gangplank and, from there, onto the 
docks, where he embraced a dark-haired girl of perhaps thirteen and a 
woman who Roran guessed was her mother. Clovis ruffled the girl’s hair 
and said, “Now, you'll be good while I’m gone, won’t you, Galina?” 


“Yes, Father.” 


As he watched Clovis bid his family farewell, Roran thought of the two 
soldiers dead by the gate. They might have had families as well. Wives and 
children who loved them and a home they returned to each day... He tasted 
bile and had to wrench his thoughts back to the pier to avoid being sick. 


397 


On the barges, the men appeared anxious. Afraid that they might lose 
their nerve, Roran made a show of walking about the deck, stretching, 
and doing whatever he could to seem relaxed. At last Clovis jumped 
back onto the Red Boar and cried, “Cast off, me lads! It’s the briny deep 
for us.” 


In short order, the gangplanks were pulled aboard, the mooring ropes 
untied, and the sails raised on the three barges. The air rang with shouted 
orders and chants of heave-ho as the sailors pulled on ropes. 


Behind them, Galina and her mother remained watching as the barges 
drew away, still and silent, hooded and grave. 


“We're lucky, Stronghammer,” said Clovis, clapping him on the shoul- 
der. “We've a bit 0’ wind to push us along today. We may not have to 
row in order to reach the cove before the tide changes, eh!” 


When the Red Boar was in the middle of Narda’s bay and still ten min- 
utes from the freedom of the open sea, that which Roran dreaded oc- 
curred: the sound of bells and trumpets floated across the water from 
among the stone buildings. 


“What’s that?” he asked. 


“I don’t rightly know,” said Clovis. He frowned as he stared at the town, 
his hands planted on his hips. “It could be a fire, but no smoke is in the 
air. Maybe some Urgals were discovered in the area...” Concern grew 
upon his face. “Did you perchance spy anyone on the road this morning?” 


Roran shook his head, not trusting himself to speak. 

Flint drew alongside them and shouted from the deck of the Edeline, 
“Should we turn back, sir?” Roran gripped the gunwale so hard that he 
drove splinters under his nails, ready to intercede but afraid to appear too 


anxious. 


Tearing his gaze from Narda, Clovis bellowed in return, “No. We'd 
miss the tide then.” 


“Aye, aye, sir! But I’d give a day’s pay to find out what caused that 
clamor.” 


“So would I,” muttered Clovis. 


398 


As the houses and buildings shrank behind them, Roran crouched at 
the rear port of the barge, wrapped his arms around his knees, and leaned 
against the cabins. He looked at the sky, struck by its depth, clarity, and 
color, then into the Red Boar’s roiling green wake, where ribbons of sea- 
weed fluttered. The pitch of the barge lulled him like the rock of a cra- 
dle. What a beautiful day it is, he thought, grateful he was there to ob- 
serve it. 


After they escaped the cove—to his relief—Roran climbed the ladder 
to the poop deck behind the cabins, where Clovis stood with his hand on 
the tiller, guiding their course. The captain said, “Ah, there’s something 
exhilarating about the first day of a voyage, before you realize how bad 
the food is an’ start longing for home.” 


Mindful of his need to learn what he could about the barge, Roran 
asked Clovis the names and functions of various objects on board, at 
which point he was treated to an enthusiastic lecture on the workings of 
barges, ships, and the art of sailing in general. 


Two hours later, Clovis pointed at a narrow peninsula that lay before 
them. “The cove be on the far side of that.” Roran straightened off the 
railing and craned his neck, eager to confirm that the villagers were safe. 


As the Red Boar rounded the rocky spit of land, a white beach was re- 
vealed at the apex of the cove, upon which were assembled the refugees 
from Palancar Valley. The crowd cheered and waved as the barges 
emerged from behind the rocks. 


Roran relaxed. 


Beside him, Clovis uttered a dreadful oath. “I knew something were 
amiss the moment I clapped eyes upon you, Stronghammer. Livestock 
indeed. Bah! You played me like a fool, you did.” 


“You wrong me,” replied Roran. “I did not lie; this is my flock and I am 
their shepherd. Is it not within my right to call them ‘livestock’ if I 
want?” 


“Call them what you will, I didn’t agree to haul people to Teirm. Why 
you didn’t tell me the true nature of your cargo, I might wonder, an’ the 
only answer on the horizon is that whatever venture you're engaged in 
means trouble... trouble for you an’ trouble for me. I should toss the lot 
of you overboard an’ return to Narda.” 


399 


“But you won't,” said Roran, deadly quiet. 
“Oh? An’ why not?” 


“Because I need these barges, Clovis, and I'll do anything to keep them. 
Anything. Honor our bargain and you'll have a peaceful trip and you'll get 
to see Galina again. If not...” The threat sounded worse than it was; Roran 
had no intention of killing Clovis, though if he had to, he would abandon 
him somewhere along the coast. 


Clovis’s face reddened, but he surprised Roran by grunting and saying, 
“Fair enough, Stronghammer.” Pleased with himself, Roran returned his 
attention to the beach. 


Behind him, he heard a snick. 


Acting on instinct, Roran recoiled, crouching, twisting, and covering his 
head with his shield. His arm vibrated as a belaying pin broke across the 
shield. He lowered the shield and gazed at a dismayed Clovis, who re- 
treated across the deck. 


Roran shook his head, never taking his eyes off his opponent. “You 
can’t defeat me, Clovis. I'll ask you again: Will you honor our bargain? If 
you don't, I'll put you ashore, commandeer the barges, and press your 
crew into service. I don’t want to ruin your livelihood, but I will if you 
force me.... Come now. This can be a normal, uneventful voyage if you 
choose to help us. Remember, you've already been paid.” 


Drawing himself up with great dignity, Clovis said, “If I agree, then you 
must do me the courtesy of explaining why this ruse were necessary, an’ 
why these people are here an’ where they’re from. No matter how much 
gold you offer me, I won't assist an undertaking that contradicts my prin- 
ciples; no, I won't. Are you bandits? Or do you serve the blasted king?” 

“The knowledge may place you in greater danger.” 

“T insist.” 

“Have you heard of Carvahall in Palancar Valley?” asked Roran. 


Clovis waved a hand. “Once or twice. What of it?” 


“You see it now on the beach. Galbatorix’s soldiers attacked us without 


400 


provocation. We fought back and, when our position became untenable, 
we crossed the Spine and followed the coast to Narda. Galbatorix has 
promised that every man, woman, and child from Carvahall will be killed 
or enslaved. Reaching Surda is our only hope of survival.” Roran left out 
mention of the Ra’zac; he did not want to frighten Clovis too badly. 


The weathered seaman had gone gray. “Are you still pursued?” 
“Aye, but the Empire has yet to discover us.” 
“An’ are you why the alarm was sounded?” 


Very softly, Roran said, “I killed two soldiers who recognized me.” The 
revelation startled Clovis: his eyes widened, he stepped back, and the 
muscles in his forearms rippled as he clenched his fists. “Make your 
choice, Clovis; the shore draws near.” 


He knew he had won when the captain’s shoulders drooped and the 
bravado faded from his bearing. “Ah, the plague take you, Stronghammer. 
I'm no friend of the king; I'll get you to Teirm. But then I want nothing 
more to do with you.” 


“Will you give me your word that you won't attempt to slip away in 
the night or any similar deception?” 


“Aye. You have it.” 


Sand and rocks grated across the bottom of the Red Boar’s hull as the 
barge drove itself up onto the beach, followed on either side by its two 
companions. The relentless, rhythmic surge of water dashing itself against 
the land sounded like the breathing of a gigantic monster. Once the sails 
were furled and the gangplanks extended, Torson and Flint both strode 
over to the Red Boar and accosted Clovis, demanding to know what was 
going on. 


“There’s been a change of plans,” said Clovis. 


Roran left him to explain the situation—skirting the exact reasons why 
the villagers left Palancar Valley—and jumped onto the sand, whereupon 
he set out to find Horst among the milling knots of people. When he 
spotted the smith, Roran pulled him aside and told him about the deaths 
in Narda. “If it’s discovered that I left with Clovis, they may send soldiers 
on horses after us. We have to get everyone onto the barges as fast as 
possible.” 


401 


Horst met his eye for a long minute. “You’ve become a hard man, Ro- 
ran, harder than I'll ever be.” 


“‘T’ve had to.” 


“Mind that you don’t forget who you are.” 


Roran spent the next three hours moving and packing the villagers’ be- 
longings in the Red Boar until Clovis expressed his satisfaction. The bun- 
dles had to be secured so that they would not shift unexpectedly and in- 
jure someone, as well as distributed so that the barge rode level in the 
water, which was no easy task as the bundles were of irregular size and 
density. Then the animals were coaxed on board much to their displeas- 
ure—and immobilized by tethers lashed to iron rings in the hold. 


Last of all came the people, who, like the rest of the cargo, had to be 
organized into a symmetrical pattern within the barge to keep from cap- 
sizing it. Clovis, Torson, and Flint each ended up standing at the fore of 
their barges, shouting directions to the mass of villagers below. 


What now? thought Roran as he heard an argument break out on the 
beach. Pushing his way to the source of the disturbance, he saw Calitha 
kneeling beside her stepfather, Wayland, trying to calm the old man. 


“No! I won't go on that beast ! You can’t make me,” cried Wayland. He 
thrashed his withered arms and beat his heels in an attempt to free him- 
self from Calitha’s embrace. Spittle flew from his lips. “Let me go, I say. 
Let me go!” 


Wincing from his blows, Calitha said, “He’s been unreasonable ever 
since we made camp last night.” 


It would have been better for all concerned if he had died in the Spine, 
what with the trouble he’s caused, thought Roran. He joined Calitha, and 
together they managed to soothe Wayland so that he no longer screamed 
and hit. As a reward for his good behavior, Calitha gave him a piece of 
jerky, which occupied his entire attention. While Wayland concentrated 
on gumming the meat, she and Roran were able to guide him onto the 
Edeline and get him settled in a deserted corner where he would not be a 
nuisance. 


402 


“Move your backsides, you lubbers,” shouted Clovis. “The tide’s about 
to turn. Hop to, hop to.” 


After a final flurry of activity, the gangplanks were withdrawn, leaving 
a cluster of twenty men standing on the beach before each barge. The 
three groups gathered around the prows and prepared to push them back 
into the water. 


Roran led the effort on the Red Boar. Chanting in unison, he and his 
men strained against the weight of the huge barge, the gray sand giving 
beneath their feet, the timbers and cables creaking, and the smell of 


sweat in the air. For a moment, their efforts seemed to be in vain, then 
the Red Boar lurched and slid back a foot. 


“Again!” shouted Roran. Foot by foot, they advanced into the sea, until 
the frigid water surged about their waists. A breaker crashed over Roran, 
filling his mouth with seawater, which he spat out vigorously, disgusted 
by the taste of salt; it was far more intense than he expected. 


When the barge lifted free of the seabed, Roran swam alongside the 
Red Boar and pulled himself up with one of the ropes draped over the 
gunwale. Meanwhile, the sailors deployed long poles that they used to 
propel the Red Boar into ever deeper water, as did the crews of the Mer- 
rybell and Edeline. 


The instant they were a reasonable distance from shore, Clovis ordered 
the poles stowed away and oars broken out, with which the sailors aimed 
the Red Boar's prow toward the cove’s entrance. They hoisted the sail, 
aligned it to catch the light wind, and, at the vanguard of the trio of 
barges, set forth for Teirm upon the uncertain expanse of the bounding 
main. 


403 


THE BEGINNING OF WISDOM 





The days Eragon spent in Ellesméra blended together without distinc- 
tion; time seemed to have no hold in the pinewood city. The season aged 
not, even as the afternoons and evenings lengthened, barring the forest 
with rich shadows. Flowers of all months bloomed at the urging of the 
elves’ magic, nourished by the enchantments spun through the air. 


Eragon came to love Ellesméra with its beauty and its quiet, the grace- 
ful buildings that flowed out of the trees, the haunting songs that echoed 
at twilight, the works of art hidden within the mysterious dwellings, and 
the introspection of the elves themselves, which they mixed with out- 
bursts of merriment. 


The wild animals of Du Weldenvarden had no fear of hunters. Often 
Eragon would look from his eyrie to see an elf petting a stag or a gray fox 
or murmuring to a shy bear that trundled along the edge of a clearing, re- 
luctant to expose himself. Some animals had no recognizable form. They 
appeared at night, moving and grunting in the bushes and fleeing if Er- 
agon dared approach. Once he glimpsed a creature like a furred snake and 
once a white-robed woman whose body wavered and disappeared to re- 
veal a grinning she-wolf in her place. 


Eragon and Saphira continued to explore Ellesméra when they had the 
chance. They went alone or with Orik, for Arya no longer accompanied 
them, nor had Eragon spoken to her since she broke his fairth. He saw 
her now and then, flitting between the trees, but whenever he ap- 
proached—intending to apologize—she withdrew, leaving him alone 
among the ancient pines. At last Eragon realized that he had to take the 
initiative if he were to ever have a chance of mending his relationship 
with her. So one evening, he picked a bouquet from the flowers along the 
path by his tree and hobbled to Tialdari Hall, where he asked directions 
to Arya’s quarters from an elf in the common room. 


The screen door was open when he reached her chambers. No one an- 
swered when he knocked. He stepped inside, listening for approaching 
footsteps as he glanced around the spacious vine-covered living room, 
which opened to a small bedroom on one side and a study on the other. 
Two fairths decorated the walls: a portrait of a stern, proud elf with sil- 
ver hair, who Eragon guessed was King Evandar, and that of a younger 
male elf whom he did not recognize. 


Eragon wandered through the apartment, looking but not touching, sa- 


404 


voring his glimpse into Arya’s life, gleaning what he could about her in- 
terests and hobbies. By her bed, he saw a glass sphere with a preserved 
blossom of the black morning glory embedded within it; on her desk, 
neat rows of scrolls with titles like Osilon: Harvest Report and Activity 
Noted by Gil’ead Watchtower; on the sill of an open bay window, three 
miniature trees grown in the shape of glyphs from the ancient language, 
the glyphs for peace, strength, and wisdom ; and by the trees, a scrap of 
paper with an unfinished poem, covered with crossed-out words and 
scribbled marks. It read: 

Under the moon, the bright white moon, 

Lies a pool, a flat silver pool, 


Among the brakes and brambles, 


And black-heart pines. 


Falls a stone, a living stone, 
Cracks the moon, the bright white moon, 
Among the brakes and brambles, 


And black-heart pines. 


Shards of light, swords of light, 
Ripple ’cross the pool, 
The quiet mere, the still tarn, 


The lonely lake there. 


In the night, the dark and heavy night, 
Flutter shadows, confused shadows, 


Where once... 


405 


Going to the small table by the entrance, Eragon laid his bouquet upon 
it and turned to leave. He froze as he saw Arya standing in the doorway. 
She looked startled by his presence, then concealed her emotions behind 
an impassive expression. 


They stared at each other in silence. 


He lifted the bouquet, half offering it to her. “I don’t know how to 


make a blossom for you, like Faolin did, but these are honest flowers and 
the best I could find.” 


“I cannot accept them, Eragon.” 


“They're not... they’re not that sort of gift.” He paused. “It’s no excuse, 
but I didn’t realize beforehand that my fairth would put you in such a 
difficult situation. For that, I’m sorry, and I cry your pardon.... 1 was just 
trying to make a fairth, not cause trouble. I understand the importance of 
my studies, Arya, and you needn't fear I will neglect them in order to 
moon after you.” He swayed and leaned against the wall, too dizzy to re- 
main on his feet without support. “That’s all.” 


She regarded him for a long moment, then slowly reached out and took 
the bouquet, which she held beneath her nose. Her eyes never left his. 
“They are honest flowers,” she conceded. Her gaze flickered down to his 
feet and back up again. “Have you been ill?” 


“No. My back.” 


“I had heard, but I did not think...” 


He pushed himself away from the wall. “I should go.” 


“Wait.” Arya hesitated, then guided him to the bay window, where he 
sat on the padded bench that curved from the wall. Removing two gob- 
lets from a cupboard, Arya crumbled dried nettle leaves into them, then 
filled the goblets with water and—saying “Boil’—heated the water for 
tea. 


She gave a goblet to Eragon, who held it with both hands so the 
warmth seeped into him. He glanced out the window to the ground 
twenty feet below, where elves walked among the royal gardens, talking 
and singing, and fireflies floated through the dusky air. 


406 


“I wish...” said Eragon, “I wish it could always be like this. It’s so perfect 
and quiet.” 


Arya stirred her tea. “How fares Saphira?” 

“The same. And you?” 

“I have been preparing to return to the Varden.” 
Alarm shot through him. “When?” 


“After the Blood-oath Celebration. I have tarried here far too long as it 
is, but I have been loath to leave and Islanzadi wished me to stay. Also... I 
have never attended a Blood-oath Celebration and it is the most impor- 
tant of our observances.” She considered him over the rim of her goblet. 
“Is there nothing Oromis can do for you?” 


Eragon forced a weary shrug. “He tried everything he knows.” 


They sipped their tea and watched the groups and couples meander 
along the garden paths. “Your studies go well, though?” she asked. 


“They do.” In the lull that followed, Eragon picked up the scrap of pa- 
per from between the trees and examined her stanzas, as if reading them 
for the first time. “Do you often write poetry?” 


Arya extended her hand for the paper and, when he gave it to her, 
rolled it into a tube so that the words were no longer visible. “It is cus- 
tom that everyone who attends the Blood-oath Celebration should bring 
a poem, a song, or some other piece of art that they have made and share 
it with those assembled. I have but begun to work on mine.” 


“I think it’s quite good.” 
“If you had read much poetry—’ 
“T have.” 


Arya paused, then dipped her head and said, “Forgive me. You are not 
the person I first met in Gil’ead.” 


“No. I...” He stopped and twisted the goblet between his hands while 


he searched for the right words. “Arya... you'll be leaving soon enough. | 
would count it a shame if this is the last I see of you between now and 


407 


then. Could we not meet occasionally, as we did before, and you could 
show Saphira and me more of Ellesméra?” 


“It would not be wise,” she said in a gentle but firm voice. 


He looked up at her. “Must the price of my indiscretion be our friend- 
ship? I cannot help how I feel toward you, but I would rather suffer an- 
other wound from Durza than allow my foolishness to destroy the com- 
panionship that existed between us. I value it too highly.” 


Lifting her goblet, Arya finished the last of her tea before responding. 
“Our friendship shall endure, Eragon. As for us spending time together...” 
Her lips curved with a hint of a smile. “Perhaps. However, we shall have 
to wait and see what the future brings, for I am busy and can promise 
nothing.” 


He knew her words were the closest thing to a conciliation he was 
likely to receive, and he was grateful for them. “Of course, Arya Svit- 


kona,” he said, and bowed his head. 


They exchanged a few more pleasantries, but it was clear that Arya had 
gone as far as she was willing to go that day, so Eragon returned to 
Saphira, his hope restored by what he had accomplished. Now it’s up to 
fate to decide the outcome, he thought as he settled before Oromis’s latest 
scroll. 


Reaching into the pouch at his belt, Eragon withdrew a soapstone con- 
tainer of nalgask—beeswax melted with hazelnut oil—and smeared it 
over his lips to protect them against the cold wind that scoured his face. 
He closed the pouch, then wrapped his arms around Saphira’s neck and 
buried his face in the crook of his elbow to reduce the glare from the 
wimpled clouds beneath them. The tireless beat of Saphira’s wings domi- 
nated his hearing, higher and faster than that of Glaedr’s, whom she fol- 
lowed. 


They flew southwest from dawn until early afternoon, often pausing 
for enthusiastic sparring bouts between Saphira and Glaedr, during which 
Eragon had to strap his arms onto the saddle to prevent himself from be- 
ing thrown off by the stomach-turning acrobatics. He then would free 
himself by pulling on slipknots with his teeth. 


The trip ended at a cluster of four mountains that towered over the 


408 


forest, the first mountains Eragon had seen in Du Weldenvarden. White- 
capped and windswept, they pierced the veil of clouds and bared their 
crevassed brows to the beating sun, which was heatless at such altitude. 


They look so small compared to the Beors, said Saphira. 


As had become his habit during weeks of meditation, Eragon extended 
his mind in every direction, touching upon the consciousnesses around 
him in search of any who might mean him harm. He felt a marmot warm 
in her burrow, ravens, nuthatches, and hawks, numerous squirrels run- 
ning among the trees, and, farther down the mountain, rock snakes undu- 
lating through the brush in search of the mice that were their prey, as 
well as the hordes of ubiquitous insects. 


When Glaedr descended to a bare ridge on the first mountain, Saphira 
had to wait until he folded his massive wings before there was enough 
room for her to land. The field of boulder-strewn talus they alighted 
upon was brilliant yellow from a coating of hard, crenulated lichen. 
Above them loomed a sheer black cliff. It acted as buttress and dam for a 
cornice of blue ice that groaned and split under the wind, loosing jagged 
slabs that shattered on the granite below. 


This peak is known as Fionula, said Glaedr. And her brothers are 
Ethrundr, Merogoven, and Griminsmal. Each has its own tale, which I shall 
recount on the flight back. But for now, I shall address the purpose of this 
trip, namely the nature of the bond forged between dragons and elves and, 
later, humans. You both know something of it—and I have hinted at its full 
implications to Saphira—but the time has come to learn the solemn and pro- 
found meaning of your partnership so that you may uphold it when Oromis 
and I are no more. 


“Master?” asked Eragon, wrapping his cloak around himself to stay 
warm. 


Yes, Eragon. 

“Why is Oromis not here with us?” 

Because, rumbled Glaedr, it is my duty—as was always the duty of an 
elder dragon in centuries past—to ensure that the newest generation of Rid- 
ers understands the true importance of the station they have assumed. And 


because Oromis is not as well as he appears. 


The rocks cracked with muffled reports as Glaedr coiled up, nestling 


409 


himself among the scree and placing his majestic head upon the ground 
lengthwise to Eragon and Saphira. He examined them with one gold eye 
as large as a polished roundshield and twice as brilliant. A gray smudge of 
smoke drifted from his nostrils and was blown to tatters by the wind. 
Parts of what I am about to reveal were common knowledge among the 
elves, Riders, and learned humans, but much of it was known only to the 
leader of the Riders, a mere handful of elves, the humans’ current potentate, 
and, of course, the dragons. 


Listen now, my hatchlings. When peace was made between dragons and 
elves at the end of our war, the Riders were created to ensure that such con- 
flict would never again arise between our two races. Queen Tarmunora of 
the elves and the dragon who had been selected to represent us, whose 
name—he paused and conveyed a series of impressions to Eragon: long 
tooth, white tooth, chipped tooth; fights won, fights lost; countless eaten 
Shrrg and Nagra; seven-and-twenty eggs sired and nineteen offspring 
grown to maturity—cannot be expressed in any language, decided that a 
common treaty would not suffice. Signed paper means nothing to a dragon. 
Our blood runs hot and thick and, given enough time, it was inevitable that 
we would clash with the elves again, as we had with the dwarves over the 
millennia. But unlike with the dwarves, neither we nor the elves could af- 
ford another war. We were both too powerful, and we would have destroyed 
each other. The one way to prevent that and to forge a meaningful accord 
was to link our two races with magic. 


Eragon shivered, and with a touch of amusement, Glaedr said, Saphira, 
if you are wise, you will heat one of these rocks with the fire from your belly 
so that your Rider does not freeze. 


Thereupon Saphira arched her neck, and a jet of blue flame emanated 
from between her serrated fangs and splashed against the scree, blacken- 
ing the lichen, which released a bitter smell as it burned. The air grew so 
hot that Eragon was forced to turn away. He felt the insects underneath 
the rocks being crisped in the inferno. After a minute, Saphira clapped 
shut her jaws, leaving a circle of stones five feet across glowing cherry 


red. 


Thank you, Eragon said to her. He hunched by the edge of the scorched 
rocks and warmed his hands over them. 


Remember, Saphira, to use your tongue to direct the stream, admonished 
Glaedr. Now... it took nine years for the elves’ wisest magicians to devise the 
needed spell. When they had, they and the dragons gathered together at 
Ilirea. The elves provided the structure of the enchantment, the dragons pro- 


410 


vided the strength, and together they melded the souls of elves and dragons. 


The joining changed us. We dragons gained the use of language and other 
trappings of civilization, while the elves shared in our longevity, since before 
that moment, their lives were as short as humans’. In the end, the elves were 
the most affected. Our magic, dragons’ magic—which permeates every fiber 
of our being—was transmitted to the elves and, in time, gave them their 
much-vaunted strength and grace. Humans have never been influenced as 
strongly, since you were added to the spell after its completion and it has not 
had as much time to work upon you as with the elves. Still—and here 
Glaedr’s eye gleamed—it has already gentled your race from the rough 
barbarians who first landed in Alagaésia, though you have begun to regress 
since the Fall. 


“Were dwarves ever part of this spell?” asked Eragon. 


No, and that is why there has never been a dwarf Rider. They do not care 
for dragons, nor we for them, and they found the idea of being joined with 
us repellent. Perhaps it is fortunate that they did not enter into our pact, for 
they have escaped the decline of humans and elves. 


Decline, Master? queried Saphira in what Eragon would have sworn 
was a teasing tone of voice. 


Aye, decline. If one or another of our three races suffer, so do they all. By 
killing dragons, Galbatorix harmed his own race as well as the elves. The 
two of you have not seen this, for you are new to Ellesméra, but the elves are 
on the wane; their power is not what it once was. And humans have lost 
much of their culture and been consumed by chaos and corruption. Only by 
righting the imbalance between our three races shall order return to the 
world. 


The old dragon kneaded the scree with his talons, crumbling it into 
gravel so that he was more comfortable. Layered within the enchantment 
Queen Tarmunora oversaw was the mechanism that allows a hatchling to 
be linked with his or her Rider. When a dragon decides to give an egg to the 
Riders, certain words are said over the egg—which I shall teach you later— 
that prevent the dragon inside from hatching until it is brought into contact 
with the person with whom it decides to bond. As dragons can remain in 
their eggs indefinitely, time is of no concern, nor is the infant harmed. You 
yourself are an example of this, Saphira. 


The bond that forms between a Rider and dragon is but an enhanced ver- 
sion of the bond that already exists between our races. The human or elf be- 


411 


comes stronger and fairer, while some of the dragon’s fiercer traits are tem- 
pered by a more reasoned outlook.... I see a thought biting at your tongue, 
Eragon. What is it? 


“It’s just...” He hesitated. “I have a hard time imagining you or Saphira 
being any fiercer. Not,” he added anxiously, “that that’s a bad thing.” 


The ground shook as if with an avalanche as Glaedr chuckled, rolling 
his great big staring eye behind its horny lid and back again. If ever you 
met an unbonded dragon, you would not say so. A dragon alone answers to 
no one and no thing, takes whatever pleases it, and bears no thought of 
kindness for aught but its kith and kin. Fierce and proud were the wild 
dragons, even arrogant.... The females were so formidable, it was accounted 
a great accomplishment among the Riders’ dragons to mate with one. 


The lack of this bond is why Galbatorix’s partnership with Shruikan, his 
second dragon, is such a perverted union. Shruikan did not choose Galba- 
torix as his partner; he was twisted by certain black magics into serving 
Galbatorix’s madness. Galbatorix has constructed a depraved imitation of 
the relationship that you, Eragon, and you, Saphira, possess and that he lost 
when the Urgals murdered his original dragon. 


Glaedr paused and looked between the two of them. His eye was all 
that moved. That which links you exceeds any simple connection between 
minds. Your very souls, your identities—call it what you will—have been 
welded on a primal level. His eye flicked to Eragon. Do you believe that a 
person's soul is separate from his body? 


“I don’t know,” said Eragon. “Saphira once took me out of my body and 
let me see the world through her eyes.... It seemed like I was no longer 
connected to my body. And if the wraiths that a sorcerer calls upon can 
exist, then maybe our consciousness is independent of flesh as well.” 


Extending the needle-sharp tip of his foreclaw, Glaedr flipped over a 
rock to expose a woodrat cowering in its nest. He snapped up the rat 
with a flash of his red tongue; Eragon winced as he felt the animal’s life 
extinguished. 

When the flesh is destroyed, so is the soul, said Glaedr. 


“But an animal isn’t a person,” protested Eragon. 


After your meditations, do you truly believe that any of us are so different 
from a woodrat? That we are gifted with a miraculous quality that other 


412 


creatures do not enjoy and that somehow preserves our beings after death? 
“No,” muttered Eragon. 


I thought not. Because we are so closely joined, when a dragon or Rider is 
injured, they must harden their hearts and sever the connection between 
them in order to protect each other from unnecessary suffering, even insan- 
ity. And since the soul cannot be torn from the flesh, you must resist the 
temptation to try to take your partner’s soul into your own body and shelter 
it there, as that will result in both your deaths. Even if it were possible, it 
would be an abomination to have multiple consciousnesses in one body. 


“How terrible,” said Eragon, “to die alone, separate even from the one 
who is closest to you.” 


Everyone dies alone, Eragon. Whether you are a king on a battlefield or a 
lowly peasant lying in bed among your family, no one can accompany you 
into the void.... Now I will have you practice separating your conscious- 
nesses. Start by... 


Eragon stared at the tray of dinner left in the anteroom of the tree 
house. He cataloged the contents: bread with hazelnut butter, berries, 
beans, a bowl of leafy greens, two hard-boiled eggs—which, in accor- 
dance with the elves’ beliefs, were unfertilized—and a stoppered jug of 
fresh spring water. He knew that each dish was prepared with the ut- 
most care, that the elves lavished all of their culinary skill upon his meals, 
and that not even Islanzadi ate better than him. 


He could not bear the sight of the tray. 


I want meat, he growled, stomping back into the bedroom. Saphira 
looked up at him from her dais. I’d even settle for fish or fowl, anything 
besides this never-ending stream of vegetables. They don't fill up my stom- 
ach. I’m not a horse; why should I be fed like one? 


Saphira unfolded her legs, walked to the edge of the teardrop gap over- 
looking Ellesméra, and said, I have needed to eat these past few days. 
Would you like to join me? You can cook as much meat as you like and the 


elves will never know. 


That I would, he said, brightening. Should I get the saddle? 


413 


We won't go that far. 


Eragon fetched his supply of salt, herbs, and other seasonings from his 
bags and then, careful not to overexert himself, climbed into the gap be- 
tween the spikes along Saphira’s spine. 


Launching herself off the ground, Saphira let an updraft waft her high 
above the city, whereupon she glided off the column of warm air, slip- 
ping down and sideways as she followed a braided stream through Du 
Weldenvarden to a pond some miles thence. She landed and hunched 
low to the ground, making it easier for Eragon to dismount. 


She said, There are rabbits in the grass by the edge of the water. See if you 
can catch them. In the meantime, I go to hunt deer. 


What, you don’t want to share your own prey? 


No, I don’t, she replied grumpily. Though I will if those oversized mice 
elude you. 


He grinned as she took off, then faced the tangled clumps of grass and 
cow parsnip that surrounded the pond and set about procuring his din- 
ner. 


Less than a minute later, Eragon collected a brace of dead rabbits from 
their nest. It had taken him but an instant to locate the rabbits with his 
mind and then kill them with one of the twelve death words. What he 
had learned from Oromis had drained the challenge and excitement from 
the chase. I didn’t even have to stalk them, he thought, remembering the 
years he had spent honing his tracking abilities. He grimaced with sour 
amusement. I can finally bag any game I want and it seems meaningless to 
me. At least when I hunted with a pebble with Brom, it was still a chal- 
lenge, but this... this is slaughter. 


The warning of the sword-shaper Rhun6én returned to him then: 
“When you can have anything you want by uttering a few words, the goal 
matters not, only the journey to it.” 


I should have paid more attention to her, realized Eragon. 
With practiced movements, he drew his old hunting knife, skinned and 
gutted the rabbits, and then—putting aside the hearts, lungs, kidneys, and 


livers—buried the viscera so that the scent would not attract scavengers. 
Next he dug a pit, filled it with wood, and lit a small blaze with magic, 


414 


since he had not thought to bring his flint and steel. He tended the fire 
until he had a bed of coals. Cutting a wand of dogwood, he stripped the 
bark and seared the wood over the coals to burn off the bitter sap, then 
spitted the carcasses on the wand and suspended them between two 
forked branches pounded into the ground. For the organs, he placed a flat 
stone upon a section of the coals and greased it with fat for a makeshift 


frying pan. 


Saphira found him crouched by the fire, slowly turning the wand to 
cook the meat evenly. She landed with a limp deer hanging from her jaws 
and the remains of a second deer clutched in her talons. Measuring her 
length out in the fragrant grass, she proceeded to gorge upon her prey, 
eating the entire deer, including the hide. Bones cracked between her ra- 
zor teeth, like branches snapping in a gale. 


When the rabbits were ready, Eragon waved them in the air to cool 
them, then stared at the glistening, golden meat, the smell of which he 
found almost unbearably enticing. 


As he opened his mouth to take the first bite, his thoughts turned un- 
bidden to his meditations. He remembered his excursions into the minds 
of birds and squirrels and mice, how full of energy they felt and how vig- 
orously they fought for the right to exist in the face of danger. And if this 
life is all they have... 


Gripped by revulsion, Eragon thrust the meat away, as appalled by the 
fact that he had killed the rabbits as if he had murdered two people. His 
stomach churned and threatened to make him purge himself. 


Saphira paused in her feast to eye him with concern. 


Taking a long breath, Eragon pressed his fists against his knees in an at- 
tempt to master himself and understand why he was so strongly affected. 
His entire life he had eaten meat, fish, and fowl. He enjoyed it. And yet it 
now made him physically ill to consider dining upon the rabbits. He 
looked at Saphira. I can’t do it, he said. 


It is the way of the world that everything eats everything else. Why do you 
resist the order of things? 


He pondered her question. He did not condemn those who did partake 
of flesh—he knew that it was the only means of survival for many a poor 
farmer. But he could no longer do so himself unless faced with starvation. 
Having been inside of a rabbit and having felt what a rabbit feels... eating 


415 


one would be akin to eating himself. Because we can better ourselves, he 
answered Saphira. Should we give in to our impulses to hurt or kill any who 
anger us, to take whatever we want from those who are weaker, and, in gen- 
eral, to disregard the feelings of others? We are made imperfect and must 
guard against our flaws lest they destroy us. He gestured at the rabbits. As 
Oromis said, why should we cause unnecessary suffering? 


Would you deny all of your desires, then? 

I would deny those that are destructive. 

You are adamant on this? 

Aye. 

In that case, said Saphira, advancing upon him, these will make a fine 
dessert. In a blink, she gulped down the rabbits and then licked clean the 
stone with the organs, abrading the slate with the barbs on her tongue. I, 
at least, cannot live on plants alone—that is food for prey, not a dragon. I 
refuse to be ashamed about how I must sustain myself. Everything has its 


place in the world. Even a rabbit knows that. 


I’m not trying to make you feel guilty, he said, patting her on the leg. 
This is a personal decision. I won't force my choice upon anyone. 


Very wise, she said with a touch of sarcasm. 


416 


BROKEN EGG AND SCATTERED NEST 





“Concentrate, Eragon,” said Oromis, though not unkindly. 


Eragon blinked and rubbed his eyes in an attempt to focus on the 
glyphs that decorated the curling parchment paper before him. “Sorry, 
Master.” Weariness dragged upon him like lead weights tied to his limbs. 
He squinted at the curved and spiked glyphs, raised his goose-feather 
quill, and began to copy them again. 


Through the window behind Oromis, the green shelf on top of the 
Crags of Tel’naeir was streaked with shadows from the descending sun. 
Beyond, feathery clouds banded the sky. 


Eragon’s hand jerked as a line of pain shot up his leg, and he broke the 
nib of the quill and sprayed ink across the paper, ruining it. Across from 
him, Oromis also started, clutching his right arm. 


Saphira! cried Eragon. He reached for her with his mind and, to his be- 
wilderment, was deflected by impenetrable barriers that she had erected 
around herself. He could barely feel her. It was as if he were trying to 
grasp an orb of polished granite coated with oil. She kept slipping away 
from him. 


He looked at Oromis. “Something's happened to them, hasn't it?” 


“I know not. Glaedr returns, but he refuses to talk to me.” Taking his 
blade, Naegling, from the wall, Oromis strode outside and stood upon the 
edge of the crags, head uplifted as he waited for the gold dragon to ap- 
pear. 


Eragon joined him, thinking of everything—probable and improb- 
able—that might have befallen Saphira. The two dragons had left at 
noon, flying north to a place called the Stone of Broken Eggs, where the 
wild dragons had nested in ages past. It was an easy trip. It couldn’t be Ur- 
gals; the elves don’t allow them into Du Weldenvarden, he told himself. 


At last Glaedr came into view high above as a winking speck among 
the darkening clouds. As he descended to land, Eragon saw a wound on 
the back of the dragon’s right foreleg, a tear in his lapped scales as wide as 
Eragon’s hand. Scarlet blood laced the grooves between the surrounding 
scales. 


417 


The moment Glaedr touched the ground, Oromis rushed toward him, 
only to stop when the dragon growled at him. Hopping on his injured leg, 
Glaedr crawled to the edge of the forest, where he curled up beneath the 
outstretched boughs, his back to Eragon, and set about licking clean his 
wound. 


Oromis went and knelt in the clover by Glaedr, keeping his distance 
with calm patience. It was obvious that he would wait as long as need be. 
Eragon fidgeted as the minutes elapsed. Finally, by some unspoken signal, 
Glaedr allowed Oromis to draw near and inspect his leg. Magic glowed 
from Oromis’s gedwéy ignasia as he placed his hand over the rent in 
Glaedr’s scales. 


“How is he?” asked Eragon when Oromis withdrew. 


“It looks a fearsome wound, but it is no more than a scratch for one so 
large as Glaedr.” 


“What about Saphira, though? I still can’t contact her.” 

“You must go to her,” said Oromis. “She is hurt, in more ways than one. 
Glaedr said little of what transpired, but I have guessed much, and you 
would do well to hurry.” 

Eragon glanced about for any means of transportation and groaned with 
anguish when he confirmed that none existed. “How can I reach her? It’s 


too far to run, there’s no trail, and I can’t—’ 


“Calm thyself, Eragon. What was the name of the steed who bore you 
hence from Silthrim?” 


It took Eragon a moment to recall. “Folkvir.” 

“Then summon him with your skill at gramarye. Name him and your 
need in this, the most powerful of languages, and he will come to your 
assistance.” 

Letting the magic suffuse his voice, Eragon cried out for Folkvir, send- 
ing his plea echoing over the forested hills toward Ellesméra with all the 
urgency he could muster. 


Oromis nodded, satisfied. “Well done.” 


Twelve minutes later, Folkvir emerged like a silver ghost from the dark 


418 


shadows among the trees, tossing his mane and snorting with excitement. 
The stallion’s sides heaved from the speed of his journey. 


Throwing a leg over the small elven horse, Eragon said, “I'll return as 
soon as | can.” 


“Do what you must,” said Oromis. 


Then Eragon touched his heels to Folkvir's ribs and shouted, “Run, 
Folkvir! Run!” The horse leaped forward and bounded into Du Welden- 
varden, threading his way with incredible dexterity between the gnarled 
pines. Eragon guided him toward Saphira with images from his mind. 


Lacking a trail through the underbrush, a horse like Snowfire would 
have taken three or four hours to reach the Stone of Broken Eggs. Folkvir 
managed the trip in a bit over an hour. 


At the base of the basalt monolith—which ascended from the forest 
floor like a mottled green pillar and stood a good hundred feet higher 
than the trees—Eragon murmured, “Halt,” then slid to the ground. He 
looked at the distant top of the Stone of Broken Eggs. Saphira was up 
there. 


He walked around the perimeter, searching for a means to achieve the 
pinnacle, but in vain, for the weathered formation was impregnable. It 
possessed no fissures, crevices, or other faults near enough to the ground 
that he could use to climb its sides. 


This might hurt, he thought. 


“Stay here,” he told Folkvir. The horse looked at him with intelligent 
eyes. “Graze if you want, but stay here, okay?” Folkvir nickered and, with 
his velvet muzzle, nudged Eragon’s arm. “Yes, good boy. You’ve done 
well.” 


Fixing his gaze on the crest of the monolith, Eragon gathered his 
strength, then said in the ancient language, “Up!” 


He realized later that if he had not been accustomed to flying with 
Saphira, the experience might have proved unsettling enough to cause 
him to lose control of the spell and plunge to his death. The ground 
dropped away beneath his feet at a swift clip, while the tree trunks nar- 
rowed as he floated toward the underside of the canopy and the fading 
evening sky beyond. Branches clung like grasping fingers to his face and 


419 


shoulders as he pushed through into the open. Unlike during one of 
Saphira’s dives, he retained his sense of weight, as if he still stood upon 
the loam below. 


Rising above the edge of the Stone of Broken Eggs, Eragon moved him- 
self forward and released his grip on the magic, alighting upon a mossy 
patch. He sagged with exhaustion and waited to see if the exertion would 
pain his back, then sighed with relief when it did not. 


The top of the monolith was composed of jagged towers divided by 
deep and wide gullies where naught but a few scattered wildflowers 
grew. Black caves dotted the towers, some natural, others clawed out of 
the basalt by talons as thick as Eragon’s leg. Their floors were blanketed 
with a deep layer of lichen-ridden bones, remnants of the dragons’ an- 
cient kills. Birds now nested where dragons once had—hawks and falcons 
and eagles, who watched him from their perches, ready to attack if he 
should threaten their eggs. 


Eragon picked his way across the forbidding landscape, careful not to 
twist an ankle on the loose flakes of stone or to get too close to the occa- 
sional rifts that split the column. If he fell down one, it would send him 
tumbling out into empty space. Several times he had to climb over high 
ridges, and twice more he had to lift himself with magic. 


Evidence of the dragons’ habitation was visible everywhere, from deep 
scratches in the basalt to puddles of melted rock to a number of dull, 
colorless scales caught in nooks, along with other detritus. He even 
stepped upon a sharp object that, when he bent to examine it, proved to 
be a fragment of a green dragon egg. 


On the eastern face of the monolith stood the tallest tower, in the cen- 
ter of which, like a black pit turned on its side, was the largest cave. It 
was there that Eragon finally beheld Saphira, curled in a hollow against 
the far wall, her back to the opening. Tremors ran her length. The walls 
of the cave bore fresh scorch marks, and the piles of brittle bones were 
scattered about as if from a fight. 


“Saphira,” said Eragon, speaking out loud since her mind was closed to 
him. 


Her head whipped up, and she stared at him as if he were a stranger, 
her pupils contracting to thin black slits as her eyes adjusted to the light 
from the setting sun behind him. She snarled once, like a feral dog, and 
then twisted away. As she did, she lifted her left wing and exposed a 


420 


long, ragged gash along her upper thigh. His heart caught at the sight. 

Eragon knew that she would not let him approach, so he did as Oromis 
had with Glaedr; he knelt among the crushed bones and waited. He 
waited without word or motion until his legs were numb and his hands 
were stiff with cold. Yet he did not resent the discomfort. He paid the 
price gladly if it meant he could help Saphira. 

After a time, she said, I have been a fool. 

We are all fools sometimes. 

That makes it no easier when it is your turn to play dunce. 

I suppose not. 

I have always known what to do. When Garrow died, I knew it was the 
right thing to pursue the Ra’zac. When Brom died, I knew that we should go 
to Gil’ead and thence to the Varden. And when Ajihad died, I knew that 
you should pledge yourself to Nasuada. The path has always been clear to 
me. Except now. In this issue alone, I am lost. 


What is it, Saphira? 


Instead of answering, she turned the subject and said, Do you know why 
this is called the Stone of Broken Eggs? 


No. 

Because during the war between dragons and elves, the elves tracked us to 
this location and killed us while we slept. They tore apart our nests, then 
shattered our eggs with their magic. That day, it rained blood in the forest 


below. No dragon has lived here since. 


Eragon remained silent. That was not why he was here. He would wait 
until she could bring herself to address the situation at hand. 


Say something! demanded Saphira. 
Will you let me heal your leg? 
Leave well enough alone. 


Then I shall remain as mute as a statue and sit here until I turn to dust, 


421 


for I have the patience of a dragon from you. 


When they came, her words were halting, bitter, and self-mocking: It 
shames me to admit it. When we first came here and I saw Glaedr, I felt 
such joy that another member of my race survived besides Shruikan. I had 
never even seen another dragon before, except in Brom’s memories. And I 
thought... I thought that Glaedr would be as pleased by my existence as I 
was by his. 


But he was. 


You don’t understand. I thought that he would be the mate I never ex- 
pected to have and that together we could rebuild our race. She snorted, 
and a burst of flame escaped her nostrils. I was mistaken. He does not 
want me. 


Eragon chose his response with care to avoid offending her and to pro- 
vide a modicum of comfort. That’s because he knows you are destined for 
someone else: one of the two remaining eggs. Nor would it be proper for him 
to mate with you when he is your mentor. 


Or perhaps he does not find me comely enough. 
Saphira, no dragon is ugly, and you are the fairest of dragons. 


I am a fool, she said. But she raised her left wing and kept it in the air as 
permission for him to tend to her injury. 


Eragon limped to Saphira’s side, where he examined the crimson 
wound, glad that Oromis had given him so many scrolls on anatomy to 
read. The blow—by claw or tooth, he was not sure—had torn the quad- 
riceps muscle beneath Saphira’s hide, but not so much as to bare the 
bone. Merely closing the surface of the wound, as Eragon had done so 
many times, would not be enough. The muscle had to be knitted back 
together. 


The spell Eragon used was long and complex, and even he did not un- 
derstand all its parts, for he had memorized it from an ancient text that 
offered little explanation beyond the statement that, given no bones were 
broken and the internal organs were whole, “this charm will heal any ail- 
ment of violent origins, excepting that of grim death.” Once he uttered it, 
Eragon watched with fascination as Saphira’s muscle writhed beneath his 
hand—veins, nerves, and fibers weaving together—and became whole 
once more. The wound was big enough that, in his weakened state, he 


422 


dared not heal it with just the energy from his body, so he drew upon 
Saphira’s strength as well. 


It itches, said Saphira when he finished. 


Eragon sighed and leaned his back against the rough basalt, looking at 
the sunset through his eyelashes. I fear that you will have to carry me off 
this rock. I’m too tired to move. 


With a dry rustle, she twisted in place and laid her head on the bones 
beside him. I have treated you poorly ever since we came to Ellesméra. I ig- 
nored your advice when I should have listened. You warned me about 
Glaedr, but I was too proud to see the truth in your words.... I have failed to 
be a good companion for you, betrayed what it means to be a dragon, and 
tarnished the honor of the Riders. 


No, never that, he said vehemently. Saphira, you haven't failed your 
duty. You may have made a mistake, but it was an honest one, and one 
that anyone might have committed in your position. 


That does not excuse my behavior toward you. 


He tried to meet her eye, but she avoided his gaze until he touched her 
upon the neck and said, Saphira, family members forgive one another, even 
if they don’t always understand why someone acts in a certain way.... You 
are as much my family as Roran—more. Nothing you can do will ever 
change that. Nothing. When she did not respond, he reached behind her 
jaw and tickled the patch of leathery skin below one of her ears. Do you 
hear me, eh? Nothing! 


She coughed low in her throat with reluctant amusement, then arched 
her neck and lifted her head to escape his dancing fingers. How can I face 
Glaedr again? He was in a terrible rage.... The entire stone shook with the 
force of his anger. 

At least you held your own when he attacked you. 


It was the other way around. 


Caught by surprise, Eragon raised his eyebrows. Well, in any case, the 
only thing to do is to apologize. 


Apologize! 


423 


Aye. Go tell him that you are sorry, that this won’t happen again, and 
that you want to continue your training with him. I'm sure he will be sym- 
pathetic if you give him the chance. 

Very well, she said in a low voice. 

You'll feel better once you do. He grinned. I know from experience. 

She grunted and padded to the edge of the cave, where she crouched 
and surveyed the rolling forest. We should go. Soon it will be dark. Grit- 
ting his teeth, he forced himself upright—every movement costing him 
effort—and climbed onto her back, taking twice the time he usually did. 
Eragon?... Thank you for coming. I know what you risked with your back. 


He patted her on the shoulder. Are we one again? 


We are one. 


424 


THE GIFT OF DRAGONS 





The days leading up to the Agaeti Blédhren were the best and worst of 
times for Eragon. His back troubled him more than ever, battering down 
his health and endurance and destroying his calm of mind; he lived in 
constant fear of triggering an episode. Yet, in contrast, he and Saphira had 
never been so close. They lived as much in each other’s minds as in their 
own. And every now and then Arya would visit the tree house and walk 
through Ellesméra with Eragon and Saphira. She never came alone, 
though, always bringing either Orik or Maud the werecat. 


Over the course of their wanderings, Arya introduced Eragon and 
Saphira to elves of distinction: great warriors, poets, and artists. She took 
them to concerts held under the thatched pines. And she showed them 
many hidden wonders of Ellesméra. 


Eragon seized every opportunity to talk with her. He told her about his 
upbringing in Palancar Valley, about Roran, Garrow, and his aunt Marian, 
stories of Sloan, Ethlbert, and the other villagers, and his love of the 
mountains surrounding Carvahall and the flaming sheets of light that 
adorned the winter sky at night. He told her about the time a vixen fell 
into Gedric’s tanning vats and had to be fished out with a net. He told 
her about the joy he found in planting a crop, weeding and nurturing it, 
and watching the tender green shoots grow under his care—a joy that he 
knew she, of all people, could appreciate. 


In turn, Eragon gleaned occasional insights into her own life. He heard 
mentions of her childhood, her friends and family, and her experiences 
among the Varden, which she spoke about most freely, describing raids 
and battles she participated in, treaties she helped to negotiate, her dis- 
putes with the dwarves, and the momentous events she witnessed during 
her tenure as ambassador. 


Between her and Saphira, a measure of peace entered Eragon’s heart, 
but it was a precarious balance that the slightest influence might disrupt. 
Time itself was an enemy, for Arya was destined to leave Du Welden- 
varden after the Agaeti Blédhren. Thus, Eragon treasured his moments 
with her and dreaded the arrival of the forthcoming celebration. 


The entire city bustled with activity as the elves prepared for the 
Agaeti Blédhren. Eragon had never seen them so excited before. They 
decorated the forest with colored bunting and lanterns, especially around 
the Menoa tree, while the tree itself was adorned with a lantern upon the 


425 


tip of each branch, where they hung like glowing teardrops. Even the 
plants, Eragon noticed, took on a festive appearance with a collection of 
bright new flowers. He often heard the elves singing to them late at night. 


Each day hundreds of elves arrived in Ellesméra from their cities scat- 
tered throughout the woods, for no elf would willingly miss the centen- 
nial observance of their treaty with the dragons. Eragon guessed that 
many of them also came to meet Saphira. It seems as if I do nothing but 
repeat their greeting, he thought. The elves who were absent because of 
their responsibilities would hold their own festivities simultaneously and 
would participate in the ceremonies at Ellesméra by scrying through en- 
chanted mirrors that displayed the likeness of those watching, so that no 
one felt as if they were being spied upon. 


A week before the Agaeti Blédhren, when Eragon and Saphira were 
about to return to their quarters from the Crags of Tel’naeir, Oromis said, 
“You should both think about what you can bring to the Blood-oath 
Celebration. Unless your creations require magic to make or to function, 
I suggest that you avoid using gramarye. No one will respect your work if 
it’s the product of a spell and not of your own hands. I also suggest you 
each make a separate piece. That too is custom.” 


In the air, Eragon asked Saphira, Do you have any ideas? 

I might have one. But if you don’t mind, I’d like to see if it works before I 
tell you. He caught part of an image from her of a bare knuckle of stone 
protruding from the forest floor before she concealed it from him. 

He grinned. Won't you give me a hint? 

Fire. Lots of fire. 

Back in their tree house, Eragon cataloged his skills and thought, I know 
more about farming than anything else, but I don’t see how I can turn that 
to my advantage. Nor can I hope to compete with the elves with magic or 
match their accomplishments with the crafts I am familiar with. Their tal- 
ent exceeds that of the finest artisans in the Empire. 

But you possess one quality that no one else does, said Saphira. 


Oh? 


Your identity. Your history, deeds, and situation. Use those to shape your 
creation and you will produce something unique. Whatever you make, base 


426 


it upon that which is most important to you. Only then will it have depth 
and meaning, and only then will it resonate with others. 


He looked at her with surprise. I never realized that you knew so much 
about art. 


I don’t, she said. You forget I spent an afternoon watching Oromis paint 
his scrolls while you flew with Glaedr. Oromis discussed the topic quite a 


bit. 
Ah, yes. I had forgotten. 


After Saphira left to pursue her project, Eragon paced along the edge of 
the open portal in the bedroom, pondering what she had said. What's im- 
portant to me? he asked himself. Saphira and Arya, of course, and being a 
good Rider, but what can I say about those subjects that isn’t blindingly ob- 
vious? I appreciate beauty in nature, but, again, the elves have already ex- 
pressed everything possible on that topic. Ellesméra itself is a monument to 
their devotion. He turned his gaze inward and scrutinized himself to de- 
termine what struck the deepest, darkest chords within him. What 
stirred him with enough passion—of either love or hate—that he burned 
to share it with others? 


Three things presented themselves to him: his injury at the hands of 
Durza, his fear of one day fighting Galbatorix, and the elves’ epics that so 
engrossed him. 


A rush of excitement flared within Eragon as a story combining those 
elements took form in his mind. Light on his feet, he ran up the twisting 
stairs—two at a time—to the study, where he sat before the writing 


desk, dipped quill in ink, and held it trembling over a pale sheet of paper. 


The nib rasped as he made the first stroke: 


In the kingdom by the sea, 

In the mountains mantled blue... 

The words flowed from his pen seemingly of their own accord. He felt 
as if he were not inventing his tale, but merely acting as a conduit to 


transport it fully formed into the world. Having never composed a work 
of his own before, Eragon was gripped by the thrill of discovery that ac- 


427 


companies new ventures—especially since, previously, he had not sus- 
pected that he might enjoy being a bard. 


He labored in a frenzy, not stopping for bread or drink, his tunic 
sleeves rolled past his elbows to protect them from the ink flicked from 
his quill by the wild force of his writing. So intense was his concentra- 
tion, he heard nothing but the beat of his poem, saw nothing but the 
empty paper, and thought of nothing but the phrases etched in lines of 
fire behind his eyes. 


An hour and a half later, he dropped the quill from his cramped hand, 
pushed his chair away from the desk, and stood. Fourteen pages lay be- 
fore him. It was the most he had ever written at one time. Eragon knew 
that his poem could not match those of the elves’ and dwarves’ great au- 
thors, but he hoped it was honest enough that the elves would not laugh 
at his effort. 


He recited the poem to Saphira when she returned. Afterward, she 
said, Ah, Eragon, you have changed much since we left Palancar Valley. 
You would not recognize the untested boy who first set out for vengeance, I 
think. That Eragon could not have written a lay after the style of the elves. I 
look forward to seeing who you become in the next fifty or a hundred years. 


He smiled. If I live that long. 


“Rough but true,” was what Oromis said when Eragon read him the 
poem. 


“Then you like it?” 


“Tis a good portrait of your mental state at the present and an engaging 
read, but no masterpiece. Did you expect it to be?” 


“I suppose not.” 

“However, I am surprised that you can give voice to it in this tongue. 
No barrier exists to writing fiction in the ancient language. The difficulty 
arises when one attempts to speak it, for that would require you to tell 


untruths, which the magic will not allow.” 


“I can say it,” replied Eragon, “because I believe it’s true.” 


428 


“And that gives your writing far more power.... 1 am impressed, Eragon- 
finiarel. Your poem will be a worthy addition to the Blood-oath Celebra- 
tion.” Raising a finger, Oromis reached within his robe and gave Eragon a 
scroll tied shut with ribbon. “Inscribed on that paper are nine wards I 
want you to place about yourself and the dwarf Orik. As you discovered 
at Silthrim, our festivities are potent and not for those with constitutions 
weaker than ours. Unprotected, you risk losing yourself in the web of our 
magic. I have seen it happen. Even with these precautions, you must take 
care you are not swayed by fancies wafted on the breeze. Be on your 
guard, for during this time, we elves are apt to go mad—wonderfully, 
gloriously mad, but mad all the same.” 


On the eve of the Agaeti Blédhren—which was to last three days— 
Eragon, Saphira, and Orik accompanied Arya to the Menoa tree, where a 
host of elves were assembled, their black and silver hair flickering in the 
lamplight. Islanzadi stood upon a raised root at the base of the trunk, as 
tall, pale, and fair as a birch tree. Blagden roosted on the queen’s left 
shoulder, while Maud, the werecat, lurked behind her. Glaedr was there, 
as well as Oromis garbed in red and black, and other elves Eragon recog- 
nized, such as Lifaen and Nari and, to his distaste, Vanir. Overhead, the 
stars glittered in the velvet sky. 


“Wait here,” said Arya. She slipped through the crowd and returned 
leading Rhunén. The smith blinked like an owl at her surroundings. Er- 
agon greeted her, and she nodded to him and Saphira. “Well met, Bright 
scales and Shadeslayer.” Then she spied Orik and addressed him in Dwar- 
vish, to which Orik replied with enthusiasm, obviously delighted to con- 
verse with someone in the rough speech of his native land. 


“What did she say?” asked Eragon, bending down. 


“She invited me to her home to view her work and discuss metal work- 
ing.” Awe crossed Orik’s face. “Eragon, she first learned her craft from 
Fathark himself, one of the legendary grimstborithn of Dtrgrimst Ingei- 
tum! What I would give to have met him.” 


Together they waited until the stroke of midnight, when Islanzadi 
raised her bare left arm so that it pointed toward the new moon like a 
marble spear. A soft white orb gathered itself above her palm from the 
light emitted by the lanterns that dotted the Menoa tree. Then Islanzadi 
walked along the root to the massive trunk and placed the orb in a hol- 


429 


low in the bark, where it remained, pulsing. 
Eragon turned to Arya. “Is it begun?” 


“It is begun!” She laughed. “And it will end when the werelight expends 
itself.” 


The elves divided themselves into informal camps throughout the for- 
est and clearing that encircled the Menoa tree. Seemingly out of nowhere, 
they produced tables laden high with fantastic dishes, which from their 
unearthly appearance were as much the result of the spellweavers’ 
handiwork as the cooks’. 


Then the elves began to sing in their clear, flutelike voices. They sang 
many songs, yet each was but part of a larger melody that wove an en- 
chantment over the dreamy night, heightening senses, removing inhibi- 
tions, and burnishing the revels with fey magic. Their verses concerned 
heroic deeds and quests by ship and horse to forgotten lands and the sor- 
row of lost beauty. The throbbing music enveloped Eragon, and he felt a 
wild abandon take hold of him, a desire to run free of his life and dance 
through elven glades forever more. Beside him, Saphira hummed along 
with the tune, her glazed eyes lidded halfway. 


What transpired afterward, Eragon was never able to adequately recall. 
It was as if he had a fever and faded in and out of consciousness. He 
could remember certain incidents with vivid clarity—bright, pungent 
flashes filled with merriment—but it was beyond him to reconstruct the 
order in which they occurred. He lost track of whether it was day or 
night, for no matter the time, dusk seemed to pervade the forest. Nor 
could he ever say if he had slumbered, or needed sleep, during the cele- 
bration... 


He remembered spinning in circles while holding the hands of an elf- 
maid with cherry lips, the taste of honey on his tongue and the smell of 
juniper in the air... 


He remembered elves perched on the outstretched branches of the 
Menoa tree, like a flock of starlings. They strummed golden harps and 
called riddles to Glaedr below and, now and then, pointed a finger at the 
sky, whereupon a burst of colored embers would appear in various 


430 


shapes before fading away... 


He remembered sitting in a dell, propped against Saphira, and watching 
the same elf-maid sway before a rapt audience while she sang: 

Away, away, you shall fly away, 

O’er the peaks and vales 

To the lands beyond. 

Away, away, you shall fly away, 


And never return to me. 


Gone! Gone you shall be from me, 
And I will never see you again. 
Gone! Gone you shall be from me, 


Though I wait for you evermore. 


He remembered endless poems, some mournful, others joyful—most 
both. He heard Arya’s poem in full and thought it fine indeed, and Islan- 
zadi’s, which was longer but of equal merit. All the elves gathered to lis- 
ten to those two works.... 


He remembered the wonders the elves had made for the celebration, 
many of which he would have deemed impossible beforehand, even with 
the assistance of magic. Puzzles and toys, art and weapons, and items 
whose function escaped him. One elf had charmed a glass ball so that 
every few seconds a different flower bloomed within its heart. Another 
elf had spent decades traveling Du Weldenvarden and memorizing the 
sounds of the elements, the most beautiful of which he now played from 
the throats of a hundred white lilies. 


431 


Rhun6n contributed a shield that would not break, a pair of gloves 
woven from steel thread that allowed the wearer to handle molten lead 
and other such items without harm, and a delicate sculpture of a wren in 
flight chiseled from a solid block of metal and painted with such skill 
that the bird seemed alive. 


A tiered wood pyramid eight inches high and constructed of fifty-eight 
interlocking pieces was Orik’s offering, much to the elves’ delight, who 
insisted upon disassembling and reassembling the pyramid as often as he 
would allow. “Master Longbeard,” they called him, and said, “Clever fin- 
gers mean a clever mind.”... 


He remembered Oromis pulling him aside, away from the music, and 
asking the elf, “What’s wrong?” 


“You need to clear your mind.” Oromis guided him to a fallen log and 
had him sit. “Stay here for a few minutes. You will feel better.” 


“I’m fine. I don’t need to rest,” protested Eragon. 


“You are in no position to judge yourself right now. Stay here until you 
can list the spells of changing, great and minor, and then you may rejoin 
us. Promise me this.”... 


He remembered creatures dark and strange, drifting in from the depths 
of the forest. The majority were animals who had been altered by the ac- 
cumulated spells in Du Weldenvarden and were now drawn to the 
Agaeti Blédhren as a starving man is drawn to food. They seemed to find 
nourishment in the presence of the elves’ magic. Most dared reveal them- 
selves only as pairs of glowing eyes on the outskirts of the lantern light. 
One animal that did expose itself was the she-wolf—in the form of a 
white-robed woman—that Eragon had encountered before. She lurked 
behind a dogwood bush, dagger teeth bared in an amused grin, her yellow 
eyes darting from point to point. 


But not all the creatures were animals. Some few were elves who had 
altered their original forms for functionality or in pursuit of a different 
ideal of beauty. An elf covered in brindled fur leaped over Eragon and 
continued to gambol about, as often on all fours as on his feet. His head 
was narrow and elongated with ears like a cat, his arms hung to his knees, 
and his long-fingered hands had rough pads on the palm. 


432 


Later, two identical elf women presented themselves to Saphira. They 
moved with languid grace and, when they touched their hands to their 
lips in the traditional greeting, Eragon saw that their fingers were joined 
by translucent webbing. “We have come far,’ they whispered. As they 
spoke, three rows of gills pulsed on each side of their slender necks, ex- 
posing pink flesh underneath. Their skin glistened as if with oil. Their 
lank hair hung past their narrow shoulders. 


He met an elf armored in imbricated scales like a dragon, with a bony 
crest upon his head, a line of spikes that ran down his back, and two pal- 
lid flames that ever flickered in the pits of his flared nostrils. 


And he met others who were not so recognizable: elves whose outlines 
wavered as if seen through water; elves who, when motionless, were in- 
distinguishable from trees; tall elves with eyes of black, even where the 
whites should have been, who possessed an awful beauty that frightened 


Eragon and, when they chanced to touch something, passed through it 
like shadows. 


The ultimate example of this phenomenon was the Menoa tree, which 
was once the elf Linnéa. The tree seemed to quicken with life at the ac- 
tivity in the clearing. Its branches stirred, though no breeze touched 
them, at times the creaks of its trunk could be heard to match the flow 
of music, and an air of gentle benevolence emanated from the tree and 
lay upon those in the vicinity... 


And he remembered two attacks from his back, screaming and groan- 
ing in the shadows while the mad elves continued their revels around 
him and only Saphira came to guard over him... 


On the third day of the Agaeti Blédhren, or so Eragon later learned, he 
delivered his verses to the elves. He stood and said, “I am no smith, nor 
skilled at carving or weaving or pottery or painting or any of the arts. Nor 
can I rival your accomplishments with spells. Thus, all that remains to 
me are my own experiences, which I have attempted to interpret 
through the lens of a story, though I am also no bard.” Then, in the man- 
ner that Brom had performed lays in Carvahall, Eragon chanted: 


In the kingdom by the sea, 


433 


In the mountains mantled blue, 
On frigid winter's final day 


Was born a man with but one task: 


To kill the foe in Durza, 


In the land of shadows. 


Nurtured by the kind and wise 
Under oaks as old as time, 


He ran with deer and wrestled bears, 


And from his elders learned the skills, 


To kill the foe in Durza, 


In the land of shadows. 


Taught to spy the thief in black 


When he grabs the weak and strong; 
To block his blows and fight the fiend 


With rag and rock and plant and bone; 


And kill the foe in Durza, 


In the land of shadows. 


Quick as thought, the years did turn, 


"Til the man had come of age, 


434 


His body burned with fevered rage, 


While youth’s impatience seared his veins. 


Then he met a maiden fair, 
Who was tall and strong and wise, 
Her brow adorned with Géda’s Light, 


Which shone upon her trailing gown. 


In her eyes of midnight blue, 
In those enigmatic pools, 
Appeared to him a future bright, 


Together, where they would not have 


To fear the foe in Durza, 


In the land of shadows. 


So Eragon told of how the man voyaged to the land of Durza, where he 
found and fought the foe, despite the cold terror within his heart. Yet 
though at last he triumphed, the man withheld the fatal blow, for now 
that he had defeated his enemy, he did not fear the doom of mortals. He 
did not need to kill the foe in Durza. Then the man sheathed his sword 
and returned home and wed his love on summer’s eve. With her, he 
spent his many days content until his beard was long and white. But: 


In the dark before the dawn, 
In the room where slept the man, 


The foe, he crept and loomed above 


435 


His mighty rival now so weak. 


From his pillow did the man 
Raise his head and gaze upon 
The cold and empty face of Death, 


The king of everlasting night. 


Calm acceptance filled the man’s 
Aged heart; for long ago, 
He’d lost all fear of Death’s embrace, 


The last embrace a man will know. 


Gentle as a morning breeze, 

Bent the foe and from the man 

His glowing, pulsing spirit took, 

And thence in peace they went to dwell, 

Forevermore in Durza, 

In the land of shadows. 

Eragon fell quiet and, conscious of the eyes upon him, ducked his head 
and quickly found his seat. He felt embarrassed that he had revealed so 
much of himself. 


The elf lord, Dathedr, said, “You underestimate yourself, Shadeslayer. It 
seems that you have discovered a new talent.” 


Islanzadi raised one pale hand. “Your work shall be added to the great 


library in Tialdari Hall, Eragon-finiarel, so that all who wish can appreci- 
ate it. Though your poem is allegory, I believe that it has helped many of 


430 


us to better understand the hardships you have faced since Saphira’s egg 
appeared to you, for which we are, in no small way, responsible. You 
must read it to us again so we may think upon this further.” 


Pleased, Eragon bowed his head and did as she commanded. Afterward 
was time for Saphira to present her work to the elves. She flew off into 
the night and returned with a black stone thrice the size of a large man 
clutched in her talons. Landing on her hind legs, she placed the stone up- 
right in the middle of the bare greensward, in full view of everyone. The 
glossy rock had been melted and somehow molded into intricate curves 
that wound about each other, like frozen waves. The striated tongues of 
rock twisted in such convoluted patterns that the eye had difficulty fol- 
lowing a single piece from base to tip, but rather flitted from one coil to 
the next. 


As it was his first time seeing the sculpture, Eragon gazed at it with as 
much interest as the elves. How did you make this? 


Saphira’s eyes twinkled with amusement. By licking the molten rock. 
Then she bent and breathed fire long upon the stone, bathing it in a 
golden pillar that ascended toward the stars and clawed at them with lu- 
cent fingers. When Saphira closed her jaws, the paper-thin edges of the 
sculpture glowed cherry red, while small flames flickered in the dark hol- 
lows and recesses throughout the rock. The flowing strands of rock 
seemed to move under the hypnotic light. 


The elves exclaimed with wonder, clapping their hands and dancing 
about the piece. An elf cried, “Well wrought, Brightscales!” 


It’s beautiful, said Eragon. 
Saphira touched him on the arm with her nose. Thank you, little one. 


Then Glaedr brought out his offering: a slab of red oak that he had 
carved with the point of one talon into a likeness of Ellesméra as seen 
from high above. And Oromis revealed his contribution: the completed 
scroll that Eragon had often watched him illustrate during their lessons. 
Along the top half of the scroll marched columns of glyphs—a copy of 
“The Lay of Vestari the Mariner’—while along the bottom half ran a 
panorama of a fantastic landscape, rendered with breathtaking artistry, 


detail, and skill. 


Arya took Eragon’s hand then and drew him through the forest and 
toward the Menoa tree, where she said, “Look how the werelight dims. 


437 


We have but a few hours left to us before dawn arrives and we must re- 
turn to the world of cold reason.” 


Around the tree, the host of elves gathered, their faces bright with ea- 
ger anticipation. With great dignity, Islanzadi emerged from within their 
midst and walked along a root as wide as a pathway until it angled up- 
ward and doubled back on itself. She stood upon the gnarled shelf over- 
looking the slender, waiting elves. “As is our custom, and as was agreed 
upon at the end of The Dragon War by Queen Tarmunora, the first Er- 
agon, and the white dragon who represented his race—he whose name 
cannot be uttered in this or any language—when they bound the fates of 
elves and dragons together, we have met to honor our blood-oath with 
song and dance and the fruits of our labor. Last this celebration occurred, 
many long years ago, our situation was desperate indeed. It has improved 
somewhat since, the result of our efforts, the dwarves’, and the Varden’s, 
though Alagaésia still lies under the black shadow of the Wyrdfell and 


we must still live with our shame of how we have failed the dragons. 


“Of the Riders of eld, only Oromis and Glaedr remain. Brom and many 
others entered the void this past century. However, new hope has been 
granted to us in the form of Eragon and Saphira, and it is only right and 
proper that they should be here now, as we reaffirm the oath between 
our races three.” 


At the queen’s signal, the elves cleared a wide expanse at the base of 
the Menoa tree. Around the perimeter, they staked a ring of lanterns 
mounted upon carved poles, while musicians with flutes, harps, and 
drums assembled along the ridge of one long root. Guided by Arya to the 
edge of the circle, Eragon found himself seated between her and Oromis, 


while Saphira and Glaedr crouched on either side of them like gem- 
studded bluffs. 


To Eragon and Saphira, Oromis said, “Watch you carefully, for this is of 
great importance to your heritage as Riders.” 


When all the elves were settled, two elf-maids walked to the center of 
the space in the host and stood with their backs to each other. They were 
exceedingly beautiful and identical in every respect, except for their hair: 
one had tresses as black as a forgotten pool, while the other's hair 
gleamed like burnished silver wire. 


“The Caretakers, Iduna and Néya,” whispered Oromis. 


From Islanzadi’s shoulder, Blagden shrieked, “Wyrda!” 


438 


Moving in unison, the two elves raised their hands to the brooches at 
their throats, unclasped them, and allowed their white robes to fall away. 
Though they wore no garments, the women were clad in an iridescent 
tattoo of a dragon. The tattoo began with the dragon’s tail wrapped 
around the left ankle of Iduna, continued up her leg and thigh, over her 
torso, and then across Néya’s back, ending with the dragon’s head on 
Néya’s chest. Every scale on the dragon was inked a different color; the 
vibrant hues gave the tattoo the appearance of a rainbow. 


The elf-maids twined their hands and arms together so that the dragon 
appeared to be a continuous whole, rippling from one body to the next 
without interruption. Then they each lifted a bare foot and brought it 
down on the packed ground with a soft thump. 


And again: thump. 


On the third thump, the musicians struck their drums in rhythm. A 
thump later, the harpists plucked the strings of their gilt instruments, and 
a moment after that, those elves with flutes joined the throbbing melody. 


Slowly at first, but with gathering speed, Iduna and Néya began to 
dance, marking time with the stamp of their feet on the dirt and undulat- 
ing so that it was not they who seemed to move but the dragon upon 
them. Round and round they went, and the dragon flew endless circles 
across their skin. 


Then the twins added their voices to the music, building upon the 
pounding beat with their fierce cries, their lyrics verses of a spell so com- 
plex that its meaning escaped Eragon. Like the rising wind that precedes 
a storm, the elves accompanied the incantation, singing with one tongue 
and one mind and one intent. Eragon did not know the words but found 
himself mouthing them along with the elves, swept along by the inexo- 
rable cadence. He heard Saphira and Glaedr hum in concordance, a deep 
pulse so strong that it vibrated within his bones and made his skin tingle 
and the air shimmer. 


Faster and faster spun Iduna and Néya until their feet were a dusty blur 
and their hair fanned about them and they glistened with a film of sweat. 
The elf-maids accelerated to an inhuman speed and the music climaxed 
in a frenzy of chanted phrases. Then a flare of light ran the length of the 
dragon tattoo, from head to tail, and the dragon stirred. At first Eragon 
thought his eyes had deceived him, until the creature blinked, raised his 
wings, and clenched his talons. 


439 


A burst of flame erupted from the dragon’s maw and he lunged for- 
ward and pulled himself free of the elves’ skin, climbing into the air, 
where he hovered, flapping his wings. The tip of his tail remained con- 
nected to the twins below, like a glowing umbilical cord. The giant beast 
strained toward the black moon and loosed an untamed roar of ages past, 
then turned and surveyed the assembled elves. 


As the dragon’s baleful eye fell upon him, Eragon knew that the crea- 
ture was no mere apparition but a conscious being bound and sustained 
by magic. Saphira and Glaedr’s humming grew ever louder until it 
blocked all other sound from Eragon’s ears. Above, the specter of their 
race looped down over the elves, brushing them with an insubstantial 
wing. It came to a stop before Eragon, engulfing him in an endless, whirl- 
ing gaze. Bidden by some instinct, Eragon raised his right hand, his palm 
tingling. 


In his mind echoed a voice of fire: Our gift so you may do what you 
must. 


The dragon bent his neck and, with his snout, touched the heart of Er- 
agon’s gedwéy ignasia. A spark jumped between them, and Eragon went 
rigid as incandescent heat poured through his body, consuming his in- 
sides. His vision flashed red and black, and the scar on his back burned as 
if branded. Fleeing to safety, he fell deep within himself, where darkness 
grasped him and he had not the strength to resist it. 


Last, he again heard the voice of fire say, Our gift to you. 


440 


IN A STARRY GLADE 





Eragon was alone when he woke. 


He opened his eyes to stare at the carved ceiling in the tree house he 
and Saphira shared. Outside, night still reigned and the sounds of the 
elves’ revels drifted from the glittering city below. 


Before he noticed more than that, Saphira leaped into his mind, radiat- 
ing concern and anxiety. An image passed to him of her standing beside 
Islanzadi at the Menoa tree, then she asked, How are you? 


I feel... good. Better than I've felt in a long time. How long have I— 


Only an hour. I would have stayed with you, but they needed Oromis, 
Glaedr, and me to complete the ceremony. You should have seen the elves’ 
reaction when you fainted. Nothing like this has occurred before. 


Did you cause this, Saphira? 


It was not my work alone, nor Glaedr’s. The memories of our race, which 
were given form and substance by the elves’ magic, anointed you with what 
skill we dragons possess, for you are our best hope to avoid extinction. 


I don’t understand. 


Look in a mirror, she suggested. Then rest and recover and I shall rejoin 
you at dawn. 


She left, and Eragon got to his feet and stretched, amazed by the sense 
of well-being that pervaded him. Going to the wash closet, he retrieved 
the mirror he used for shaving and brought it into the light of a nearby 
lantern. 


Eragon froze with surprise. 


It was as if the numerous physical changes that, over time, alter the ap- 
pearance of a human Rider—and which Eragon had already begun to ex- 
perience since bonding with Saphira—had been completed while he was 
unconscious. His face was now as smooth and angled as an elf’s, with ears 
tapered like theirs and eyes slanted like theirs, and his skin was as pale as 
alabaster and seemed to emit a faint glow, as if with the sheen of magic. I 
look like a princeling. Eragon had never before applied the term to a man, 


441 


least of all himself, but the only word that described him now was beau- 
tiful. Yet he was not entirely an elf. His jaw was stronger, his brow 
thicker, his face broader. He was fairer than any human and more rugged 
than any elf. 


With trembling fingers, Eragon reached around the nape of his neck in 
search of his scar. 


He felt nothing. 


Eragon tore off his tunic and twisted in front of the mirror to examine 
his back. It was as smooth as it had been before the battle of Farthen 
Dar. Tears sprang to Eragon’s eyes as he slid his hand over the place 
where Durza had maimed him. He knew that his back would never 
trouble him again. 


Not only was the savage blight he had elected to keep gone, but every 
other scar and blemish had vanished from his body, leaving him as un- 
marked as a newborn babe. Eragon traced a line upon his wrist where he 
had cut himself while sharpening Garrow’s scythe. No evidence of the 
wound remained. The blotchy scars on the insides of his thighs, remnants 
from his first flight with Saphira, had also disappeared. For a moment, he 
missed them as a record of his life, but his regret was short-lived as he re- 
alized that the damage from every injury he had ever suffered, no matter 
how small, had been repaired. 


I have become what I was meant to be, he thought, and took a deep 
breath of the intoxicating air. 


He dropped the mirror on the bed and garbed himself in his finest 
clothes: a crimson tunic stitched with gold thread; a belt studded with 
white jade; warm, felted leggings; a pair of the cloth boots favored by the 
elves; and upon his forearms, leather vambraces the dwarves had given 
him. 


Descending from the tree, Eragon wandered the shadows of Ellesméra 
and observed the elves carousing in the fever of the night. None of them 
recognized him, though they greeted him as one of their own and invited 
him to share in their saturnalias. 


Eragon floated in a state of heightened awareness, his senses thrumming 
with the multitude of new sights, sounds, smells, and feelings that as- 
sailed him. He could see in darkness that would have blinded him before. 
He could touch a leaf and, by touch alone, count the individual hairs that 


442 


grew upon it. He could identify the odors wafting about him as well as a 
wolf or a dragon. And he could hear the patter of mice in the underbrush 
and the noise a flake of bark makes as it falls to earth; the beating of his 
heart was as a drum to him. 


His aimless path led him past the Menoa tree, where he paused to 
watch Saphira among the festivities, though he did not reveal himself to 
those in the glade. 


Where go you, little one? she asked. 


He saw Arya rise from her mother’s side, make her way through the 
gathered elves, and then, like a forest sprite, glide underneath the trees 
beyond. I walk between the candle and the dark, he replied, and followed 
Arya. 


Eragon tracked Arya by her delicate scent of crushed pine needles, by 
the feathery touch of her foot upon the ground, and by the disturbance 
of her wake in the air. He found her standing alone on the edge of a 
clearing, poised like a wild creature as she watched the constellations 
turn in the sky above. 


As Eragon emerged in the open, Arya looked at him, and he felt as if 
she saw him for the first time. Her eyes widened, and she whispered, “Is 
that you, Eragon?” 


“Aye.” 
“What have they done to you?” 
“I know not.” 


He went to her, and together they wandered the dense woods, which 
echoed with fragments of music and voices from the festivities. Changed 
as he was, Eragon was acutely conscious of Arya’s presence, of the whis- 
per of her clothes over her skin, of the soft, pale exposure of her neck, 
and of her eyelashes, which were coated with a layer of oil that made 
them glisten and curl like black petals wet with rain. 


They stopped on the bank of a narrow stream so clear, it was invisible 
in the faint light. The only thing that betrayed its presence was the 
throaty gurgle of water pouring over rocks. Around them, the thick pines 
formed a cave with their branches, hiding Eragon and Arya from the 
world and muffling the cool, still air. The hollow seemed ageless, as if it 


443 


were removed from the world and protected by some magic against the 
withering breath of time. 


In that secret place, Eragon felt suddenly close to Arya, and all his pas- 
sion for her sprang to the fore of his mind. He was so intoxicated with 
the strength and vitality coursing through his veins—as well as the un- 
tamed magic that filled the forest—he ignored caution and said, “How 
tall the trees, how bright the stars... and how beautiful you are, O Arya 
Svit-kona.” Under normal circumstances, he would have considered his 
deed the height of folly, but in that fey, madcap night, it seemed per- 
fectly sane. 


She stiffened. “Eragon...” 


He ignored her warning. “Arya, I'll do anything to win your hand. I 
would follow you to the ends of the earth. I would build a palace for you 
with nothing but my bare hands. I would—’ 


“Will you stop pursuing me? Can you promise me that?” When he 
hesitated, she stepped closer and said, low and gentle, “Eragon, this can- 
not be. You are young and I am old, and that shall never change.” 


“Do you feel nothing for me?” 


“My feelings for you,” she said, “are those of a friend and nothing more. 
I am grateful to you for rescuing me from Gil’ead, and I find your com- 
pany pleasant. That is all... Relinquish this quest of yours—it will only 
bring you heartache—and find someone your own age to spend the long 
years with.” 


His eyes brimmed with tears. “How can you be so cruel?” 
“Tam not cruel, but kind. You and I are not meant for each other.” 


In desperation, he suggested, “You could give me your memories, and 
then I would have the same amount of experience and knowledge as 


” 


you. 


“It would be an abomination.” Arya lifted her chin, her face grave and 
solemn and brushed with silver from the glimmering stars. A hint of steel 
entered her voice: “Hear me well, Eragon. This cannot, nor ever shall be. 
And until you master yourself, our friendship must cease to exist, for 
your emotions do nothing but distract us from our duty.” She bowed to 
him. “Goodbye, Eragon Shadeslayer.” Then she strode past and vanished 


444 


into Du Weldenvarden. 


Now the tears spilled down Eragon’s cheeks and dropped to the moss 
below, where they lay unabsorbed, like pearls strewn across a blanket of 
emerald velvet. Numb, Eragon sat upon a rotting log and buried his face 
in his hands, weeping that his affection for Arya was doomed to remain 
unrequited, and weeping that he had driven her further away. 


Within moments, Saphira joined him. Oh, little one. She nuzzled him. 
Why did you have to inflict this upon yourself? You knew what would hap- 
pen if you tried to woo Arya again. 


I couldn't stop myself. He wrapped his arms around his belly and rocked 
back and forth on the log, reduced to hiccuping sobs by the strength of 
his misery. Putting one warm wing over him, Saphira drew him close to 
her side, like a mother falcon with her offspring. He curled up against her 
and remained huddled there as night passed into day and the Agaeti 
Blédhren came to an end. 


445 


LANDFALL 





Roran stood upon the poop deck of the Red Boar, his arms crossed over 
his chest and his feet planted wide apart to steady himself on the rolling 
barge. The salty wind ruffled his hair and tugged at his thick beard and 
tickled the hairs on his bare forearms. 


Beside him, Clovis manned the tiller. The weathered sailor pointed to- 
ward the coastline at a seagull-covered rock silhouetted on the crest of a 
rolling hill that extended into the ocean. “Teirm be right on the far side 
of that peak.” 


Roran squinted into the afternoon sun, which reflected off the ocean in 
a blindingly bright band. “We'll stop here for now, then.” 


“You don’t want to go on into the city yet?” 


“Not all of us at once. Call over Torson and Flint and have them run 
the barges up on that shore. It looks like a good place to camp.” 


Clovis grimaced. “Arrgh. I was hoping t’ get a hot meal tonight.” Roran 
understood; the fresh food from Narda had long since been eaten, leaving 
them with naught but salt pork, salted herring, salted cabbage, sea bis- 
cuits the villagers had made from their purchased flour, pickled vegeta- 
bles, and the occasional fresh meat when the villagers slaughtered one of 
their few remaining animals or managed to catch game when they landed. 


Clovis’s rough voice echoed over the water as he shouted to the skip- 
pers of the other two barges. When they drew near, he ordered them to 
pull ashore, much to their vociferous displeasure. They and the other 
sailors had counted on reaching Teirm that day and lavishing their pay on 
the city’s delights. 


After the barges were beached, Roran walked among the villagers and 
helped them by pitching tents here and there, unloading equipment, 
fetching water from a nearby stream, and otherwise lending his assistance 
until everyone was settled. He paused to give Morn and Tara a word of 
encouragement, for they appeared despondent, and received a guarded 
response in turn. The tavern owner and his wife had been aloof to him 
ever since they left Palancar Valley. On the whole, the villagers were in 
better condition than when they arrived at Narda due to the rest they 
had garnered on the barges, but constant worry and exposure to the harsh 
elements had prevented them from recuperating as well as Roran hoped. 


446 


“Stronghammer, will you sup at our tent tonight?” asked Thane, coming 
up to Roran. 


Roran declined with as much grace as he could and turned to find him- 
self confronted by Felda, whose husband, Byrd, had been murdered by 
Sloan. She bobbed a quick curtsy, then said, “May I speak with you, Ro- 
ran Garrowsson?” 


He smiled at her. “Always, Felda. You know that.” 


“Thank you.” With a furtive expression, she fingered the tassels that 
edged her shawl and glanced toward her tent. “I would ask a favor of you. 
It’s about Mandel—’” Roran nodded; he had chosen her eldest son to ac- 
company him into Narda on that fateful trip when he killed the two 
guards. Mandel had performed admirably then, as well as in the weeks 
since while he crewed the Edeline and learned what he could about pilot- 
ing the barges. “He’s become quite friendly with the sailors on our barge 
and he’s started playing dice with those lawless men. Not for money—we 
have none—but for small things. Things we need.” 


“Have you asked him to stop?” 


Felda twisted the tassels. “I fear that, since his father died, he no longer 
respects me as he once did. He has grown wild and willful.” 


We have all grown wild, thought Roran. “And what would you have me 
do about it?” he asked gently. 


“You have ever dealt generously with Mandel. He admires you. If you 
talk with him, he will listen.” 


Roran considered the request, then said, “Very well, I will do what I 
can.” Felda sagged with relief. “Tell me, though, what has he lost at dice?” 


“Food mostly.” Felda hesitated and then added, “But I know he once 
risked my grandmother’s bracelet for a rabbit those men snared.” 


Roran frowned. “Put your heart at ease, Felda. I will tend to the matter 
as soon as [| can.” 


“Thank you.” Felda curtsied again, then slipped away between the 
makeshift tents, leaving Roran to mull over what she had said. 


447 


Roran absently scratched his beard as he walked. The problem with 
Mandel and the sailors was a problem that cut both ways; Roran had no- 
ticed that during the trip from Narda, one of Torson’s men, Frewin, had 
become close to Odele—a young friend of Katrina. They could cause 
trouble when we leave Clovis. 


Taking care not to attract undue attention, Roran went through the 
camp and gathered the villagers he trusted the most and had them ac- 
company him to Horst’s tent, where he said, “The five we agreed upon 
will leave now, before it gets much later. Horst will take my place while 
I'm gone. Remember that your most important task is to ensure Clovis 
doesn’t leave with the barges or damage them in any way. They may be 
our only means to reach Surda.” 


“That, and make sure we aren't discovered,” commented Orval. 


“Exactly. If none of us have returned by nightfall day after tomorrow, 
assume we were captured. Take the barges and set sail for Surda, but 
don’t stop in Kuasta to buy provisions; the Empire will probably be lying 
in wait there. You'll have to find food elsewhere.” 


While his companions readied themselves, Roran went to Clovis’s 
cabin on the Red Boar. “Just the five of you be going?” demanded Clovis 
after Roran explained their plan. 


“That’s right.” Roran let his iron gaze bore into Clovis until the man 
fidgeted with unease. “And when I get back, I expect you, these barges, 
and every one of your men to still be here.” 


“You dare impugn my honor after how I’ve kept our bargain?” 


“I impugn nothing, only tell you what I expect. Too much is at stake. If 
you commit treachery now, you condemn our entire village to death.” 


“That I know,” muttered Clovis, avoiding his eyes. 


“My people will defend themselves during my absence. So long as 
breath remains in their lungs, they'll not be taken, tricked, or abandoned. 
And if misfortune were to befall them, I’d avenge them even if I had to 
walk a thousand leagues and fight Galbatorix himself. Heed my words, 
Master Clovis, for I speak the truth.” 


“We're not so fond of the Empire as you seem to believe,” protested 
Clovis. “I wouldn’t do them a favor more than the next man.” 


448 


Roran smiled with grim amusement. “Men will do anything to protect 
their families and homes.” 


As Roran lifted the door latch, Clovis asked, “And what will you do 
once you reach Surda?” 


“We will—’ 


“Not we: you. What will you do? I’ve watched you, Roran. I’ve listened 
to you. An’ you seem a good enough sort, even if I don’t care for how you 
dealt with me. But I cannot fit it in my head, you dropping that hammer 
of yours and taking up the plow again, just because you've arrived in 


Surda.” 


Roran gripped the latch until his knuckles turned white. “When I have 
delivered the village to Surda,” he said in a voice as empty as a blackened 
desert, “then I shall go hunting.” 


“Ah. After that redheaded lass of yours? I heard some talk of that, but I 
didn’t put—’ 


The door slammed behind Roran as he left the cabin. He let his anger 
burn hot and fast for a moment—enjoying the freedom of the emotion— 
before he began to subdue his unruly passions. He marched to Felda’s 
tent, where Mandel was throwing a hunting knife at a stump. 


Felda’s right; someone has to talk some sense into him.“ You're wasting 
your time,” said Roran. 


Mandel whirled around with surprise. “Why do you say that?” 


“In a real fight, you’re more likely to put out your own eye than injure 
your enemy. If you don’t know the exact distance between you and your 
target...” Roran shrugged. “You might as well throw rocks.” 


He watched with detached interest as the younger man bristled with 
pride. “Gunnar told me about a man he knew in Cithri who could hit a 
flying crow with his knife eight times out of ten.” 


“And the other two times you get killed. It’s usually a bad idea to throw 
away your weapon in battle.” Roran waved a hand, forestalling Mandel’s 
objections. “Get your kit together and meet me on the hill past the 
stream in fifteen minutes. I’ve decided you should come with us to 


449 


Teirm.” 


“Yes, sir!” With an enthusiastic grin, Mandel dove into the tent and be- 
gan packing. 


As Roran left, he encountered Felda, her youngest daughter balanced 
on one hip. Felda glanced between him and Mandel’s activity in the tent, 
and her expression tightened. “Keep him safe, Stronghammer.” She set 
her daughter on the ground and then bustled about, helping to gather the 
items Mandel would need. 


Roran was the first to arrive at the designated hill. He squatted on a 
white boulder and watched the sea while he readied himself for the task 
ahead. When Loring, Gertrude, Birgit, and Nolfavrell, Birgit’s son, arrived, 
Roran jumped off the boulder and said, “We have to wait for Mandel; 
he'll be joining us.” 


“What for?” demanded Loring. 


Birgit frowned as well. “I thought we agreed no one else should accom- 
pany us. Especially not Mandel, since he was seen in Narda. It’s dangerous 
enough having you and Gertrude along, and Mandel only increases the 
odds that someone will recognize us.” 


“Tl risk it.” Roran met each of their eyes in turn. “He needs to come.” In 


the end, they listened to him, and, with Mandel, the six of them headed 
south, toward Teirm. 


450 


TEIRM 





In that area, the coastline was composed of low, rolling hills verdant 
with lush grass and occasional briars, willows, and poplars. The soft, 
muddy ground gave under their feet and made walking difficult. To their 
right lay the glittering sea. To their left ran the purple outline of the 
Spine. The ranks of snowcapped mountains were laced with clouds and 
mist. 


As Roran’s company wended past the properties surrounding Teirm— 
some freehold farms, others massive estates—they made every effort to 
go undetected. When they encountered the road that connected Narda to 
Teirm, they darted across it and continued farther east, toward the 
mountains, for several more miles before turning south again. Once they 
were confident they had circumnavigated the city, they angled back to- 
ward the ocean until they found the southern road in. 


During his time on the Red Boar, it had occurred to Roran that officials 
in Narda might have deduced that whoever killed the two guards was 
among the men who left upon Clovis’s barges. If so, messengers would 
have warned Teirm’s soldiers to watch for anyone matching the villagers’ 
descriptions. And if the Ra’zac had visited Narda, then the soldiers would 
also know that they were looking not just for a handful of murderers but 
Roran Stronghammer and the refugees from Carvahall. Teirm could be 
one huge trap. Yet they could not bypass the city, for the villagers needed 
supplies and a new mode of transportation. 


Roran had decided that their best precaution against capture was to 
send no one into Teirm who had been seen in Narda, except for 
Gertrude and himself—Gertrude because only she understood the ingre- 
dients for her medicines, and Roran because, though he was the most 
likely to be recognized, he trusted no one else to do what was required. 
He knew he possessed the will to act when others hesitated, like the 
time he slew the guards. The rest of the group was chosen to minimize 
suspicion. Loring was old but a tough fighter and an excellent liar. Birgit 
had proven herself canny and strong, and her son, Nolfavrell, had already 
killed a soldier in combat, despite his tender age. Hopefully, they would 
appear as nothing more than an extended family traveling together. That 
is, if Mandel doesn’t throw the scheme awry, thought Roran. 


It was also Roran’s idea to enter Teirm from the south, and thus make 
it seem even more unlikely that they had come from Narda. 


451 


Evening was nigh when Teirm came into view, white and ghostly in the 
gloaming. Roran stopped to inspect what lay before them. The walled 
city stood alone upon the edge of a large bay, self-contained and impreg- 
nable to any conceivable attack. Torches glowed between the merlons on 
the battlements, where soldiers with bows patrolled their endless circuits. 
Above the walls rose a citadel, and then a faceted lighthouse, which 
swept its hazy beam across the dark waters. 


“It’s so big,” said Nolfavrell. 


Loring bobbed his head without taking his eyes off Teirm. “Aye, that it 


” 


1S. 


Roran’s attention was caught by a ship moored at one of the stone piers 
jutting from the city. The three-masted vessel was larger than any he had 
seen in Narda, with a high forecastle, two banks of oarlocks, and twelve 
powerful ballistae mounted along each side of the deck for shooting jave- 
lins. The magnificent craft appeared equally suited for either commerce 
or war. Even more importantly, Roran thought that it might—might—be 
able to hold the entire village. 


“That’s what we need,” he said, pointing. 


Birgit uttered a sour grunt. “We'd have to sell ourselves into slavery to 
afford passage on that monster.” 


Clovis had warned them that Teirm’s portcullis closed at sunset, so 
they quickened their pace to avoid spending the night in the countryside. 
As they neared the pale walls, the road filled with a double stream of 
people hurrying to and from Teirm. 


Roran had not anticipated so much traffic, but he soon realized that it 
could help shield his party from unwanted attention. Beckoning to 
Mandel, Roran said, “Drop back a ways and follow someone else through 
the gate, so the guards don’t think you're with us. We'll wait for you on 
the other side. If they ask, you’ve come here seeking employment as a 
seaman.” 


“Yes, sir.” 
As Mandel fell behind, Roran hunched one shoulder, allowed a limp to 
creep into his walk, and began to rehearse the story Loring had concocted 


to explain their presence at Teirm. He stepped off the road and ducked 
his head as a man drove a pair of lumbering oxen past, grateful for the 


452 


shadows that concealed his features. 


The gate loomed ahead, washed in uncertain orange from the torches 
placed in sconces on each side of the entrance. Underneath stood a pair 
of soldiers with Galbatorix’s twisting flame stitched onto the front of 
their crimson tunics. Neither of the armed men so much as glanced at 
Roran and his companions as they shuffled underneath the spiked port- 
cullis and through the short tunnel beyond. 


Roran squared his shoulders and felt some of his tension ease. He and 
the others clustered by the corner of a house, where Loring murmured, 
“So far, so good.” 


When Mandel rejoined them, they set out to find an inexpensive hostel 
where they could let a room. As they walked, Roran studied the layout of 
the city with its fortified houses—which grew progressively higher to- 
ward the citadel—and the gridlike arrangement of streets. Those north to 
south radiated from the citadel like a starburst, while those east to west 
curved gently across and formed a spiderweb pattern, creating numerous 
places where barriers could be erected and soldiers stationed. 


If Carvahall had been built like this, he thought, no one could have de- 
feated us but the king himself. 


By dusk they had acquired lodging at the Green Chestnut, an exceed- 
ingly vile tavern with atrocious ale and flea-infested beds. Its sole advan- 
tage was that it cost next to nothing. They went to sleep without dinner 
to save their precious coin, and huddled together to prevent their purses 
from being filched by one of the tavern’s other guests. 


The next day, Roran and his companions left the Green Chestnut be- 
fore dawn to search for provisions and transportation. 


Gertrude said, “I have heard tell of a remarkable herbalist, Angela by 
name, who lives here and is supposed to work the most amazing cures, 
perhaps even a touch of magic. I would go see her, for if anyone has what 
I seek, it would be she.” 


“You shouldn’t go alone,” said Roran. He looked at Mandel. “Accom- 
pany Gertrude, help her with her purchases, and do your best to protect 
her if you are attacked. Your nerve may be tested at times, but do noth- 
ing to cause alarm, unless you would betray your friends and family.” 


453 


Mandel touched his forelock and nodded his obedience. He and 
Gertrude departed at right angles down a cross street, while Roran and 
the rest resumed their hunt. 


Roran had the patience of a stalking predator, but even he began to 
thrum with restlessness when morning and afternoon slipped by and they 
still had not found a ship to carry them to Surda. He learned that the 
three-masted ship, the Dragon Wing, was newly built and about to be 
launched on her maiden voyage; that they had no chance of hiring it from 
the Blackmoor Shipping Company unless they could pay a roomful of the 
dwarves’ red gold; and indeed, that the villagers lacked the coin to engage 
even the meanest vessel. Nor would taking Clovis’s barges solve their 
problems, because it still left unanswered the question of what they 
would eat on their trek. 


“It would be hard,” said Birgit, “very hard, to steal goods from this place, 
what with all the soldiers and how close together the houses are and the 
watchmen at the gate. If we tried to cart that much stuff out of Teirm, 
they'd want to know what we were doing.” 


Roran nodded. That too. 


Roran had suggested to Horst that if the villagers were forced to flee 
Teirm with naught but their remaining supplies, they could raid for their 
food. However, Roran knew that such an act would mean they had be- 
come as monstrous as those he hated. He had no stomach for it. It was 
one thing to fight and kill those who served Galbatorix—or even to steal 
Clovis’s barges, since Clovis had other means of supporting himself—but 
it was quite another to take provisions from innocent farmers who strug- 
gled to survive as much as the villagers had in Palancar Valley. That 
would be murder. 


Those hard facts weighed upon Roran like stones. Their venture had 
always been tenuous at best, sustained in equal parts by fear, desperation, 
optimism, and last-minute improvisation. Now he feared that he had 
driven the villagers into the den of their enemies and bound them in 
place with a chain forged of their own poverty. I could escape alone and 
continue my search for Katrina, but what victory would that be if I left my 
village to be enslaved by the Empire? Whatever our fate in Teirm, I will 
stand firm with those who trusted me enough to forsake their homes upon my 
word. 


To relieve their hunger, they stopped at a bakery and bought a loaf of 


454 


fresh rye bread, as well as a small pot of honey to slather it with. While 
he paid for the items, Loring mentioned to the baker’s assistant that they 
were in the market for ships, equipment, and food. 


At a tap on his shoulder, Roran turned. A man with coarse black hair 
and a thick slab of belly said, “Pardon me for overhearing your parley 
with the young master, but if it’s ships and such you be after, and at a fair 
price, then I should guess you'd want to attend the auction.” 


“What auction is this?” asked Roran. 


“Ah, it’s a sad story, it is, but all too common nowadays. One of our 
merchants, Jeod—Jeod Longshanks, as we call him out of hearing—has 
had the most abominable run of bad luck. In less than a year, he lost four 
of his ships, an’ when he tried to send his goods over land, the caravan 
was ambushed and destroyed by some thieving outlaws. His investors 
forced him to declare bankruptcy, and now they’re going to sell his prop- 
erty to recoup their losses. I don’t know ’bout food, but you'd be sure to 
find most everything else you're looking to buy at the auction.” 


A faint ember of hope kindled in Roran’s breast. “When will the auc- 
tion be held?” 


“Why, it’s posted on every message board throughout the city. Day af- 
ter tomorrow, to be sure.” 


That explained to Roran why they had not learned of the auction be- 
fore; they had done their best to avoid the message boards, on the off 
chance that someone would recognize Roran from the portrait on his re- 


ward poster. 


“Thank you much,” he said to the man. “You may have saved us a great 
deal of trouble.” 


“My pleasure, so it is.” 

Once Roran and his companions filed out of the shop, they huddled to- 
gether on the edge of the street. He said, “Do you think we should look 
into this?” 


‘It’s all we have to look into,” growled Loring. 


“Birgit?” 


455 


“You needn't ask me; it’s obvious. We cannot wait until the day after 
tomorrow, though.” 


“No. I say we meet with this Jeod and see if we can strike a bargain 
with him before the auction opens. Are we agreed?” 


They were, and so they set out for Jeod’s house, armed with directions 
from a passerby. The house—or rather, mansion—was set on the west 
side of Teirm, close to the citadel, among scores of other opulent build- 
ings embellished with fine scrollwork, wrought-iron gates, statues, and 
gushing fountains. Roran could scarcely comprehend such riches; it 
amazed him how different the lives of these people were from his own. 


Roran knocked on the front door to Jeod’s mansion, which stood next 
to an abandoned shop. After a moment, the door was pulled open by a 
plump butler garnished with overly shiny teeth. He eyed the four strang- 
ers upon his doorstep with disapproval, then flashed his glazed smile and 
asked, “How may I help you, sirs and madam?” 


“We would talk with Jeod, if he is free.” 
“Have you an appointment?” 


Roran thought the butler knew perfectly well that they did not. “Our 
stay in Teirm is too brief for us to arrange a proper meeting.” 


“Ah, well, then I regret to say that your time would have been better 
spent elsewhere. My master has many matters to tend. He cannot devote 
himself to every group of ragged tramps that bangs on his door, asking for 
handouts,” said the butler. He exposed even more of his glassy teeth and 


began to withdraw inside. 


“Wait!” cried Roran. “It’s not handouts we want; we have a business 
proposition for Jeod.” 


The butler lifted one eyebrow. “Is that so?” 


“Aye, it is. Please ask him if he will hear us. We've traveled more 
leagues than you'd care to know, and it’s imperative we see Jeod today.” 


“May I inquire as to the nature of your proposition?” 


“It’s confidential.” 


456 


“Very well, sir,” said the butler. “I will convey your offer, but I warn 
you that Jeod is occupied at the moment, and I doubt he will wish to 
bother himself. By what name shall I announce you, sir?” 


“You may call me Stronghammer.” The butler’s mouth twitched as if 
amused by the name, then slipped behind the door and closed it. 


“If his head were any larger, ’e couldn't fit in the privy,” muttered Lor- 
ing out the side of his mouth. Nolfavrell uttered a bark of laughter at the 
insult. 


Birgit said, “Let’s hope the servant doesn’t imitate the master.” 


A minute later, the door reopened and the butler announced, with a 
rather brittle expression, “Jeod has agreed to meet you in the study.” He 
moved to the side and gestured with one arm for them to proceed. “This 
way.” After they trooped into the sumptuous entryway, the butler swept 
past them and down a polished wood hallway to one door among many, 
which he opened and ushered them through. 


457 


JEOD LONGSHANKS 





If Roran had known how to read, he might have been more impressed 
by the treasure trove of books that lined the study walls. As it was, he 
reserved his attention for the tall man with graying hair who stood be- 
hind an oval writing desk. The man—who Roran assumed was Jeod— 
looked about as tired as Roran felt. His face was lined, careworn, and sad, 
and when he turned toward them, a nasty scar gleamed white from his 
scalp to his left temple. To Roran, it bespoke steel in the man. Long and 
buried, perhaps, but steel nevertheless. 


“Do sit,” said Jeod. “I won't stand on ceremony in my own house.” He 
watched them with curious eyes as they settled in the soft leather arm- 
chairs. “May I offer you pastries and a glass of apricot brandy? I cannot 
talk for long, but I see you've been on the road for many a week, and I 
well remember how dusty my throat was after such journeys.” 


Loring grinned. “Aye. A touch of brandy would be welcome indeed. 
You're most generous, sir.” 


“Only a glass of milk for my boy,” said Birgit. 

“Of course, madam.” Jeod rang for the butler, delivered his instructions, 
then leaned back in his chair. “I am at a disadvantage. I believe you have 
my name, but I don’t have yours.” 

“Stronghammer, at your service,” said Roran. 

“Mardra, at your service,” said Birgit. 

“Kell, at your service,” said Nolfavrell. 

“And I'd be Wally, at your service,” finished Loring. 

“And I at yours,’ responded Jeod. “Now, Rolf mentioned that you 
wished to do business with me. It’s only fair that you know I’m in no po- 
sition to buy or sell goods, nor have I gold for investing, nor proud ships 
to carry wool and food, gems and spices across the restless sea. What, 
then, can I do for you?” 

Roran rested his elbows on his knees, then knitted his fingers together 
and stared between them as he marshaled his thoughts. A slip of the 


tongue could kill us here, he reminded himself. “To put it simply, sir, we 


458 


represent a certain group of people who—for various reasons—must 
purchase a large amount of supplies with very little money. We know 
that your belongings will be auctioned off day after tomorrow to repay 
your debts, and we would like to offer a bid now on those items we 
need. We would have waited until the auction, but circumstances press 
us and we cannot tarry another two days. If we are to strike a bargain, it 
must be tonight or tomorrow, no later.” 


“What manner of supplies do you need?” asked Jeod. 


“Food and whatever else is required to outfit a ship or other vessel for a 
long voyage at sea.” 


A spark of interest gleamed in Jeod’s weary face. “Do you have a certain 
ship in mind? For I know every craft that’s plied these waters in the last 
twenty years.” 


“We've yet to decide.” 


Jeod accepted that without question. “I understand now why you 
thought to come to me, but I fear you labor under a misapprehension.” 
He spread his gray hands, indicating the room. “Everything you see here 
no longer belongs to me, but to my creditors. I have no authority to sell 
my possessions, and if I did so without permission, I would likely be im- 
prisoned for cheating my creditors out of the money I owe them.” 


He paused as Rolf backed into the study, carrying a large silver tray 
dotted with pastries, cut-crystal goblets, a glass of milk, and a decanter of 
brandy. The butler placed the tray on a padded footstool and then pro- 
ceeded to serve the refreshments. Roran took his goblet and sipped the 
mellow brandy, wondering how soon courtesy would allow the four of 
them to excuse themselves and resume their quest. 


When Rolf left the room, Jeod drained his goblet with a single draught, 
then said, “I may be of no use to you, but I do know a number of people 
in my profession who might...might... be able to help. If you can give me a 
bit more detail about what you want to buy, then I'd have a better idea 
of who to recommend.” 


Roran saw no harm in that, so he began to recite a list of items the vil- 
lagers had to have, things they might need, and things they wanted but 
would never be able to afford unless fortune smiled greatly upon them. 
Now and then Birgit or Loring mentioned something Roran had forgot- 
ten—like lamp oil—and Jeod would glance at them for a moment before 


459 


returning his hooded gaze to Roran, where it remained with growing in- 
tensity. Jeod’s interest concerned Roran; it was as if the merchant knew, 
or suspected, what he was hiding. 


“It seems to me,” said Jeod at the completion of Roran’s inventory, “that 
this would be enough provisions to transport several hundred people to 
Feinster or Aroughs... or beyond. Admittedly, I’ve been rather occupied 
for the past few weeks, but I’ve heard of no such host in this area, nor 
can I imagine where one might have come from.” 


His face blank, Roran met Jeod’s stare and said nothing. On the inside, 
he seethed with self-contempt for allowing Jeod to amass enough infor- 
mation to reach that conclusion. 


Jeod shrugged. “Well, be as it may, that’s your own concern. I'd suggest 
that you see Galton on Market Street about your food and old Hamill by 
the docks for all else. They're both honest men and will treat you true 
and fair.” Reaching over, he plucked a pastry from the tray, took a bite, 
and then, when he finished chewing, asked Nolfavrell, “So, young Kell, 
have you enjoyed your stay in Teirm?” 


“Yes, sir,” said Nolfavrell, and grinned. “I’ve never seen anything quite so 
large, sir.” 


“Is that so?” 
“Yes, sir. [—” 


Feeling that they were in dangerous territory, Roran interrupted: “I’m 
curious, sir, as to the nature of the shop next to your house. It seems odd 
to have such a humble store among all these grand buildings.” 


For the first time, a smile, if only a small one, brightened Jeod’s expres- 
sion, erasing years from his appearance. “Well, it was owned by a woman 
who was a bit odd herself: Angela the herbalist, one of the best healers 
I've ever met. She tended that store for twenty-some years and then, only 
a few months ago, up and sold it and left for parts unknown.” He sighed. 
“It’s a pity, for she made an interesting neighbor.” 


“That’s who Gertrude wanted to meet, isn’t it?” asked Nolfavrell, and 
looked up at his mother. 


Roran suppressed a snarl and flashed a warning glance strong enough to 
make Nolfavrell quail in his chair. The name would mean nothing to 


460 


Jeod, but unless Nolfavrell guarded his tongue better, he was liable to 
blurt out something far more damaging. Time to go, thought Roran. He 
put down his goblet. 


It was then that he saw the name did mean something to Jeod. The 
merchant’s eyes widened with surprise, and he gripped the arms of his 
chair until the tips of his fingers turned bone white. “It can’t be!” Jeod fo- 
cused on Roran, studying his face as if trying to see past the beard, and 
then breathed, “Roran... Roran Garrowsson.” 


461 


AN UNEXPECTED ALLY 





Roran had already pulled his hammer from his belt and was halfway 
out of the chair when he heard his father’s name. It was the only thing 
that kept him from leaping across the room and knocking Jeod uncon- 
scious. How does he know who Garrow is? Beside him, Loring and Birgit 
jumped to their feet, drawing knives from within their sleeves, and even 
Nolfavrell readied himself to fight with a dagger in hand. 


“It is Roran, isn’t it?” Jeod asked quietly. He showed no alarm at their 
weapons. 


“How did you guess?” 


“Because Brom brought Eragon here, and you look like your cousin. 
When I saw your poster with Eragon’s, I realized that the Empire must 
have tried to capture you and that you had escaped. Although,” Jeod’s 
gaze drifted to the other three, “in all my imaginings, I never suspected 
that you took the rest of Carvahall with you.” 


Stunned, Roran dropped back into his chair and placed the hammer 
across his knees, ready for use. “Eragon was here?” 


“Aye. And Saphira too.” 

“Saphira?” 

Again, surprise crossed Jeod’s face. “You don’t know, then?” 
“Know what?” 


Jeod considered him for a long minute. “I think the time has come to 
drop our pretenses, Roran Garrowsson, and talk openly and without de- 
ception. I can answer many of the questions you must have—such as 
why the Empire is pursuing you—but in return, I need to know the rea- 
son you came to Teirm... the real reason.” 


“An’ why should we trust you, Longshanks?” demanded Loring. “You 
could be working for Galbatorix, you could.” 


“I was Brom’s friend for over twenty years, before he was a storyteller 
in Carvahall,” said Jeod, “and I did my best to help him and Eragon when 
they were under my roof. But since neither of them are here to vouch for 


462 


me, I place my life in your hands, to do with as you wish. I could shout 
for help, but I won't. Nor will I fight you. All I ask is that you tell me 
your story and hear my own. Then you can decide for yourself what 
course of action is proper. You're in no immediate danger, so what harm 
is there in talking?” 


Birgit caught Roran’s eye with a flick of her chin. “He could just be try- 
ing to save his hide.” 


“Maybe,” replied Roran, “but we have to find out whatever it is he 
knows.” Hooking an arm underneath his chair, he dragged it across the 
room, placed the back of the chair against the door, and then sat in it, so 
that no one could burst in and catch them unawares. He jabbed his 
hammer at Jeod. “All right. You want to talk? Then let us talk, you and 
I.” 


“It would be best if you go first.” 


“If I do, and we're not satisfied by your answers afterward, we'll have to 
kill you,” warned Roran. 


Jeod folded his arms. “So be it.” 


Despite himself, Roran was impressed by the merchant's fortitude; Jeod 
appeared unconcerned by his fate, if a bit grim about the mouth. “So be 
it,’ Roran echoed. 


Roran had relived the events since the Ra’zac’s arrival in Carvahall often 
enough, but never before had he described them in detail to another per- 
son. As he did, it struck him how much had happened to him and the 
other villagers in such a short time and how easy it had been for the Em- 
pire to destroy their lives in Palancar Valley. Resuscitating old terrors was 
painful for Roran, but he at least had the pleasure of seeing Jeod exhibit 
unfeigned astonishment as he heard about how the villagers had rousted 
the soldiers and Ra’zac from their camp, the siege of Carvahall thereafter, 
Sloan’s treachery, Katrina’s kidnapping, how Roran had convinced the vil- 
lagers to flee, and the hardships of their journey to Teirm. 


“By the Lost Kings!” exclaimed Jeod. “That's the most extraordinary 
tale. Extraordinary! To think you've managed to thwart Galbatorix and 
that right now the entire village of Carvahall is hiding outside one of the 
Empire's largest cities and the king doesn’t even know it...” He shook his 
head with admiration. 


463 


“Aye, that’s our position,” growled Loring, “and it’s precarious at best, so 
you'd better explain well and good why we should risk letting you live.” 


“It places me in as much—” 


Jeod stopped as someone rattled the latch behind Roran’s chair, trying 
to open the door, followed by pounding on the oak planks. In the hall- 
way, a woman cried, “Jeod! Let me in, Jeod! You can’t hide in that cave 
of yours.” 


“May I?” murmured Jeod. 


Roran clicked his fingers at Nolfavrell, and the boy tossed his dagger to 
Roran, who slipped around the writing desk and pressed the flat of the 
blade against Jeod’s throat. “Make her leave.” 


Raising his voice, Jeod said, “I can’t talk now; I’m in the middle of a 
meeting.” 


“Liar! You don't have any business. You're bankrupt! Come out and 
face me, you coward! Are you a man or not that you won't even look 
your wife in the eye?” She paused for a second, as if expecting a response, 
then her screeches increased in volume: “Coward! You're a gutless rat, a 
filthy, yellow-bellied sheep-biter without the common sense to run a 
meat stall, much less a shipping company. My father would have never 
lost so much money!” 


Roran winced as the insults continued. I can’t restrain Jeod if she goes on 
much longer. 


“Be still, woman!” commanded Jeod, and silence ensued. “Our fortunes 
might be about to change for the better if you but have the sense to re- 
strain your tongue and not rail on like a fishmonger’s wife.” 


Her answer was cold: “I shall wait upon your pleasure in the dining 
room, dear husband, and unless you choose to attend me by the evening 
meal and explain yourself, then I shall leave this accursed house, never to 
return.” The sound of her footsteps retreated into the distance. 


When he was sure that she was gone, Roran lifted the dagger from 
Jeod’s neck and returned the weapon to Nolfavrell before reseating him- 


self in the chair pushed against the door. 


Jeod rubbed his neck and then, with a wry expression, said, “If we don’t 


464 


reach an understanding, you had better kill me; it'd be easier than ex- 
plaining to Helen that I shouted at her for naught.” 


“You have my sympathy, Longshanks,” said Loring. 


“It’s not her fault... not really. She just doesn’t understand why so much 
misfortune has befallen us.” Jeod sighed. “Perhaps it’s my fault for not dar- 
ing to tell her.” 


“Tell her what?” piped Nolfavrell. 


“That I’m an agent for the Varden.” Jeod paused at their dumbfounded 
expressions. “Perhaps I should start from the beginning. Roran, have you 
heard rumors in the past few months of the existence of a new Rider 
who opposes Galbatorix?” 


“Mutterings here and there, yes, but nothing I'd give credence to.” 


Jeod hesitated. “I don’t know how else to say this, Roran... but there is a 
new Rider in Alagaésia, and it’s your cousin, Eragon. The stone he found 
in the Spine was actually a dragon egg I helped the Varden steal from 
Galbatorix years ago. The dragon hatched for Eragon and he named her 
Saphira. That is why the Ra’zac first came to Palancar Valley. They re- 
turned because Eragon has become a formidable enemy of the Empire 
and Galbatorix hoped that by capturing you, they could bring Eragon to 
bay.” 


Roran threw back his head and howled with laughter until tears gath- 
ered at the corners of his eyes and his stomach hurt from the convulsions. 
Loring, Birgit, and Nolfavrell looked at him with something akin to fear, 
but Roran cared not for their opinions. He laughed at the absurdity of 
Jeod’s assertion. He laughed at the terrible possibility that Jeod had told 
the truth. 


Taking rasping breaths, Roran gradually returned to normal, despite an 
occasional outburst of humorless chuckles. He wiped his face on his 
sleeve and then regarded Jeod, a hard smile upon his lips. “It fits the facts; 
I'll give you that. But so do a half dozen other explanations I’ve thought 
of.” 


Birgit said, “If Eragon’s stone was a dragon egg, then where did it come 
from?” 


“Ah,” replied Jeod, “now there’s an affair I’m well acquainted with....” 


465 


Comfortable in his chair, Roran listened with disbelief as Jeod spun a 
fantastic story of how Brom—grumpy old Brom!—had once been a Rider 
and had supposedly helped establish the Varden, how Jeod had discov- 
ered a secret passageway into Uri’baen, how the Varden arranged to filch 
the last three dragon eggs from Galbatorix, and how only one egg was 
saved after Brom fought and killed Morzan of the Forsworn. As if that 
were not preposterous enough, Jeod went on to describe an agreement 
between the Varden, dwarves, and elves that the egg should be ferried 
between Du Weldenvarden and the Beor Mountains, which was why the 
egg and its couriers were near the edge of the great forest when they 
were ambushed by a Shade. 


A Shade—ha! thought Roran. 


Skeptical as he was, Roran attended with redoubled interest when Jeod 
began to talk of Eragon finding the egg and raising the dragon Saphira in 
the forest by Garrow’s farm. Roran had been occupied at the time— 
preparing to leave for Dempton’s mill in Therinsford—but he remem- 
bered how distracted Eragon had been, how he spent every moment he 
could outdoors, doing who knows what... 


As Jeod explained how and why Garrow died, rage filled Roran that 
Eragon had dared keep the dragon secret when it so obviously put every- 
one in danger. It’s his fault my father died! 


“What was he thinking?” burst out Roran. 


He hated how Jeod looked at him with calm understanding. “I doubt 
Eragon knew himself. Riders and their dragons are bound together so 
closely, it’s often hard to differentiate one from the other. Eragon could 
have no more harmed Saphira than he could have sawed off his own leg.” 


“He could have,” muttered Roran. “Because of him, I’ve had to do things 
just as painful, and I know—he could have.” 


“You've a right to feel as you do,” said Jeod, “but don’t forget that the 
reason Eragon left Palancar Valley was to protect you and all who re- 
mained. I believe it was an extremely hard choice for him to make. From 
his point of view, he sacrificed himself to ensure your safety and to 
avenge your father. And while leaving may not have had the desired ef- 
fect, things would have certainly turned out far worse if Eragon had 
stayed.” 


466 


Roran said nothing more until Jeod mentioned that the reason Brom 
and Eragon had visited Teirm was to see if they could use the city’s ship- 
ping manifests to locate the Ra’zac’s lair. “And did they?” cried Roran, 
bolting upright. 


“We did indeed.” 


“Well, where are they, then? For goodness’ sake, man, say it; you know 
how important this is to me!” 


“It seemed apparent from the records—and I later had a message from 
the Varden that Eragon’s own account confirmed this—that the Ra’zac’s 
den is in the formation known as Helgrind, by Dras-Leona.” 


Roran gripped his hammer with excitement. It’s a long way to Dras- 
Leona, but Teirm has access to the only open pass between here and the 
southern end of the Spine. If I can get everyone safely heading down the 
coast, then I could go to this Helgrind, rescue Katrina if she’s there, and fol- 
low the Jiet River down to Surda. 


Something of Roran’s thoughts much have revealed themselves on his 
face, because Jeod said, “It can’t be done, Roran.” 


“What?” 


“No one man can take Helgrind. It’s a solid, bare, black mountain of 
stone that’s impossible to climb. Consider the Ra’zac’s foul steeds; it 
seems likely they would have an eyrie near the top of Helgrind rather 
than bed near the ground, where they are most vulnerable. How, then, 
would you reach them? And if you could, do you really believe that you 
could defeat both Ra’zac and their two steeds, if not more? I have no 
doubt you are a fearsome warrior—after all, you and Eragon share 
blood—but these are foes beyond any normal human.” 


Roran shook his head. “I can’t abandon Katrina. It may be futile, but I 
must try to free her, even if it costs me my life.” 


‘It won't do Katrina any good if you get yourself killed,” admonished 
Jeod. “If I may offer a bit of advice: try to reach Surda as you've planned. 
Once there, I’m sure you can enlist Eragon’s help. Even the Ra’zac cannot 
match a Rider and dragon in open combat.” 


In his mind’s eye, Roran saw the huge gray-skinned beasts the Ra’zac 
rode upon. He was loath to acknowledge it, but he knew that such crea- 


467 


tures were beyond his ability to kill, no matter the strength of his motiva- 
tion. The instant he accepted that truth, Roran finally believed Jeod’s 
tale—for if he did not, Katrina was forever lost to him. 


Eragon, he thought. Eragon! By the blood I’ve spilled and the gore on my 
hands, I swear upon my father’s grave I'll have you atone for what you've 
done by storming Helgrind with me. If you created this mess, then I’ll have 
you clean it up. 


Roran motioned to Jeod. “Continue your account. Let us hear the rest 
of this sorry play before the day grows much older.” 


Then Jeod spoke of Brom’s death; of Murtagh, son of Morzan; of cap- 
ture and escape in Gil’ead; of a desperate flight to save an elf; of Urgals 
and dwarves and a great battle in a place called Farthen Dt, where Er- 
agon defeated a Shade. And Jeod told them how the Varden left the Beor 
Mountains for Surda and how Eragon was even now deep within Du 
Weldenvarden, learning the elves’ mysterious secrets of magic and war- 
fare, but would soon return. 


When the merchant fell silent, Roran gathered at the far end of the 
study with Loring, Birgit, and Nolfavrell and asked their thoughts. Lower- 
ing his voice, Loring said, “I can’t tell whether he’s lying or not, but any 


man who can weave a yarn like that at knifepoint deserves to live. A new 
Rider! And Eragon to boot!” He shook his head. 


“Birgit?” asked Roran. 


“I don’t know. It’s so outlandish...” She hesitated. “But it must be true. 
Another Rider is the only thing that would spur the Empire to pursue us 
so fiercely.” 


“Aye,” agreed Loring. His eyes were bright with excitement. “We’ve 
been entangled in far more momentous events than we realized. A new 
Rider. Just think about it! The old order is about to be washed away, I 
tell you.... You were right all along, Roran.” 


“Nolfavrell?” 


The boy looked solemn at being asked. He bit his lip, then said, “Jeod 
seems honest enough. I think we can trust him.” 


“Right, then,” said Roran. He strode back to Jeod, planted his knuckles 
on the edge of the desk, and said, “Two last questions, Longshanks. What 


468 


do Brom and Eragon look like? And how did you recognize Gertrude’s 
name?” 


“I knew of Gertrude because Brom mentioned that he left a letter for 
you in her care. As for what they looked like: Brom stood a bit shorter 
than me. He had a thick beard, a hooked nose, and he carried a carved 
staff with him. And I dare say he was rather irritable at times.” Roran 
nodded; that was Brom. “Eragon was... young. Brown hair, brown eyes, 
with a scar on his wrist, and he never stopped asking questions.” Roran 
nodded again; that was his cousin. 


Roran stuck his hammer back under his belt. Birgit, Loring, and Nol- 
favrell sheathed their blades. Then Roran pulled his chair away from the 
door, and the four of them resumed their seats like civilized beings. 
“What now, Jeod?” asked Roran. “Can you help us? I know you're in a 
difficult situation, but we... we are desperate and have no one else to turn 
to. As an agent of the Varden, can you guarantee us the Varden’s protec- 
tion? We are willing to serve them if they'll shield us from Galbatorix’s 
wrath.” 


“The Varden,” said Jeod, “would be more than happy to have you. 
More than happy. I suspect you already guessed that. As for help...” He 
ran a hand down his long face and stared past Loring at the rows of books 
on the shelves. “I’ve been aware for almost a year that my true identity— 
as well as that of many other merchants here and elsewhere who have 
assisted the Varden—was betrayed to the Empire. Because of that, I ha- 
ven't dared flee to Surda. If I tried, the Empire would arrest me, and then 
who knows what horrors I’d be in for? I’ve had to watch the gradual de- 
struction of my business without being able to take any action to oppose 
or escape it. What's worse, now that I cannot ship anything to the 
Varden and they dare not send envoys to me, I feared that Lord Risthart 
would have me clapped in irons and dragged off to the dungeons, since 
I’m of no further interest to the Empire. I’ve expected it every day since I 
declared bankruptcy.” 


“Perhaps,” suggested Birgit, “they want you to flee so they can capture 
whoever else you bring with you.” 


Jeod smiled. “Perhaps. But now that you are here, I have a means to 
leave that they never anticipated.” 


“Then you have a plan?” asked Loring. 


Glee crossed Jeod’s face. “Oh yes, I have a plan. Did the four of you see 


469 


the ship Dragon Wing moored at port?” 
Roran thought back to the vessel. “Aye.” 


“The Dragon Wing is owned by the Blackmoor Shipping Company, a 
front for the Empire. They handle supplies for the army, which has mo- 
bilized to an alarming degree recently, conscripting soldiers among the 
peasants and commandeering horses, asses, and oxen.” Jeod raised an eye- 
brow. “I’m not sure what it indicates, but it’s possible Galbatorix means 
to march on Surda. In any case, the Dragon Wing is to sail for Feinster 
within the week. She’s the finest ship ever built, from a new design by 
master shipwright Kinnell.” 


“And you want to pirate her,” concluded Roran. 


“I do. Not only to spite the Empire or because the Dragon Wing is re- 
puted to be the fastest square-rigged ship of her tonnage, but because 
she’s already fully provisioned for a long voyage. And since her cargo is 
food, we'd have enough for the whole village.” 


Loring uttered a strained cackle. “I ‘ope you can sail her yourself, Long- 
shanks, cause not one of us knows how to handle anything larger than a 
barge.” 


“A few men from the crews of my ships are still in Teirm. They're in 
the same position I am, unable to fight or flee. I’m confident they'll jump 
at a chance to get to Surda. They can teach you what to do on the Dragon 
Wing. It won't be easy, but I don’t see much choice in the matter.” 


Roran grinned. The plan was to his liking: swift, decisive, and unex- 
pected. 


“You mentioned,” said Birgit, “that in the past year none of your ships— 
nor those from other merchants who serve the Varden—have reached 
their destination. Why, then, should this mission succeed when so many 


have failed?” 


Jeod was quick to answer: “Because surprise is on our side. The law re- 
quires merchant ships to submit their itinerary for approval with the port 
authority at least two weeks before departure. It takes a great deal of 
time to prepare a ship for launch, so if we leave without warning, it 
could be a week or more before Galbatorix can launch intercept vessels. 
If luck is with us, we won't see so much as the topmast of our pursuers. 
So,” continued Jeod, “if you are willing to attempt this enterprise, this is 


470 


what we must do...” 


471 


ESCAPE 





After they considered Jeod’s proposal from every possible angle and 
agreed to abide by it—with a few modifications—Roran sent Nolfavrell 
to fetch Gertrude and Mandel from the Green Chestnut, for Jeod had of- 
fered their entire party his hospitality. 


“Now, if you will excuse me,” said Jeod, rising, “I must go reveal to my 
wife that which I should never have hidden from her and ask if she'll ac- 
company me to Surda. You may take your pick of rooms on the second 
floor. Rolf will summon you when supper is ready.” With long, slow 
steps, he departed the study. 


“Is it wise to let him tell that ogress?” asked Loring. 


Roran shrugged. “Wise or not, we can’t stop him. And I don’t think he'll 
be at peace until he does.” 


Instead of going to a room, Roran wandered through the mansion, un- 
consciously evading the servants as he pondered the things Jeod had said. 
He stopped at a bay window open to the stables at the rear of the house 
and filled his lungs with the brisk and smoky air, heavy with the familiar 
smell of manure. 


“Do you hate him?” 


He started and turned to see Birgit silhouetted in the doorway. She 
pulled her shaw] tight around her shoulders as she approached. 


“Who?” he asked, knowing full well. 

“Eragon. Do you hate him?” 

Roran looked at the darkening sky. “I don’t know. I hate him for caus- 
ing the death of my father, but he’s still family and for that I love him... I 
suppose that if I didn’t need Eragon to save Katrina, I would have nothing 
to do with him for a long while yet.” 

“As I need and hate you, Stronghammer.” 

He snorted with grim amusement. “Aye, we're joined at the hip, aren't 
we? You have to help me find Eragon in order to avenge Quimby on the 


Ra’zac.” 


472 


“And to have my vengeance on you afterward.” 


“That too.” Roran stared into her unwavering eyes for a moment, ac- 
knowledging the bond between them. He found it strangely comforting 
to know that they shared the same drive, the same angry fire that quick- 
ened their steps when others faltered. In her, he recognized a kindred 
spirit. 


Returning through the house, Roran stopped by the dining room as he 
heard the cadence of Jeod’s voice. Curious, he fit his eye to a crack by the 
middle door hinge. Jeod stood opposite a slight, blond woman, who Ro- 
ran assumed was Helen. 


“If what you say is true, how can you expect me to trust you?” 
“I cannot,” answered Jeod. 
“Yet you ask me to become a fugitive for you?” 


“You once offered to leave your family and wander the land with me. 
You begged me to spirit you away from Teirm.” 


“Once. I thought you were terribly dashing then, what with your sword 
and your scar.” 


“IT still have those,” he said softly. “I made many mistakes with you, 
Helen; I understand that now. But I still love you and want you to be 
safe. I have no future here. If I stay, I'll only bring grief to your family. 
You can return to your father or you can come with me. Do what will 
make you the happiest. However, I beg you to give me a second chance, 
to have the courage to leave this place and shed the bitter memories of 
our life here. We can start anew in Surda.” 


She was quiet for a long time. “That young man who was here, is he 
really a Rider?” 


“He is. The winds of change are blowing, Helen. The Varden are about 


to attack, the dwarves are gathering, and even the elves stir in their an- 
cient haunts. War approaches, and if we’re fortunate, so does Galbatorix’s 


downfall.” 


“Are you important among the Varden?” 


473 


“They owe me some consideration for my part in acquiring Saphira’s 


” 


egg. 
“Then you would have a position with them in Surda?” 


“I imagine so.” He put his hands on her shoulders, and she did not draw 
away. 


She whispered, “Jeod, Jeod, don’t press me. I cannot decide yet.” 
“Will you think about it?” 

She shivered. “Oh yes. I'll think about it.” 

Roran’s heart pained him as he left. 

Katrina. 


That night at dinner, Roran noticed Helen’s eyes were often upon him, 
studying and measuring—comparing him, he was sure, to Eragon. 


After the meal, Roran beckoned to Mandel and led him out into the 
courtyard behind the house. 


“What is it, sir?” asked Mandel. 
“I wished to talk with you in private.” 
“About what?” 


Roran fingered the pitted blade of his hammer and reflected on how 
much he felt like Garrow when his father gave a lecture on responsibil- 
ity; Roran could even feel the same phrases rising in his throat. And so one 
generation passes to the next, he thought. “You’ve become quite friendly 
with the sailors as of late.” 


“They’re not our enemies,” objected Mandel. 


“Everyone is an enemy at this point. Clovis and his men could turn on 
us in an instant. It wouldn’t be a problem, though, if being with them 
hadn’t caused you to neglect your duties.” Mandel stiffened and color 
bloomed in his cheeks, but he did not lower himself in Roran’s esteem by 
denying the charge. Pleased, Roran asked, “What is the most important 
thing we can do right now, Mandel?” 


474 


“Protect our families.” 
“Aye. And what else?” 
Mandel hesitated, uncertain, then confessed, “I don’t know.” 


“Help one another. It’s the only way any of us are going to survive. I 
was especially disappointed to learn that you’ve gambled food with the 
sailors, since that endangers the entire village. Your time would be far 
better spent hunting than playing games of dice or learning to throw 
knives. With your father gone, it’s fallen upon you to care for your 
mother and siblings. They rely on you. Am I clear?” 


“Very clear, sir,” replied Mandel with a choked voice. 
“Will this ever happen again?” 
“Never again, sir.” 


“Good. Now I didn’t bring you here just to chastise you. You show 
promise, which is why I’m giving you a task that I would trust to no one 
else but myself.” 


“Yes, sir!” 


“Tomorrow morning I need you to return to camp and deliver a mes- 
sage to Horst. Jeod believes the Empire has spies watching this house, so 
it’s vital that you make sure you aren't followed. Wait until you're out of 
the city, then lose whoever is trailing you in the countryside. Kill him if 
you have to. When you find Horst, tell him to...” As Roran outlined his 
instructions, he watched Mandel’s expression change from surprise, to 
shock, and then to awe. 


“What if Clovis objects?” asked Mandel. 

“That night, break the tillers on the barges so they can’t be steered. It’s a 
dirty trick, but it could be disastrous if Clovis or any of his men arrive at 
Teirm before you.” 


“I won't let that happen,” vowed Mandel. 


Roran smiled. “Good.” Satisfied that he had resolved the matter of 
Mandel’s behavior and that the young man would do everything possible 


475 


to get the message to Horst, Roran went back inside and bade their host 
good night before heading off to sleep. 


With the exception of Mandel, Roran and his companions confined 
themselves to the mansion throughout the following day, taking advan- 
tage of the delay to rest, hone their weapons, and review their stratagems. 


From dawn till dusk, they saw some of Helen as she bustled from one 
room to the next, more of Rolf with his teeth like varnished pearls, and 
none of Jeod, for the gray-pated merchant had left to walk the city and— 
seemingly by accident—meet with the few men of the sea whom he 
trusted for their expedition. 


Upon his return, he told Roran, “We can count on five more hands. I 
only hope it’s enough.” Jeod remained in his study for the rest of the eve- 
ning, drawing up various legal documents and otherwise tending to his 
affairs. 


Three hours before dawn, Roran, Loring, Birgit, Gertrude, and Nol- 
favrell roused themselves and, fighting back prodigious yawns, congre- 
gated in the mansion’s entryway, where they muffled themselves in long 
cloaks to obscure their faces. A rapier hung at Jeod’s side when he joined 
them, and Roran thought the narrow sword somehow completed the 
rangy man, as if it reminded Jeod who he really was. 


Jeod lit an oil lantern and held it up before them. “Are we ready?” he 
asked. They nodded. Then Jeod unlatched the door and they filed outside 
to the empty cobblestone street. Behind them, Jeod lingered in the en- 
tryway, casting a longing gaze toward the stairs on the right, but Helen 
did not appear. With a shudder, Jeod left his home and closed the door. 


Roran put a hand on his arm. “What’s done is done.” 

“I know.” 

They trotted through the dark city, slowing to a quick walk whenever 
they encountered watchmen or a fellow creature of the night, most of 
whom darted away at the sight of them. Once they heard footsteps on 
top of a nearby building. “The design of the city,” explained Jeod, “makes 


it easy for thieves to climb from one roof to another.” 


They slowed to a walk again when they arrived at Teirm’s eastern gate. 


476 


Because the gate opened to the harbor, it was closed only four hours each 
night in order to minimize the disruption to commerce. Indeed, despite 
the time, several men were already moving through the gate. 


Even though Jeod had warned them it might happen, Roran still felt a 
surge of fear when the guards lowered their pikes and asked what their 
business was. He wet his mouth and tried not to fidget while the elder 
soldier examined a scroll that Jeod handed to him. After a long minute, 
the guard nodded and returned the parchment. “You can pass.” 


Once they were on the wharf and out of earshot of the city wall, Jeod 
said, “It’s a good thing he couldn't read.” 


The six of them waited on the damp planking until, one by one, Jeod’s 
men emerged from the gray mist that lay upon the shore. They were 
grim and silent, with braided hair that hung to the middle of their backs, 
tar-smeared hands, and an assortment of scars even Roran respected. He 
liked what he saw, and he could tell they approved of him as well. They 
did not, however, take to Birgit. 


One of the sailors, a large brute of a man, jerked a thumb at her and ac- 
cused Jeod, “You didn’t say there’d be a woman along for the fightin’. 
How am I supposed to concentrate with some backwoods tramp getting 
in m’ way?” 


“Don’t talk about her like that,” said Nolfavrell between clenched teeth. 
“An’ her runt too?” 


In a calm voice, Jeod said, “Birgit has fought the Ra’zac. And her son has 
already killed one of Galbatorix’s best soldiers. Can you claim as much, 
Uthar?” 


“It’s not proper,” said another man. “I wouldn't feel safe with a woman 
at my side; they do naught but bring bad luck. A lady shouldn’t—’” 


Whatever he was going to say was lost, for at that instant, Birgit did a 
very unladylike thing. Stepping forward, she kicked Uthar between his 
legs and then grabbed the second man and pressed her knife against his 
throat. She held him for a moment, so everyone could see what she had 
done, then released her captive. Uthar rolled on the boards by her feet, 
holding himself and muttering a stream of curses. 


“Does anyone else have an objection?” demanded Birgit. Beside her, 


477 


Nolfavrell stared with openmouthed amazement at his mother. 


Roran pulled his hood lower to conceal his grin. Good thing they haven't 
noticed Gertrude, he thought. 


When no one else challenged Birgit, Jeod asked, “Did you bring what I 
wanted?” Each sailor reached inside his vest and divulged a weighted club 
and several lengths of rope. 


Thus armed, they worked their way down the harbor toward the 
Dragon Wing, doing their best to escape detection. Jeod kept his lantern 
shuttered the whole while. Near the dock, they hid behind a warehouse 
and watched the two lights carried by sentries bob around the deck of 
the ship. The gangway had been pulled away for the night. 


“Remember,” whispered Jeod, “the most important thing is to keep the 
alarm from being sounded until we’re ready to leave.” 


“Two men above, two men below, right?” asked Roran. 
Uthar replied, “That be the custom.” 


Roran and Uthar stripped to their breeches, tied the rope and clubs 
around their waists—Roran left his hammer behind—and then ran far- 
ther down the wharf, out of the sentries’ sight, where they lowered 
themselves into the frigid water. 


“Garr, I hate when I have to do this,” said Uthar. 
“You've done it before?” 
“Four times now. Don't stop moving or you'll freeze.” 


Clinging to the slimy piles underneath the wharf, they swam back up 
the way they had come until they reached the stone pier that led to the 
Dragon Wing, and then turned right. Uthar put his lips to Roran’s ear. “T’ll 
take the starboard anchor.” Roran nodded his agreement. 


They both dove under the black water, and there they separated. Uthar 
swam like a frog under the bow of the ship, while Roran went straight to 
the port anchor and clung to its thick chain. He untied the club from his 
waist and fit it between his teeth—as much to stop them from chattering 
as to free his hands—and prepared to wait. The rough metal sapped the 
warmth from his arms as fast as ice. 


478 


Not three minutes later, Roran heard the scuff of Birgit’s boots above 
him as she walked to the end of the pier, opposite the middle of the 
Dragon Wing, and then the faint sound of her voice as she engaged the 
sentries in conversation. Hopefully, she would keep their attention away 
from the bow. 


Now! 


Roran pulled himself hand over hand along the chain. His right shoul- 
der burned where the Ra’zac had bit him, but he pressed on. From the 
porthole where the anchor chain entered the ship, he clambered up the 
ridges that supported the painted figurehead, over the railing, and onto 
the deck. Uthar was already there, dripping and panting. 


Clubs in hand, they padded toward the aft of the ship, using whatever 
cover they could find. They stopped not ten feet behind the sentries. The 
two men leaned on the railing, bandying words with Birgit. 


In a flash, Roran and Uthar burst into the open and struck the sentries 
on the head before they could draw their sabers. Below, Birgit waved for 
Jeod and the rest of their group, and between them they raised the gang- 
way and slid one end across to the ship, where Uthar lashed it to the rail- 
ing. 


As Nolfavrell ran aboard, Roran tossed his rope to the boy and said, 
“Tie and gag these two.” 


Then everyone but Gertrude descended belowdecks to hunt for the 
remaining sentries. They found four additional men—the purser, the bo- 
sun, the ship’s cook, and the ship’s cook’s assistant—all of whom were 
trundled out of bed, knocked on the head if they resisted, and then se- 
curely trussed. In this, Birgit again proved her worth, capturing two men 


herself. 


Jeod had the unhappy prisoners placed in a line on the deck so they 
could be watched at all times, then declared, “We have much to do, and 
little time. Roran, Uthar is captain on the Dragon Wing. You and the 
others will take your orders from him.” 


For the next two hours, the ship was a frenzy of activity. The sailors 
tended to the rigging and sails, while Roran and those from Carvahall 
worked to empty the hold of extraneous supplies, such as bales of raw 
wool. These they lowered overboard to prevent anyone on the wharf 


479 


from hearing a splash. If the entire village was to fit on the Dragon Wing, 
they needed to clear as much space as possible. 


Roran was in the midst of fitting a cable around a barrel when he heard 
the hoarse cry, “Someone’s coming!” Everyone on deck, except Jeod and 
Uthar, dropped to their bellies and reached for their weapons. The two 
men who remained standing paced the ship as if they were sentries. Ro- 
ran’s heart pounded while he lay motionless, wondering what was about 
to happen. He held his breath as Jeod addressed the intruder... then foot- 
steps echoed on the gangway. 


It was Helen. 


She wore a plain dress, her hair was bound under a kerchief, and she 
carried a burlap sack over one shoulder. She spoke not a word, but 
stowed her gear in the main cabin and returned to stand by Jeod. Roran 
thought he had never seen a happier man. 


The sky above the distant mountains of the Spine had just begun to 
brighten when one of the sailors in the rigging pointed north and whis- 
tled to indicate he had spotted the villagers. 


Roran moved even faster. What time they had was now gone. He 
rushed up on deck and peered at the dark line of people advancing down 
the coast. This part of their plan depended on the fact that, unlike other 
coastal cities, Teirm’s outer wall had not been left open to the sea, but 
rather completely enclosed the bulk of the city in order to ward off fre- 
quent pirate attacks. This meant that the buildings skirting the harbor 
were left exposed—and that the villagers could walk right up to the 
Dragon Wing. 


“Hurry now, hurry!” said Jeod. 


At Uthar’s command, the sailors brought out armfuls of javelins for the 
great bows on deck, as well as casks of foul-smelling tar, which they 
knocked open and used to paint the upper half of the javelins. They then 
drew and loaded the ballistae on the starboard side; it took two men per 
bow to pull out the sinew cord until it caught on its hook. 


The villagers were two-thirds of the way to the ship before the soldiers 
patrolling the battlements of Teirm spotted them and trumpeted the 
alarm. Even before that first note faded, Uthar bellowed, “Light and fire 
“em!” 


480 


Dashing open Jeod’s lantern, Nolfavrell ran from one ballista to the 
next, holding the flame to the javelins until the tar ignited. The instant a 
missile caught, the man behind the bow pulled the release line and the 
javelin vanished with a heavy thunk. In all, twelve blazing bolts shot from 
the Dragon Wing and pierced the ships and buildings along the bay like 
roaring, red-hot meteors from the heavens above. 


“Draw and reload!” shouted Uthar. 


The creak of bending wood filled the air as every man hauled back on 
the twisted cords. Javelins were slotted in place. Once again, Nolfavrell 
made his run. Roran could feel the vibration in his feet as the ballista in 
front of him sent its deadly projectile winging on its way. 


The fire quickly spread along the waterfront, forming an impenetrable 
barrier that prevented soldiers from reaching the Dragon Wing though 
Teirm’s east gate. Roran had counted on the pillar of smoke to hide the 
ship from the archers on the battlements, but it was a near thing; a flight 
of arrows tugged at the rigging, and one dart embedded itself in the deck 
by Gertrude before the soldiers lost sight of the ship. 


From the bow, Uthar shouted, “Pick your targets at will!” 


The villagers were running pell-mell down the beach now. They 
reached the north end of the wharf, and a handful of them stumbled and 
fell as the soldiers in Teirm redirected their aim. Children screamed in 
terror. Then the villagers regained momentum. They pounded down the 
planks, past a warehouse engulfed in flame and along the pier. The pant- 
ing mob charged onto the ship in a confused mass of jostling bodies. 


Birgit and Gertrude guided the stream of people to the fore and aft 
hatches. In a few minutes, the various levels of the ship were packed to 
their limit, from the cargo hold to the captain’s cabin. Those who could 
not fit below remained huddled on deck, holding Fisk’s shields over their 
heads. 


As Roran had asked in his message, all able-bodied men from Carvahall 
clustered around the mainmast, waiting for instructions. Roran saw 
Mandel among them and tossed him a proud salute. 


Then Uthar pointed at a sailor and barked, “You there, Bonden! Get 
those swabs to the capstans and weigh anchors, then down to the oars. 
Double time!” To the rest of the men at the ballistae, he ordered, “Half of 
you leave off and take the port ballistae. Drive away any boarding par- 


481 


ties.” 


Roran was one of those who switched sides. As he prepared the ballis- 
tae, a few laggards staggered out of the acrid smoke and onto the ship. 
Beside him, Jeod and Helen hoisted the six prisoners one by one onto the 
gangway and rolled them onto the pier. 


Before Roran quite knew it, anchors had been raised, the gangway was 
cut loose, and a drum pounded beneath his feet, setting the tempo for 
the oarsmen. Ever so slowly, the Dragon Wing turned to starboard— 
toward the open sea—and then, with gathering speed, pulled away from 


the dock. 


Roran accompanied Jeod to the quarterdeck, where they watched the 
crimson inferno devour everything flammable between Teirm and the 
ocean. Through the filter of smoke, the sun appeared a flat, bloated, 
bloody orange disk as it rose over the city. 


How many have I killed now? wondered Roran. 


Echoing his thoughts, Jeod observed, “This will harm a great many in- 
nocent people.” 


Guilt made Roran respond with more force than he intended: “Would 
you rather be in Lord Risthart’s prisons? I doubt many will be injured in 
the blaze, and those that aren’t won't face death, like we will if the Em- 
pire catches us.” 


“You needn't lecture me, Roran. I know the arguments well enough. 
We did what we had to. Just don’t ask me to take pleasure in the suffer- 
ing we've caused to ensure our own safety.” 


By noon the oars had been stowed and the Dragon Wing sailed under 
her own power, propelled by favorable winds from the north. The gusts 
of air caused the rigging overhead to emit a low hum. 


The ship was miserably overcrowded, but Roran was confident that 
with some careful planning they could make it to Surda with a minimum 
of discomfort. The worst inconvenience was that of limited rations; if 
they were to avoid starvation, food would have to be dispensed in mis- 
erly portions. And in such cramped quarters, disease was an all too likely 
possibility. 


482 


After Uthar gave a brief speech about the importance of discipline on a 
ship, the villagers applied themselves to the tasks that required their im- 
mediate attention, such as tending to their wounded, unpacking their 
meager belongings, and deciding upon the most efficient sleeping ar- 
rangement for each deck. They also had to choose people to fill the vari- 
ous positions on the Dragon Wing: who would cook, who would train as 
sailors under Uthar’s men, and so forth. 


Roran was helping Elain hang a hammock when he became embroiled 
in a heated dispute between Odele, her family, and Frewin, who had ap- 
parently deserted Torson’s crew to stay with Odele. The two of them 
wanted to marry, which Odele’s parents vehemently opposed on the 
grounds that the young sailor lacked a family of his own, a respectable 
profession, and the means to provide even a modicum of comfort for 
their daughter. Roran thought it best if the enamored couple remained 
together—it seemed impractical to try and separate them while they re- 
mained confined to the same ship—but Odele’s parents refused to give 
his arguments credence. 


Frustrated, Roran said, “What would you do, then? You can’t lock her 
away, and I believe Frewin has proved his devotion more than—’ 


“Ra’zacl” 
The cry came from the crow’s nest. 


Without a second thought, Roran yanked his hammer from his belt, 
whirled about, and scrambled up the ladder through the fore hatchway, 
barking his shin on the way. He sprinted toward the knot of people on 
the quarterdeck, coming to a halt beside Horst. 


The smith pointed. 


One of the Ra’zac’s dread steeds drifted like a tattered shadow above 
the edge of the coastline, a Ra’zac on its back. Seeing the two monsters 
exposed in daylight in no way diminished the creeping horror they in- 
spired in Roran. He shuddered as the winged creature uttered its terrify- 
ing shriek, and then the Ra’zac’s insectile voice drifted across the water, 
faint but distinct: “You shall not essscape!” 


Roran looked at the ballistae, but they could not turn far enough to aim 
at the Ra’zac or its mount. “Does anyone have a bow?” 


483 


“I do,” said Baldor. He dropped to one knee and began to string his 
weapon. “Don’t let them see me.” Everyone on the quarterdeck gathered 
in a tight circle around Baldor, shielding him with their bodies from the 
Ra’zac’s malevolent gaze. 


“Why don’t they attack?” growled Horst. 


Puzzled, Roran searched for an explanation but found none. It was Jeod 
who suggested, “Perhaps it’s too bright for them. The Ra’zac hunt at 
night, and so far as I know they do not willingly venture forth from their 
lairs while the sun is yet in the sky.” 


“It’s not just that,” said Gertrude slowly. “I think they're afraid of the 
ocean.” 


“Afraid of the ocean?” scoffed Horst. 


“Watch them; they don’t fly more than a yard over the water at any 
given time.” 


“She’s right,” said Roran. At last, a weakness I can use against them! 
A few seconds later, Baldor said, “Ready!” 


At his word, the ranks of people who stood before him jumped aside, 
clearing the path for his arrow. Baldor sprang to his feet and, in a single 
motion, pulled the feather to his cheek and loosed the reed shaft. 


It was a heroic shot. The Ra’zac was at the extreme edge of a longbow’s 
range—far beyond any mark Roran had seen an archer hit—and yet Bal- 
dor’s aim was true. His arrow struck the flying creature on the right flank, 
and the beast gave a scream of pain so great that the glass on the deck 
was shattered and the stones on the shore were riven in shards. Roran 
clapped his hands over his ears to protect them from the hideous blast. 
Still screaming, the monster veered inland and dropped behind a line of 
misty hills. 


“Did you kill it?” asked Jeod, his face pale. 
“I fear not,” replied Baldor. “It was naught but a flesh wound.” 
Loring, who had just arrived, observed with satisfaction, “Aye. But at 


least you hurt him, and I'd wager they'll think twice about bothering us 
again.” 


484 


Gloom settled over Roran. “Save your triumph for later, Loring. This 
was no victory.” 


“Why not?” demanded Horst. 


“Because now the Empire knows exactly where we are.” The quarter- 
deck fell silent as they grasped the implications of what he had said. 


485 


CHILD’S PLAY 





“And this,” said Trianna, “is the latest pattern we’ve invented.” 


Nasuada took the black veil from the sorceress and ran it through her 
hands, marveling at its quality. No human could throw lace that fine. She 
gazed with satisfaction at the rows of boxes on her desk, which contained 
samples of the many designs Du Vrangr Gata now produced. “You've 
done well,” she said. “Far better than I had hoped. Tell your spellcasters 
how pleased I am with their work. It means much to the Varden.” 


Trianna inclined her head at the praise. “I will convey your message to 
them, Lady Nasuada.” 


“Have they yet—’ 


A disturbance at the doors to her quarters interrupted Nasuada. She 
heard her guards swear and raise their voices, then a yelp of pain. The 
sound of metal clashing on metal rang in the hallway. Nasuada backed 
away from the door in alarm, drawing her dagger from its sheath. 


“Run, Lady!” said Trianna. The sorceress placed herself in front of 
Nasuada and pushed back her sleeves, baring her white arms in prepara- 
tion to work magic. “Take the servants’ entrance.” 


Before Nasuada could move, the doors burst open and a small figure 
tackled her legs, knocking her to the floor. Even as Nasuada fell, a silvery 
object flashed through the space she had just occupied, burying itself in 
the far wall with a dull thud. 


Then the four guards entered, and all was confusion as Nasuada felt 
them drag her assailant off her. When Nasuada managed to stand, she saw 
Elva hanging in their grip. 


“What is the meaning of this?” demanded Nasuada. 


The black-haired girl smiled, then doubled over and retched on the 
braided rug. Afterward, she fixed her violet eyes on Nasuada and—in her 
terrible, knowing voice—she said, “Have your magician examine the wall, 
O Daughter of Ajihad, and see if I have not fulfilled my promise to you.” 


Nasuada nodded to Trianna, who glided to the splintered hole in the 
wall and muttered a spell. She returned holding a metal dart. “This was 


486 


buried in the wood.” 
“But where did it come from?” asked Nasuada, bewildered. 


Trianna gestured toward the open window overlooking the city of 
Aberon. “Somewhere out there, I guess.” 


Nasuada returned her attention to the waiting child. “What do you 
know about this, Elva?” 


The girl’s horrible smile widened. “It was an assassin.” 
“Who sent him?” 


“An assassin trained by Galbatorix himself in the dark uses of magic.” 
Her burning eyes grew half-lidded, as if she were in a trance. “The man 
hates you. He’s coming for you. He would have killed you if I hadn’t 
stopped him.” She lurched forward and retched again, spewing half- 
digested food across the floor. Nasuada gagged with revulsion. “And he’s 
about to suffer great pain.” 


“Why is that?” 


“Because I will tell you he stays in the hostel on Fane Street, in the last 
room, on the top floor. You had better hurry, or he'll get away... away.” 
She groaned like a wounded beast and clutched her belly. “Hurry, before 
Eragon’s spell forces me to stop you from hurting him. You'll be sorry, 
then!” 


Trianna was already moving as Nasuada said, “Tell Jormundur what's 
happened, then take your strongest magicians and hunt down this man. 
Capture him if you can. Kill him if you can’t.” After the sorceress left, 
Nasuada looked at her men and saw that their legs were bleeding from 
numerous small cuts. She realized what it must have cost Elva to hurt 
them. “Go,” she told them. “Find a healer who can mend your injuries.” 


The warriors shook their heads, and their captain said, “No, Ma’am. We 
will stay by your side until we know it’s safe again.” 


“As you see fit, Captain.” 
The men barricaded the windows—which worsened the already swel- 


tering heat that plagued Borromeo Castle—then everyone retreated to 
her inner chambers for further protection. 


487 


Nasuada paced, her heart pounding with delayed shock as she contem- 
plated how close she had come to being killed. What would become of the 
Varden if I died? she wondered. Who would succeed me? Dismay gripped 
her; she had made no arrangements for the Varden in the event of her 
own demise, an oversight that now seemed a monumental failing. I won't 
allow the Varden to be thrown into chaos because I failed to take precau- 
tions! 


She halted. “I am in your debt, Elva.” 

“Now and forever.” 

Nasuada faltered, disconcerted as she often was by the girl’s responses, 
then continued: “I apologize for not ordering my guards to let you pass, 
night or day. I should have anticipated an event like this.” 

“You should have,” agreed Elva in a mocking tone. 

Smoothing the front of her dress, Nasuada resumed pacing, as much to 
escape the sight of Elva’s stone-white, dragon-marked face as to disperse 
her own nervous energy. “How did you escape your rooms unaccompa- 
nied?” 

“I told my caretaker, Greta, what she wanted to hear.” 

“That’s all?” 

Elva blinked. “It made her very happy.” 

“And what of Angela?” 


“She left on an errand this morning.” 


“Well, be as that may, you have my gratitude for saving my life. Ask 
me any boon you want and I shall grant it if it’s within my power.” 


Elva glanced around the ornate bedroom, then said, “Do you have any 
food? I’m hungry.” 


488 


PREMONITION OF WAR 





Two hours later, Trianna returned, leading a pair of warriors who car- 
ried a limp body between them. At Trianna’s word, the men dropped the 
corpse on the floor. Then the sorceress said, “We found the assassin 
where Elva said we would. Drail was his name.” 


Motivated by a morbid curiosity, Nasuada examined the face of the 
man who had tried to kill her. The assassin was short, bearded, and plain- 
looking, no different from countless other men in the city. She felt a cer- 
tain connection to him, as if his attempt on her life and the fact that she 
had arranged his death in return linked them in the most intimate man- 
ner possible. “How was he killed?” she asked. “I see no marks on his 


body.” 


“He committed suicide with magic when we overwhelmed his defenses 
and entered his mind, but before we could take control of his actions.” 


“Were you able to learn anything of use before he died?” 


“We were. Drail was part of a network of agents based here in Surda 
who are loyal to Galbatorix. They are called the Black Hand. They spy on 
us, sabotage our war efforts, and—best we could determine in our brief 
glimpse into Drail’s memories—are responsible for dozens of murders 
throughout the Varden. Apparently, they've been waiting for a good 
chance to kill you ever since we arrived from Farthen Dar.” 


“Why hasn't this Black Hand assassinated King Orrin yet?” 


Trianna shrugged. “I can’t say. It may be that Galbatorix considers you 
to be more of a threat than Orrin. If that’s the case, then once the Black 
Hand realizes you are protected from their attacks’— here her gaze 
darted toward Elva—‘Orrin won't live another month unless he is 
guarded by magicians day and night. Or perhaps Galbatorix has abstained 
from such direct action because he wanted the Black Hand to remain 
unnoticed. Surda has always existed at his tolerance. Now that it’s be- 
come a threat...” 


“Can you protect Orrin as well?” asked Nasuada, turning to Elva. 
Her violet eyes seemed to glow. “Maybe if he asks nicely.” 
Nasuada’s thoughts raced as she considered how to thwart this new 


489 


menace. “Can all of Galbatorix’s agents use magic?” 


“Drail’s mind was confused, so it’s hard to tell,” said Trianna, “but I’d 
guess a fair number of them can.” 


Magic, cursed Nasuada to herself. The greatest danger the Varden faced 
from magicians—or any person trained in the use of their mind—was not 
assassination, but rather espionage. Magicians could spy on people’s 
thoughts and glean information that could be used to destroy the Varden. 
That was precisely why Nasuada and the entire command structure of 
the Varden had been taught to know when someone was touching their 
minds and how to shield themselves from such attentions. Nasuada sus- 
pected that Orrin and Hrothgar relied upon similar precautions within 
their own governments. 


However, since it was impractical for everyone privy to potentially 
damaging information to master that skill, one of Du Vrangr Gata’s many 
responsibilities was to hunt for anyone who was siphoning off facts as 
they appeared in people’s minds. The cost of such vigilance was that Du 
Vrangr Gata ended up spying on the Varden as much as on their ene- 
mies, a fact that Nasuada made sure to conceal from the bulk of her fol- 
lowers, for it would only sow hatred, distrust, and dissent. She disliked 
the practice but saw no alternative. 


What she had learned about the Black Hand hardened Nasuada’s con- 
viction that, somehow, magicians had to be governed. 


“Why,” she asked, “didn’t you discover this sooner? I can understand 
that you might miss a lone assassin, but an entire network of spellcasters 
dedicated to our destruction? Explain yourself, Trianna.” 


The sorceress’s eyes flashed with anger at the accusation. “Because here, 
unlike in Farthen Dar, we cannot examine everyone’s minds for duplic- 
ity. There are just too many people for us magicians to keep track of. 
That is why we didn't know about the Black Hand until now, Lady 
Nasuada.” 


Nasuada paused, then inclined her head. “Understood. Did you discover 
the identities of any other members of the Black Hand?” 


“A few.” 


“Good. Use them to ferret out the rest of the agents. I want you to de- 
stroy this organization for me, Trianna. Eradicate them as you would an 


490 


infestation of vermin. I'll give you however many men you need.” 
The sorceress bowed. “As you wish, Lady Nasuada.” 


At a knock on the door, the guards drew their swords and positioned 
themselves on either side of the entranceway, then their captain yanked 
open the door without warning. A young page stood outside, a fist raised 
to knock again. He stared with astonishment at the body on the floor, 
then snapped to attention as the captain asked, “What is it, boy?” 


“I have a message for Lady Nasuada from King Orrin.” 

“Then speak and be quick about it,” said Nasuada. 

The page took a moment to compose himself. “King Orrin requests 
that you attend him directly in his council chambers, for he has received 
reports from the Empire that demand your immediate attention.” 

“Is that all?” 


“Yes, Ma’am.” 


“I must attend to this. Trianna, you have your orders. Captain, will you 
leave one of your men to dispose of Drail?” 


“Aye, Ma’am.” 


“Also, please have him locate Farica, my handmaid. She will see to it 
that my study is cleaned.” 


“And what of me?” asked Elva, tilting her head. 


“You,” said Nasuada, “shall accompany me. That is, if you feel strong 
enough to do so.” 


The girl threw back her head, and from her small, round mouth ema- 
nated a cold laugh. “I’m strong enough, Nasuada. Are you?” 


Ignoring the question, Nasuada swept forth into the hallway with her 
guards clustered around her. The stones of the castle exuded an earthy 
smell in the heat. Behind her, she heard the patter of Elva’s footsteps and 
was perversely pleased that the ghastly child had to hurry to keep pace 
with the adults’ longer stride. 


491 


The guards remained behind in the vestibule to the council chambers 
while Nasuada and Elva proceeded inside. The chambers were bare to 
the point of severity, reflecting the militant nature of Surda’s existence. 
The country’s kings had devoted their resources to protecting their peo- 
ple and overthrowing Galbatorix, not to decorating Borromeo Castle 
with idle riches as the dwarves had done with Tronjheim. 


In the main room lay a rough-hewn table twelve feet long, upon which 
a map of Alagaésia was staked open with daggers at the four corners. As 
was custom, Orrin sat at the head of the table, while his various advis- 
ers—many of whom, Nasuada knew, vehemently opposed her— 
occupied the chairs farther down. The Council of Elders was also present. 
Nasuada noticed the concern on Joérmundur’s face as he looked at her and 
deduced that Trianna had indeed told him about Drail. 


“Sire, you asked for me?” 


Orrin rose. “That I did. We have now—’” He stopped in midword as he 
noticed Elva. “Ah, yes, Shining Brow. I have not had the opportunity to 
grant you audience before, though accounts of your feats have reached 
my ear and, I must confess, I have been most curious to meet you. Have 
you found the quarters I arranged for you satisfactory?” 


“They are quite nice, Sire. Thank you.” At the sound of her eerie voice, 
the voice of an adult, everyone at the table flinched. 


Irwin, the prime minister, bolted upright and pointed a quivering finger 
at Elva. “Why have you brought this... this abomination here?” 


“You forget your manners, sir,’ replied Nasuada, though she understood 
his sentiment. 


Orrin frowned. “Yes, do restrain yourself, Irwin. However, his point is 
valid, Nasuada; we cannot have this child present at our deliberations.” 


“The Empire,” she said, “has just tried to assassinate me.” The room 
echoed with cries of surprise. “If it were not for Elva’s swift action, I 
would be dead. As a result, I have taken her into my confidence; where | 


go, she goes.” Let them wonder what it is exactly Elva can do. 


“This is indeed distressing news!” exclaimed the king. “Have you caught 
the blackguard responsible?” 


Seeing the eager expressions of his advisers, Nasuada hesitated. “It 


492 


would be best to wait until I can give you an account in private, Sire.” 


Orrin appeared put out by her response, but he did not pursue the is- 
sue. “Very well. But sit, sit! We have just received the most troubling re- 
port.” After Nasuada took her place opposite him—Elva lurking behind 
her—he continued: “It seems that our spies in Gil’ead have been deceived 
as to the status of Galbatorix’s army.” 


“How so?” 


“They believe the army to be in Gil’ead, whereas we have here a mis- 
sive from one of our men in Urt’baen, who says that he witnessed a great 
host march south past the capital a week and a half ago. It was night, so 
he could not be sure of their numbers, but he was certain that the host 
was far larger than the sixteen thousand that form the core of Galba- 
torix’s troops. There may have been as many as a hundred thousand sol- 
diers, or more.” 


A hundred thousand! A cold pit of fear settled in Nasuada’s stomach. 
“Can we trust your source?” 


“His intelligence has always been reliable.” 


“I don’t understand,” said Nasuada. “How could Galbatorix move that 
many men without our knowing of it before? The supply trains alone 
would be miles long. It’s been obvious the army was mobilizing, but the 
Empire was nowhere near ready to deploy.” 


Falberd spoke then, slapping a heavy hand on the table for emphasis: 
“We were outfoxed. Our spies must have been deceived with magic to 
think the army was still in their barracks in Gil’ead.” 


Nasuada felt the blood drain from her face. “The only person strong 
enough to sustain an illusion of that size and duration—’ 


“Is Galbatorix himself,” completed Orrin. “That was our conclusion. It 
means that Galbatorix has finally abandoned his lair in favor of open 
combat. Even as we speak, the black foe approaches.” 


Irwin leaned forward. “The question now is how we should respond. 
We must confront this threat, of course, but in what manner? Where, 
when, and how? Our own forces aren't prepared for a campaign of this 
magnitude, while yours, Lady Nasuada—the Varden—are already accus- 
tomed to the fierce clamor of war.” 


493 


“What do you mean to imply?” That we should die for you? 
“I but made an observation. Take it how you will.” 


Then Orrin said, “Alone, we will be crushed against an army so large. 
We must have allies, and above all else we must have Eragon, especially 
if we are to confront Galbatorix. Nasuada, will you send for him?” 


“I would if I could, but until Arya returns, I have no way to contact the 
elves or to summon Eragon.” 


“In that case,” said Orrin in a heavy voice, “we must hope that she ar- 
rives before it is too late. I do not suppose we can expect the elves’ assis- 
tance in this affair. While a dragon may traverse the leagues between 
Aberon and Ellesméra with the speed of a falcon, it would be impossible 
for the elves to marshal themselves and cross that same distance before 
the Empire reaches us. That leaves only the dwarves. I know that you 
have been friends with Hrothgar for many years; will you send him a plea 
for help on our behalf? The dwarves have always promised they would 
fight when the time came.” 


Nasuada nodded. “Du Vrangr Gata has an arrangement with certain 
dwarf magicians that allows us to transfer messages instantaneously. I will 
convey your—our—request. And I will ask Hrothgar to send an emissary 
to Ceris to inform the elves of the situation so that they are forewarned, 
if nothing else.” 


“Good. We are quite a ways from Farthen Dar, but if we can delay the 
Empire for even a week, the dwarves might be able to get here in time.” 


The discussion that followed was an exceedingly grim one. Various tac- 
tics existed for defeating a larger—although not necessarily superior— 
force, but no one at the table could imagine how they might defeat Gal- 
batorix, especially when Eragon was still so powerless compared to the 
ancient king. The only ploy that might succeed would be to surround Er- 
agon with as many magicians, dwarf and human, as possible, and then at- 
tempt to force Galbatorix to confront them alone. The problem with that 
plan, thought Nasuada, is that Galbatorix overcame far more formidable 
enemies during his destruction of the Riders, and his strength has only 
grown since. She was certain that this had occurred to everyone else as 
well. If we but had the elves’ spellweavers to swell our ranks, then victory 
might be within our reach. Without them... If we cannot overthrow Galba- 
torix, the only avenue left may be to flee Alagaésia across the sundering sea 


494 


and find a new land in which to build a life for ourselves. There we could 
wait until Galbatorix is no more. Even he cannot endure forever. The only 
certainty is that, eventually, all things shall pass. 


They moved on then from tactics to logistics, and here the debate be- 
came far more acrimonious as the Council of Elders argued with Orrin’s 
advisers over the distribution of responsibilities between the Varden and 
Surda: who should pay for this or that, provide rations for laborers who 
worked for both groups, manage the provisions for their respective war- 
riors, and how numerous other related subjects should be dealt with. 


In the midst of the verbal fray, Orrin pulled a scroll from his belt and 
said to Nasuada, “On the matter of finances, would you be so kind as to 
explain a rather curious item that was brought to my attention?” 


‘Tll do my best, Sire.” 


“I hold in my hand a complaint from the weavers’ guild, which asserts 
that weavers throughout Surda have lost a good share of their profits be- 
cause the textile market has been inundated with extraordinarily cheap 
lace—lace they swear originates with the Varden.” A pained look crossed 
his face. “It seems foolish to even ask, but does their claim have basis in 
fact, and if so, why would the Varden do such a thing?” 


Nasuada made no attempt to hide her smile. “If you remember, Sire, 
when you refused to lend the Varden more gold, you advised me to find 
another way for us to support ourselves.” 


“So I did. What of it?” asked Orrin, narrowing his eyes. 


“Well, it struck me that while lace takes a long time to make by hand, 
which is why it’s so expensive, lace is quite easy to produce using magic 
due to the small amount of energy involved. You of all people, as a natu- 
ral philosopher, should appreciate that. By selling our lace here and in the 
Empire, we have been able to fully fund our efforts. The Varden no 
longer want for food or shelter.” 


Few things in her life pleased Nasuada so much as Orrin’s incredulous 
expression at that instant. The scroll frozen halfway between his chin and 
the table, his slightly parted mouth, and the quizzical frown upon his 
brow conspired to give him the stunned appearance of a man who had 
just seen something he did not understand. She savored the sight. 


“Lace?” he sputtered. 


495 


“Yes, Sire.” 

“You can't fight Galbatorix with lace 1” 

“Why not, Sire?” 

He struggled for a moment, then growled, “Because... because it’s not 
respectable, that’s why. What bard would compose an epic about our 
deeds and write about lace ?” 

“We do not fight in order to have epics written in our praise.” 

“Then blast epics! How am I supposed to answer the weavers’ guild? By 
selling your lace so cheaply, you hurt people’s livelihoods and undermine 
our economy. It won't do. It won't do at all.” 

Letting her smile become sweet and warm, Nasuada said in her friend- 
liest tone, “Oh dear. If it’s too much of a burden for your treasury, the 
Varden would be more than willing to offer you a loan in return for the 


kindness you've shown us... at a suitable rate of interest, of course.” 


The Council of Elders managed to maintain their decorum, but behind 
Nasuada, Elva uttered a quick laugh of amusement. 


496 


RED BLADE, WHITE BLADE 





The moment the sun appeared over the tree-lined horizon, Eragon 
deepened his breathing, willed his heart to quicken, and opened his eyes 
as he returned to full awareness. He had not been asleep, for he had not 
slept since his transformation. When he felt weary and lay himself down 
to rest, he entered a state that was unto a waking dream. There he beheld 
many wondrous visions and walked among the gray shades of his memo- 
ries, yet all the while remained aware of his surroundings. 


He watched the sunrise and thoughts of Arya filled his mind, as they 
had every hour since the Agaeti Blédhren two days before. The morning 
after the celebration, he had gone looking for her in Tialdari Hall— 
intending to try and make amends for his behavior—only to discover that 
she had already left for Surda. When will I see her again? he wondered. In 
the clear light of day, he had realized just how much the elves’ and drag- 
ons’ magic had dulled his wits during the Agaeti Blédhren. I may have 
acted a fool, but it wasn’t entirely my fault. I was no more responsible for 
my conduct than if I were drunk. 


Still, he had meant every word he said to Arya—even if normally he 
would not have revealed so much of himself. Her rejection cut Eragon to 
the quick. Freed of the enchantments that had clouded his mind, he was 
forced to admit that she was probably right, that the difference between 
their ages was too great to overcome. It was a difficult thing for him to 
accept, and once he had, the knowledge only increased his anguish. 


Eragon had heard the expression “heartbroken” before. Until then, he 
always considered it a fanciful description, not an actual physical symp- 
tom. But now he felt a deep ache in his chest—like that of a sore mus- 
cle—and each beat of his heart pained him. 


His only comfort was Saphira. In those two days, she had never criti- 
cized what he had done, nor did she leave his side for more than a few 
minutes at a time, lending him the support of her companionship. She 
talked to him a great deal as well, doing her best to draw him out of his 
shell of silence. 


To keep himself from brooding over Arya, Eragon took Orik’s puzzle 
ring from his nightstand and rolled it between his fingers, marveling at 
how keen his senses had become. He could feel every flaw in the twisted 
metal. As he studied the ring, he perceived a pattern in the arrangement 
of the gold bands, a pattern that had escaped him before. Trusting his in- 


497 


stinct, he manipulated the bands in the sequence suggested by his obser- 
vation. To his delight, the eight pieces fit together perfectly, forming a 
solid whole. He slid the ring onto the fourth finger of his right hand, ad- 
miring how the woven bands caught the light. 


You could not do that before, observed Saphira from the bowl in the 
floor where she slept. 


I can see many things that were once hidden to me. 


Eragon went to the wash closet and performed his morning ablutions, 
including removing the stubble from his cheeks with a spell. Despite the 
fact that he now closely resembled an elf, he had retained the ability to 
grow a beard. 


Orik was waiting for them when Eragon and Saphira arrived at the 
sparring field. His eyes brightened as Eragon lifted his hand and displayed 
the completed puzzle ring. “You solved it, then!” 


“It took me longer than I expected,” said Eragon, “but yes. Are you here 
to practice as well?” 


“Eh. I already got in a bit o’ ax work with an elf who took a rather 
fiendish delight in cracking me over the head. No... I came to watch you 


fight.” 
“You've seen me fight before,” pointed out Eragon. 
“Not for a while, I haven't.” 


“You mean you're curious to see how I’ve changed.” Orik shrugged in 
response. 


Vanir approached from across the field. He cried, “Are you ready, 
Shadeslayer?” The elf’s condescending demeanor had lessened since their 
last duel before the Agaeti Blédhren, but not by much. 


“I’m ready.” 


Eragon and Vanir squared off against each other in an open area of the 
field. Emptying his mind, Eragon grasped and drew Zar’roc as fast as he 
could. To his surprise, the sword felt as if it weighed no more than a wil- 
low wand. Without the expected resistance, Eragon’s arm snapped 
straight, tearing the sword from his hand and sending it whirling twenty 


498 


yards to his right, where it buried itself in the trunk of a pine tree. 
“Can you not even hold on to your blade, Rider?” demanded Vanir. 


“I apologize, Vanir-vodhr,” gasped Eragon. He clutched his elbow, rub- 
bing the bruised joint to lessen the pain. “I misjudged my strength.” 


“See that it does not happen again.” Going to the tree, Vanir gripped 
Zar roc’s hilt and tried to pull the sword free. The weapon remained mo- 
tionless. Vanir’s eyebrows met as he frowned at the unyielding crimson 
blade, as if he suspected some form of trickery. Bracing himself, the elf 
heaved backward and, with the crack of wood, yanked Zar'roc out of the 
pine. 


Eragon accepted the sword from Vanir and hefted Zar’roc, troubled by 
how light it was. Something's wrong, he thought. 


“Take your place!” 


This time it was Vanir who initiated the fight. In a single bound, he 
crossed the distance between them and thrust his blade toward Eragon’s 
right shoulder. To Eragon, it seemed as if the elf moved slower than 
usual, as if Vanir’s reflexes had been reduced to the level of a humans. It 
was easy for Eragon to deflect Vanir's sword, blue sparks flying from the 
metal as their blades grated against one another. 


Vanir landed with an astonished expression. He struck again, and Er- 
agon evaded the sword by leaning back, like a tree swaying in the wind. 
In quick succession, Vanir rained a score of heavy blows upon Eragon, 
each of which Eragon dodged or blocked, using Zar’roc’s sheath as often 
as the sword to foil Vanir's onslaught. 


Eragon soon realized that the spectral dragon from the Agaeti Blédhren 
had done more than alter his appearance; it had also granted him the 
elves’ physical abilities. In strength and speed, Eragon now matched even 
the most athletic elf. 


Fired by that knowledge and a desire to test his limits, Eragon jumped 
as high as he could. Zar’roc flashed crimson in the sunlight as he flew 
skyward, soaring more than ten feet above the ground before he flipped 
like an acrobat and came down behind Vanir, facing the direction from 


which he had started. 


A fierce laugh erupted from Eragon. No more was he helpless before 


499 


elves, Shades, and other creatures of magic. No more would he suffer the 
elves’ contempt. No more would he have to rely on Saphira or Arya to 
rescue him from enemies like Durza. 


He charged Vanir, and the field rang with a furious din as they strove 
against each other, raging back and forth upon the trampled grass. The 
force of their blows created gusts of wind that whipped their hair into 
tangled disarray. Overhead, the trees shook and dropped their needles. 
The duel lasted long into the morning, for even with Eragon’s newfound 
skill, Vanir was still a formidable opponent. But in the end, Eragon would 
not be denied. Playing Zar'roc in a circle, he darted past Vanir’s guard and 
struck him upon the upper arm, breaking the bone. 


Vanir dropped his blade, his face turning white with shock. “How swift 
is your sword,” he said, and Eragon recognized the famous line from The 
Lay of Umhodan. 


“By the gods!” exclaimed Orik. “That was the best swordsmanship I’ve 
ever seen, and I was there when you fought Arya in Farthen Dar.” 


Then Vanir did what Eragon had never expected: the elf twisted his 
uninjured hand in the gesture of fealty, placed it upon his sternum, and 
bowed. “I beg your pardon for my earlier behavior, Eragon-elda. I thought 
that you had consigned my race to the void, and out of my fear I acted 
most shamefully. However, it seems that your race no longer endangers 
our cause.” In a grudging voice, he added: “You are now worthy of the ti- 
tle Rider.” 


Eragon bowed in return. “You honor me. I’m sorry that I injured you so 
badly. Will you allow me to heal your arm?” 


“No, I shall let nature tend to it at her own pace, as a memento that I 
once crossed blades with Eragon Shadeslayer. You needn't fear that it will 
disrupt our sparring tomorrow; I am equally good with my left hand.” 


They both bowed again, and then Vanir departed. 

Orik slapped a hand on his thigh and said, “Now we have a chance at 
victory, a real chance! I can feel it in my bones. Bones like stone, they say. 
Ah, this'll please Hrothgar and Nasuada to no end.” 

Eragon kept his peace and concentrated on removing the block from 


Zar'roc’s edges, but he said to Saphira, If brawn were all that was required 
to depose Galbatorix, the elves would have done it long ago. Still, he could 


500 


not help being pleased by his heightened prowess, as well as by his long- 
awaited reprieve from the torment of his back. Without the constant 
bursts of pain, it was as if a haze had been lifted from his mind, allowing 
him to think clearly once again. 


A few minutes remained before they were supposed to meet with 
Oromis and Glaedr, so Eragon took his bow and quiver from where they 
hung on Saphira’s back and walked to the range where elves practiced 
archery. Since the elves’ bows were much more powerful than his, their 
padded targets were both too small and too far away for him. He had to 
shoot from halfway down the range. 


Taking his place, Eragon nocked an arrow and slowly pulled back the 
string, delighted by how easy it had become. He aimed, released the ar- 
row, and held his position, waiting to see if he would hit his mark. Like a 
maddened hornet, the dart buzzed toward the target and buried itself in 
the center. He grinned. Again and again, he fired at the target, his speed 
increasing with his confidence until he loosed thirty arrows in a minute. 


At the thirty-first arrow, he pulled on the string slightly harder than he 
had ever done—or was capable of doing—before. With an explosive re- 
port, the yew bow broke in half underneath his left hand, scratching his 
fingers and discharging a burst of splinters from the back of the bow. His 
hand went numb from the jolt. 


Eragon stared at the remains of his weapon, dismayed by the loss. Gar- 
row had made it as a birthday present for him over three years ago. Since 
then, hardly a week went by when Eragon had not used his bow. It had 
helped him to provide food for his family on numerous occasions when 
they would have otherwise gone hungry. With it, he had killed his first 
deer. With it, he had killed his first Urgal. And through it, he had first 
used magic. Losing his bow was like losing an old friend who could be 
relied upon in even the worst situation. 


Saphira sniffed the two pieces of wood dangling from his grip and said, 
It seems you need a new stick thrower. He grunted—in no mood to talk— 
and stomped out to retrieve his arrows. 


From the open field, he and Saphira flew to the white Crags of 
Tel’naeir and presented themselves to Oromis, who was seated on a stool 
in front of his hut, gazing out over the cliff with his farseeing eyes. He 
said, “Have you entirely recovered, Eragon, from the potent magic of the 
Blood-oath Celebration?” 


501 


“T have, Master.” 


A long silence followed as Oromis drank from a cup of blackberry tea 
and resumed contemplating the ancient forest. Eragon waited without 
complaint; he was used to such pauses when dealing with the old Rider. 
At length, Oromis said, “Glaedr explained to me, as best he could, what 
was done to you during the celebration. Such a thing has never before oc- 
curred in the history of the Riders.... Once again, the dragons have proved 
themselves capable of far more than we imagined.” He sipped his tea. 
“Glaedr was uncertain exactly what changes you would experience, so | 
would like you to describe the full extent of your transformation, includ- 
ing your appearance.” 


Eragon quickly summarized how he had been altered, detailing the in- 
creased sensitivity of his sight, smell, hearing, and touch, and ending with 
an account of his clash with Vanir. 


“And how,” asked Oromis, “do you feel about this? Do you resent that 
your body was manipulated without your permission?” 


“No, no! Not at all. I might have resented it before the battle of Farthen 
Dar, but now I’m just grateful that my back doesn’t hurt anymore. | 
would have willingly submitted myself to far greater changes in order to 
escape Durza’s curse. No, my only response is gratitude.” 


Oromis nodded. “I am glad that you are wise enough to take that posi- 
tion, for your gift is worth more than all the gold in the world. With it, I 
believe that our feet are at last set upon the correct path.” Again, he 
sipped his tea. “Let us proceed. Saphira, Glaedr expects you at the Stone 
of Broken Eggs. Eragon, you will begin today with the third level of 
Rimgar, if you can. I would know everything you are capable of.” 


Eragon started toward the square of tamped earth where they usually 
performed the Dance of Snake and Crane, then hesitated when the silver- 
haired elf remained behind. “Master, won’t you join me?” 


A sad smile graced Oromis’s face. “Not today, Eragon. The spells re- 
quired by the Blood-oath Celebration exacted a heavy toll from me. That 
and my... condition. It took the last of my strength to come sit outside.” 


“I am sorry, Master.” Does he resent that the dragons didn’t choose to heal 


him as well? wondered Eragon. He immediately discounted the thought; 
Oromis would never be so petty. 


502 


“Do not be. It is no fault of yours that I am crippled.” 


As Eragon struggled to complete the third level of the Rimgar, it be- 
came obvious that he still lacked the elves’ balance and flexibility, two 
attributes that even the elves had to work to acquire. In a way, he wel- 
comed those limitations, for if he was perfect, what was left for him to 
accomplish? 


The following weeks were difficult for Eragon. On one hand, he made 
enormous progress with his training, mastering subject after subject that 
had once confounded him. He still found Oromis’s lessons challenging, 
but he no longer felt as if he were drowning in a sea of his own inade- 
quacy. It was easier for Eragon to read and write, and his increased 
strength meant that he could now cast elven spells that required so much 
energy, they would kill any normal human. His strength also made him 
aware of how weak Oromis was compared to other elves. 


And yet, despite those accomplishments, Eragon experienced a growing 
sense of discontent. No matter how hard he tried to forget Arya, every 
day that passed increased his yearning, an agony made worse by knowing 
that she did not want to see or talk with him. But more than that, it 
seemed to him as if an ominous storm was gathering beyond the edge of 
the horizon, a storm that threatened to break at any moment and sweep 
across the land, devastating everything in its path. 


Saphira shared his unease. She said, The world is stretched thin, Eragon. 
Soon it will snap and madness will burst forth. What you feel is what we 
dragons feel and what the elves feel—the inexorable march of grim fate as 
the end of our age approaches. Weep for those who will die in the chaos that 
shall consume Alagaésia. And hope that we may win a brighter future by 
the strength of your sword and shield and my fangs and talons. 


523 


VISIONS NEAR AND FAR 





The day came when Eragon went to the glade beyond Oromis’s hut, 
seated himself on the polished white stump in the center of the mossy 
hollow, and—when he opened his mind to observe the creatures around 
him—sensed not just the birds, beasts, and insects but also the plants of 
the forest. 


The plants possessed a different type of consciousness than animals: 
slow, deliberate, and decentralized, but in their own way just as cogni- 
zant of their surroundings as Eragon himself was. The faint pulse of the 
plants’ awareness bathed the galaxy of stars that wheeled behind his 
eyes—each bright spark representing a life—in a soft, omnipresent glow. 
Even the most barren soil teemed with organisms; the land itself was 
alive and sentient. 


Intelligent life, he concluded, existed everywhere. 


As Eragon immersed himself in the thoughts and feelings of the beings 
around him, he was able to attain a state of inner peace so profound that, 
during that time, he ceased to exist as an individual. He allowed himself 
to become a nonentity, a void, a receptacle for the voices of the world. 
Nothing escaped his attention, for his attention was focused on nothing. 


He was the forest and its inhabitants. 


Is that what a god feels like? wondered Eragon when he returned to 
himself. 


He left the glade, sought out Oromis in his hut, and knelt before the 
elf, saying, “Master, I have done as you told me to. I listened until I heard 
no more.” 


Oromis paused in his writing and, with a thoughtful expression, looked 
at Eragon. “Tell me.” For an hour and a half, Eragon waxed eloquent 
about every aspect of the plants and animals that populated the glade, 
until Oromis raised his hand and said, “I am convinced; you heard all 
there was to hear. But did you understand it all?” 


“No, Master.” 


“That is as it should be. Comprehension will come with age... Well 
done, Eragon-finiarel. Well done indeed. If you were my student in Ilirea, 


504 


before Galbatorix rose to power, you would have just graduated from 
your apprenticeship and would be considered a full member of our order 
and accorded the same rights and privileges as even the oldest Riders.” 
Oromis pushed himself up out of his chair and then remained standing in 
place, swaying. “Lend me your shoulder, Eragon, and help me outside. My 
limbs betray my will.” 


Hurrying to his master’s side, Eragon supported the elf’s slight weight as 
Oromis hobbled to the brook that rushed headlong toward the edge of 
the Crags of Tel’naeir. “Now that you have reached this stage in your 
education, I can teach you one of the greatest secrets of magic, a secret 
that even Galbatorix may not know. It is your best hope of matching his 
power.” The elf’s gaze sharpened. “What is the cost of magic, Eragon?” 


“Energy. A spell costs the same amount of energy as it would to com- 
plete the task through mundane means.” 


Oromis nodded. “And where does the energy come from?” 
“The spellcaster’s body.” 
“Does it have to?” 


Eragon’s mind raced as he considered the awesome implications of 
Oromis’s question. “You mean it can come from other sources?” 


“That is exactly what happens whenever Saphira assists you with a 
spell.” 


“Yes, but she and I share a unique connection,” protested Eragon. “Our 
bond is the reason I can draw upon her strength. To do that with some- 
one else, I would have to enter...” He trailed off as he realized what 
Oromis was driving at. 


“You would have to enter the consciousness of the being—or beings— 
who was going to provide the energy,” said Oromis, completing Eragon’s 
thought. “Today you proved that you can do just that with even the 
smallest form of life. Now...” He stopped and pressed a hand against his 
chest as he coughed, then continued, “I want you to extract a sphere of 
water from the stream, using only the energy you can glean from the for- 
est around you.” 


“Yes, Master.” 


5°95 


As Eragon reached out to the nearby plants and animals, he felt 
Oromis’s mind brush against his own, the elf watching and judging his 
progress. Frowning with concentration, Eragon endeavored to eke the 
needed force from the environment and hold it within himself until he 
was ready to release the magic... 


“Eragon! Do not take it from me! I am weak enough as is.” 


Startled, Eragon realized that he had included Oromis in his search. “I’m 
sorry, Master,” he said, chastised. He resumed the process, careful to 
avoid draining the elf’s vitality, and when he was ready, commanded, 
“Up!” 


Silent as the night, a sphere of water a foot wide rose from the brook 
until it floated at eye level across from Eragon. And while Eragon experi- 
enced the usual strain that results from intense effort, the spell itself 
caused him no fatigue. 


The sphere was only in the air for a moment when a wave of death 
rolled through the smaller creatures Eragon was in contact with. A line of 
ants keeled over motionless. A baby mouse gasped and entered the void 
as it lost the strength to keep its heart beating. Countless plants withered 
and crumbled and became inert as dust. 


Eragon flinched, horrified by what he had caused. Given his new re- 
spect for the sanctity of life, he found the crime appalling. What made it 
worse was that he was intimately linked with each being as it ceased to 
exist; it was as if he himself were dying over and over. He severed the 
flow of magic—letting the sphere of water splash across the ground—and 
then whirled on Oromis and growled, “You knew that would happen!” 


An expression of profound sorrow engulfed the ancient Rider. “It was 
necessary,” he replied. 


“Necessary that so many had to die?” 

“Necessary that you understand the terrible price of using this type of 
magic. Mere words cannot convey the feeling of having those whose 
minds you share die. You had to experience it for yourself.” 


“I won't do that again,” vowed Eragon. 


“Nor will you have to. If you are disciplined, you can choose to draw 
the power only from plants and animals that can withstand the loss. It’s 


506 


impractical in battle, but you may do so in your lessons.” Oromis gestured 
at him, and, still simmering, Eragon allowed the elf to lean on him as they 
returned to the hut. “You see why this technique was not taught to 
younger riders. If it were to become known to a spellweaver of evil dis- 
position, he or she could wreak vast amounts of destruction, especially 
since it would be difficult to stop anyone with access to so much power.” 
Once they were back inside, the elf sighed, lowered himself into his 
chair, and pressed the tips of his fingers together. 


Eragon sat as well. “Since it’s possible to absorb energy from’— he 
waved his hand—“from life, is it also possible to absorb it directly from 
light or fire or from any of the other forms of energy?” 


“Ah, Eragon, if it were, we could destroy Galbatorix in an instant. We 
can exchange energy with other living beings, we can use that energy to 
move our bodies or to fuel a spell, and we can even store that energy in 
certain objects for later use, but we cannot assimilate the fundamental 
forces of nature. Reason says that it can be done, but no one has managed 
to devise a spell that allows it.” 


Nine days later, Eragon presented himself to Oromis and said, “Master, 
it struck me last night that neither you nor the hundreds of elven scrolls 
I’ve read have mentioned your religion. What do elves believe?” 


A long sigh was Oromis’s first answer. Then: “We believe that the 
world behaves according to certain inviolable rules and that, by persistent 
effort, we can discover those rules and use them to predict events when 
circumstances repeat.” 


Eragon blinked. That did not tell him what he wanted to know. “But 
who, or what, do you worship?” 


“Nothing.” 

“You worship the concept of nothing?” 

“No, Eragon. We do not worship at all.” 

The thought was so alien, it took Eragon several moments to grasp 
what Oromis meant. The villagers of Carvahall lacked a single overriding 


doctrine, but they did share a collection of superstitions and rituals, most 
of which concerned warding off bad luck. During the course of his train- 


Sey 


ing, it had dawned upon Eragon that many of the phenomena that the 
villagers attributed to supernatural sources were in fact natural processes, 
such as when he learned in his meditations that maggots hatched from fly 
eggs instead of spontaneously arising from the dirt, as he had thought be- 
fore. Nor did it make sense for him to put out an offering of food to keep 
sprites from turning the milk sour when he knew that sour milk was ac- 
tually caused by a proliferation of tiny organisms in the liquid. Still, Er- 
agon remained convinced that otherworldly forces influenced the world 
in mysterious ways, a belief that his exposure to the dwarves’ religion had 
bolstered. He said, “Where do you think the world came from, then, if it 
wasn’t created by the gods?” 


“Which gods, Eragon?” 
“Your gods, the dwarf gods, our gods... someone must have created it.” 


Oromis raised an eyebrow. “I would not necessarily agree with you. But 
be as that may, I cannot prove that gods do not exist. Nor can I prove 
that the world and everything in it was not created by an entity or enti- 
ties in the distant past. But I can tell you that in the millennia we elves 
have studied nature, we have never witnessed an instance where the rules 
that govern the world have been broken. That is, we have never seen a 
miracle. Many events have defied our ability to explain, but we are con- 
vinced that we failed because we are still woefully ignorant about the 
universe and not because a deity altered the workings of nature.” 


“A god wouldn't have to alter nature to accomplish his will,” asserted 
Eragon. “He could do it within the system that already exists... He could 
use magic to affect events.” 


Oromis smiled. “Very true. But ask yourself this, Eragon: If gods exist, 
have they been good custodians of Alagaésia? Death, sickness, poverty, 
tyranny, and countless other miseries stalk the land. If this is the handi- 
work of divine beings, then they are to be rebelled against and over- 
thrown, not given obeisance, obedience, and reverence.” 


“The dwarves believe—” 
“Exactly! The dwarves believe. When it comes to certain matters, they 
rely upon faith rather than reason. They have even been known to ignore 


proven facts that contradict their dogma.” 


“Like what?” demanded Eragon. 


508 


“Dwarf priests use coral as proof that stone is alive and can grow, which 
also corroborates their story that Helzvog formed the race of dwarves out 
of granite. But we elves discovered that coral is actually an exoskeleton 
secreted by minuscule animals that live inside the coral. Any magician 
can sense the animals if he opens his mind. We explained this to the 
dwarves, but they refused to listen, saying that the life we felt resides in 
every kind of stone, although their priests are the only ones who are sup- 
posed to be able to detect the life in landlocked stones.” 


For a long time, Eragon stared out the window, turning Oromis’s words 
over in his mind. “You don’t believe in an afterlife, then.” 


“From what Glaedr said, you already knew that.” 
“And you don’t put stock in gods.” 


“We give credence only to that which we can prove exists. Since we 
cannot find evidence that gods, miracles, and other supernatural things 
are real, we do not trouble ourselves about them. If that were to change, 
if Helzvog were to reveal himself to us, then we would accept the new 
information and revise our position.” 


“It seems a cold world without something... more.” 


“On the contrary,” said Oromis, “it is a better world. A place where we 
are responsible for our own actions, where we can be kind to one another 
because we want to and because it is the right thing to do instead of be- 
ing frightened into behaving by the threat of divine punishment. I won't 
tell you what to believe, Eragon. It is far better to be taught to think 
critically and then be allowed to make your own decisions than to have 
someone else’s notions thrust upon you. You asked after our religion, and 
I have answered you true. Make of it what you will.” 


Their discussion—coupled with his previous worries—left Eragon so 
disturbed that he had difficulty concentrating on his studies in the fol- 
lowing days, even when Oromis began to show him how to sing to 
plants, which Eragon had been eager to learn. 


Eragon recognized that his own experiences had already led him to 
adopt a more skeptical attitude; in principle, he agreed with much of 
what Oromis had said. The problem he struggled with, though, was that 
if the elves were right, it meant that nearly all the humans and dwarves 


5°09 


were deluded, something Eragon found difficult to accept. That many 
people can’t be mistaken, he insisted to himself. 


When he asked Saphira about it, she said, It matters little to me, Eragon. 
Dragons have never believed in higher powers. Why should we when deer 
and other prey consider usto be a higher power? He laughed at that. Only 
do not ignore reality in order to comfort yourself, for once you do, you make 
it easy for others to deceive you. 


That night, Eragon’s uncertainties burst forth in his waking dreams, 
which raged like a wounded bear through his mind, tearing disparate im- 
ages from his memories and mixing them into such a clamor, he felt as if 
he were transported back into the confusion of the battle under Farthen 
Dar. He saw Garrow lying dead in Horst’s house, then Brom dead in the 
lonely sandstone cave, and then the face of Angela the herbalist, who whis- 
pered, “Beware, Argetlam, betrayal is clear. And it will come from within 
your family. Beware, Shadeslayer!” 


Then the crimson sky was torn apart and Eragon again beheld the two 
armies from his premonition in the Beor Mountains. The banks of warriors 
collided upon an orange and yellow field, accompanied by the harsh 
screams of gore-crows and the whistle of black arrows. The earth itself 
seemed to burn: green flames belched from scorched holes that dotted the 
ground, charring the mangled corpses left in the armies’ wake. He heard the 
roar of a gigantic beast from above that rapidly app— 


Eragon jolted upright in bed and scrabbled at the dwarf necklace, 
which burned at his throat. Using his tunic to protect his hand, he pulled 
the silver hammer away from his skin and then sat and waited in the 
dark, his heart thudding from the surprise. He felt his strength ebb as 
Gannel’s spell thwarted whoever was trying to scry him and Saphira. 
Once again, he wondered if Galbatorix himself was behind the spell, or if 
it was one of the king’s pet magicians. 


Eragon frowned and released the hammer as the metal grew cold again. 
Something's wrong. I know that much, and I’ve known it for a while, as has 
Saphira. Too uneasy to resume the trancelike state that had replaced 
sleep for him, he crept from their bedroom without waking Saphira and 
climbed the spiral staircase to the study. There he unshuttered a white 
lantern and read one of Analisia’s epics until sunrise in an attempt to 
calm himself. 


Just as Eragon put away the scroll, Blagden flew through the open por- 
tal in the eastern wall and, with a flutter of wings, landed on the corner 


510 


of the carved writing desk. The white raven fixed his beady eyes on Er- 
agon and croaked, “Wyrda!” 


Eragon inclined his head. “And may the stars watch over you, Master 
Blagden.” 


The raven hopped closer. He cocked his head to the side and uttered a 
barking cough, as if he were clearing his throat, then recited in his hoarse 
voice: 

By beak and bone, 


Mine blackened stone 


Sees rooks and crooks 


And bloody brooks! 


“What does that mean?” asked Eragon. 

Blagden shrugged and repeated the verse. When Eragon still pressed 
him for an explanation, the bird ruffled his feathers, appearing displeased, 
and cackled, “Son and father alike, both as blind as bats.” 


“Wait!” exclaimed Eragon, jolting upright. “Do you know my father? 
Who is he?” 


Blagden cackled again. This time he seemed to be laughing. 


While two may share two, 

And one of two is certainly one, 

One might be two. 

“A name, Blagden. Give me a name!” When the raven remained silent, 
Eragon reached out with his mind, intending to wrench the information 


from the bird’s memories. 


Blagden was too wily, however. He deflected Eragon’s probe with a 


511 


flick of his thoughts. Shrieking “Wyrda!” he darted forward, plucked a 
bright glass stopper from an inkwell, and sped away with his trophy 
clutched in his beak. He dove out of sight before Eragon could cast a 
spell to bring him back. 


Eragon’s stomach knotted as he tried to decipher Blagden’s two riddles. 
The last thing he had expected was to hear his father mentioned in 
Ellesméra. Finally, he muttered, “That's it.” I’ll find Blagden later and 
wring the truth out of him. But right now... I would have to be a half-wit to 
ignore these portents. He jumped to his feet and ran down the stairs, wak- 
ing Saphira with his mind and telling her what had transpired during the 
night. Retrieving his shaving mirror from the wash closet, Eragon sat be- 
tween Saphira’s two front paws so that she could look over his head and 
see what he saw. 


Arya won't appreciate it if we intrude on her privacy, warned Saphira. 
I have to know if she’s safe. 


Saphira accepted that without argument. How will you find her? You 
said that after her imprisonment, she erected wards that—like your neck- 
lace—prevent anyone from scrying her. 


If I can scry the people she’s with, I might be able to figure out how Arya 
is. Concentrating on an image of Nasuada, Eragon passed his hand over 
the mirror and murmured the traditional phrase, “Dream stare.” 


The mirror shimmered and turned white, except for nine people clus- 
tered around an invisible table. Of them, Eragon was familiar with 
Nasuada and the Council of Elders. But he could not identify a strange 
girl hooded in black who lurked behind Nasuada. This puzzled him, for a 
magician could only scry things that he had already seen, and Eragon was 
certain he had never laid eyes upon the girl before. He forgot about her, 
though, as he noticed that the men, and even Nasuada, were armed for 
battle. 


Let us hear their words, suggested Saphira. 


The instant Eragon made the needed alteration to the spell, Nasuada’s 
voice emanated from the mirror: “... and confusion will destroy us. Our 
warriors can afford but one commander during this conflict. Decide who 


it is to be, Orrin, and quickly too.” 


Eragon heard a disembodied sigh. “As you wish; the position is yours.” 


512 


“But, sir, she is untried!” 


“Enough, Irwin,” ordered the king. “She has more experience in war 
than anyone in Surda. And the Varden are the only force to have de- 
feated one of Galbatorix’s armies. If Nasuada were a Surdan general— 
which would be peculiar indeed, I admit—you would not hesitate to 
nominate her for the post. I shall be happy to deal with questions of au- 
thority if they arise afterward, for they will mean I’m still on my feet and 
not lying in a grave. As it is, we are so outnumbered I fear we are 
doomed unless Hrothgar can reach us before the end of the week. Now, 
where is that blasted scroll on the supply train?... Ah, thank you, Arya. 
Three more days without—’ 


After that the discussion turned to a shortage of bowstrings, which Er- 
agon could glean nothing useful from, so he ended the spell. The mirror 
cleared, and he found himself staring at his own face. 


She lives, he murmured. His relief was overshadowed, though, by the 
larger meaning of what they had heard. 


Saphira looked at him. We are needed. 
Aye. Why hasn't Oromis told us about this? He must know of it. 
Maybe he wanted to avoid disrupting our training. 


Troubled, Eragon wondered what else of import was happening in Ala- 
gaésia that he was unaware of. Roran. With a pang of guilt, Eragon real- 
ized that it had been weeks since he last thought of his cousin, and even 
longer since he scryed him on the way to Ellesméra. 


At Eragon’s command, the mirror revealed two figures standing against 
a pure white background. It took Eragon a long moment to recognize the 
man on the right as Roran. He was garbed in travel-worn clothes, a ham- 
mer was stuck under his belt, a thick beard obscured his face, and he 
bore a haunted expression that bespoke desperation. To the left was 
Jeod. The men surged up and down, accompanied by the thunderous 
crash of waves, which masked anything they said. After a while, Roran 
turned and walked along what Eragon assumed was the deck of a ship, 
bringing dozens of other villagers into view. 


Where are they, and why is Jeod with them? demanded Eragon, bewil- 
dered. 


513 


Diverting the magic, he scryed in quick succession Teirm—shocked to 
see that the city’s wharfs had been destroyed—Therinsford, Garrow’s old 
farm, and then Carvahall, whereupon Eragon uttered a wounded cry. 


The village was gone. 


Every building, including Horst’s magnificent house, had been burned 
to the ground. Carvahall no longer existed except as a sooty blot beside 
the Anora River. The sole remaining inhabitants were four gray wolves 
that loped through the wreckage. 


The mirror dropped from Eragon’s hand and shattered across the floor. 
He leaned against Saphira, tears burning in his eyes as he grieved anew for 
his lost home. Saphira hummed deep in her chest and brushed his arm 
with the side of her jaw, enveloping him in a warm blanket of sympathy. 
Take comfort, little one. At least your friends are still alive. 


He shuddered and felt a hard core of determination coalesce in his 
belly. We have remained sequestered from the world for far too long. It's 
high time we leave Ellesméra and confront our fate, whatever it may be. For 
now, Roran must fend for himself, but the Varden... the Varden we can 


help. 


Is it time to fight, Eragon? asked Saphira, an odd note of formality in her 
voice. 


He knew what she meant: Was it time to challenge the Empire head- 
on, time to kill and rampage to the limit of their considerable abilities, 
time to unleash every ounce of their rage until Galbatorix lay dead before 
them? Was it time to commit themselves to a campaign that could take 
decades to resolve? 


It is time. 


514 


GIFTS 





Eragon packed his belongings in less than five minutes. He took the 
saddle Oromis had given them, strapped it onto Saphira, then slung his 
bags over her back and buckled them down. 


Saphira tossed her head, nostrils flared, and said, I will wait for you at 
the field. With a roar, she launched herself from the tree house, unfolding 
her blue wings in midair, and flew off, skimming the forest canopy. 

Quick as an elf, Eragon ran to Tialdari Hall, where he found Orik sit- 
ting in his usual corner, playing a game of Runes. The dwarf greeted him 
with a hearty slap on the arm. “Eragon! What brings you here at this time 
of the morn? I thought you'd be off banging swords with Vanir.” 


“Saphira and I are leaving,” said Eragon. 


Orik stopped with his mouth open, then narrowed his eyes, going seri- 
ous. “You've had news?” 


‘Tl tell you about it later. Do you want to come?” 

“To Surda?” 

“Aye.” 

A wide smile broke across Orik’s hairy face. “You'd have to clap me in 
irons before I’d stay behind. I’ve done nothing in Ellesméra but grow fat 
and lazy. A bit of excitement will do me good. When do we leave?” 

“As soon as possible. Gather your things and meet us at the sparring 
grounds. Can you scrounge up a week’s worth of provisions for the two 
of us?” 

“A week’s? But that won’'t—’” 

“We're flying on Saphira.” 

The skin above Orik’s beard turned pale. “We dwarves don’t do well 
with heights, Eragon. We don’t do well at all. It'd be better if we could 
ride horses, like we did coming here.” 


Eragon shook his head. “That would take too long. Besides, it’s easy to 


515 


ride Saphira. She'll catch you if you fall.” Orik grunted, appearing both 
queasy and unconvinced. Leaving the hall, Eragon sped through the syl- 
van city until he rejoined Saphira, and then they flew to the Crags of 
Tel’naeir. 


Oromis was sitting upon Glaedr’s right forearm when they landed in 
the clearing. The dragon’s scales gilded the landscape with countless chips 
of golden light. Neither elf nor dragon stirred. Descending from Saphira’s 
back, Eragon bowed. “Master Glaedr. Master Oromis.” 


Glaedr said, You have taken it upon yourself to return to the Varden, have 
you not? 


We have, replied Saphira. 


Eragon’s sense of betrayal overcame his self-restraint. “Why did you 
hide the truth from us? Are you so determined to keep us here that you 
must resort to such underhand trickery? The Varden are about to be at- 
tacked and you didn’t even mention it!” 


Calm as ever, Oromis asked, “Do you wish to hear why?” 


Very much, Master, said Saphira before Eragon could respond. In pri- 
vate, she scolded him, growling, Be polite! 


“We withheld the tidings for two reasons. Chief among them was that 
we ourselves did not know until nine days past that the Varden were 
threatened, and the true size, location, and movements of the Empire’s 
troops remained concealed from us until three days after that, when Lord 
Dathedr pierced the spells Galbatorix used to deceive our scrying.” 


“That still doesn’t explain why you said nothing of this.” Eragon 
scowled. “Not only that, but once you discovered that the Varden were 
in danger, why didn’t Islanzadi rouse the elves to fight? Are we not al- 
lies?” 


“She has roused the elves, Eragon. The forest echoes with the ring of 
hammers, the tramp of armored boots, and the grief of those who are 
about to be parted. For the first time in a century, our race is set to 
emerge from Du Weldenvarden and challenge our greatest foe. The time 
has come for elves to once more walk openly in Alagaésia.” Gently, 
Oromis added, “You have been distracted of late, Eragon, and I under- 
stand why. Now you must look beyond yourself. The world demands 
your attention.” 


516 


Shamefaced, all Eragon could say was, “I am sorry, Master.” He remem- 
bered Blagden’s words and allowed himself a bitter smile. “I’m as blind as 
a bat.” 


“Hardly, Eragon. You have done well, considering the enormous re- 
sponsibilities we have asked you to shoulder.” Oromis looked at him 
gravely. “We expect to receive a missive from Nasuada in the next few 
days, requesting assistance from Islanzadi and that you rejoin the Varden. 
I intended to inform you of the Varden’s predicament then, when you 
would still have enough time to reach Surda before swords are drawn. If I 
told you earlier, you would have been honor-bound to abandon your 
training and rush to the defense of your liegelord. That is why I and Islan- 
zadi held our tongues.” 


“My training won’t matter if the Varden are destroyed.” 


“No. But you may be the only person who can prevent them from be- 
ing destroyed, for a chance exists—slim but terrible—that Galbatorix 
will be present at this battle. It is far too late for our warriors to assist the 
Varden, which means that if Galbatorix is indeed there, you shall con- 
front him alone, without the protection of our spellweavers. Under those 
circumstances, it seemed vital that your training continue for as long as 
possible.” 


In an instant, Eragon’s anger melted away and was replaced with a cold, 
hard, and brutally practical mind-set as he understood the necessity for 
Oromis’s silence. Personal feelings were irrelevant in a situation as dire as 
theirs. With a flat voice, he said, “You were right. My oath of fealty com- 
pels me to ensure the safety of Nasuada and the Varden. However, I’m 
not ready to confront Galbatorix. Not yet, at least.” 


“My suggestion,” said Oromis, “is that if Galbatorix reveals himself, do 
everything you can to distract him from the Varden until the battle is 
decided for good or for ill and avoid directly fighting him. Before you go, 
I ask but one thing: that you and Saphira vow that—once events per- 
mit—you will return here to complete your training, for you still have 
much to learn.” 


We shall return, pledged Saphira, binding herself in the ancient lan- 
guage. 


“We shall return,” repeated Eragon, and sealed their fate. 


517 


Appearing satisfied, Oromis reached behind himself and produced an 
embroidered red pouch that he tugged open. “In anticipation of your de- 
parture, I gathered together three gifts for you, Eragon.” From the pouch, 
he withdrew a silver bottle. “First, some faelnirv I augmented with my 
own enchantments. This potion can sustain you when all else fails, and 
you may find its properties useful in other circumstances as well. Drink it 
sparingly, for I only had time to prepare a few mouthfuls.” 


He handed the bottle to Eragon, then removed a long black-and- blue 
sword belt from the pouch. The belt felt unusually thick and heavy to 
Eragon when he ran it through his hands. It was made of cloth threads 
woven together in an interlocking pattern that depicted a coiling Liani 
Vine. At Oromis’s instruction, Eragon pulled at a tassel at the end of the 
belt and gasped as a strip in its center slid back to expose twelve dia- 
monds, each an inch across. Four diamonds were white, four were black, 
and the remainder were red, blue, yellow, and brown. They glittered cold 
and brilliant, like ice in the dawn, casting a rainbow of multicolored 
specks onto Eragon’s hands. 


“Master...” Eragon shook his head, at a loss for words for several breaths. 
“Is it safe to give this to me?” 


“Guard it well so that none are tempted to steal it. This is the belt of 
Beloth the Wise—who you read of in your history of the Year of Dark- 
ness—and is one of the great treasures of the Riders. These are the most 
perfect gems the Riders could find. Some we traded for with the 
dwarves. Others we won in battle or mined ourselves. The stones have 
no magic of their own, but you may use them as repositories for your 
power and draw upon that reserve when in need. This, in addition to the 
ruby set in Zar’roc’s pommel, will allow you to amass a store of energy so 
that you do not become unduly exhausted casting spells in battle, or even 
when confronting enemy magicians.” 


Last, Oromis brought out a thin scroll protected inside a wooden tube 
that was decorated with a bas-relief sculpture of the Menoa tree. Unfurl- 
ing the scroll, Eragon saw the poem he had recited at the Agaeti 
Blédhren. It was lettered in Oromis’s finest calligraphy and illustrated 
with the elf’s detailed ink paintings. Plants and animals twined together 
inside the outline of the first glyph of each quatrain, while delicate 
scrollwork traced the columns of words and framed the images. 


“I thought,” said Oromis, “that you would appreciate a copy for your- 
self.” 


518 


Eragon stood with twelve priceless diamonds in one hand and Oromis’s 
scroll in the other, and he knew that it was the scroll he deemed the 
most precious. Eragon bowed and, reduced to the simplest language by 
the depth of his gratitude, said, “Thank you, Master.” 


Then Oromis surprised Eragon by initiating the elves’ traditional greet- 
ing and thereby indicating his respect for Eragon: “May good fortune rule 
over you.” 


“May the stars watch over you.” 


“And may peace live in your heart,” finished the silver-haired elf. He 
repeated the exchange with Saphira. “Now go and fly as fast as the north 
wind, knowing that you—Saphira Brightscales and Eragon Shadeslayer— 
carry the blessing of Oromis, last scion of House Thrandurin, he who is 
both the Mourning Sage and the Cripple Who Is Whole.” 


And mine as well, added Glaedr. Extending his neck, he touched the tip 
of his nose to Saphira’s, his gold eyes glittering like swirling pools of em- 
bers. Remember to keep your heart safe, Saphira. She hummed in response. 


They parted with solemn farewells. Saphira soared over the tangled 
forest and Oromis and Glaedr dwindled behind them, lonely on the crags. 
Despite the hardships of his stay in Ellesméra, Eragon would miss being 
among the elves, for with them he had found the closest thing to a home 
since fleeing Palancar Valley. 


I leave here a changed man, he thought, and closed his eyes, clinging to 
Saphira. 


Before going to meet with Orik, they made one more stop: Tialdari 
Hall. Saphira landed in the enclosed gardens, careful not to damage any of 
the plants with her tail or claws. Without waiting for her to crouch, Er- 
agon leaped straight to the ground, a drop that would have injured him 
before. 


A male elf came out, touched his lips with his first two fingers, and 
asked if he could help them. When Eragon replied that he sought an au- 
dience with Islanzadi, the elf said, “Please wait here, Silver Hand.” 


Not five minutes later, the queen herself emerged from the wooded 
depths of Tialdari Hall, her crimson tunic like a drop of blood among the 
white-robed elf lords and ladies who accompanied her. After the appro- 
priate forms of address were observed, she said, “Oromis informed me of 


519 


your intention to leave us. I am displeased by this, but one cannot resist 
the will of fate.” 


“No, Your Majesty.... Your Majesty, we came to pay our respects be- 
fore departing. You have been most considerate of us, and we thank you 
and your House for clothing, lodging, and feeding us. We are in your 


debt.” 


“Never in our debt, Rider. We but repaid a little of what we owe you 
and the dragons for our miserable failure in the Fall. I am gratified, 
though, that you appreciate our hospitality.” She paused. “When you ar- 
rive in Surda, convey my royal salutations to Lady Nasuada and King 
Orrin and inform them that our warriors will soon attack the northern 
half of the Empire. If fortune smiles upon us, we shall catch Galbatorix 
off guard and, given time, divide his forces.” 


“As you wish.” 


“Also, know that I have dispatched twelve of our finest spellweavers to 
Surda. If you are still alive when they arrive, they will place themselves 
under your command and do their best to shield you from danger both 
night and day.” 


“Thank you, Your Majesty.” 


Islanzadi extended a hand and one of the elf lords handed her a shallow, 
unadorned wooden box. “Oromis had his gifts for you, and I have mine. 
Let them remind you of your time spent with us under the dusky pines.” 
She opened the box, revealing a long, dark bow with reflexed limbs and 
curled tips nestled on a bed of velvet. Silver fittings chased with dogwood 
leaves decorated the ears and grip of the bow. Beside it lay a quiver of 
new arrows fletched with white swan feathers. “Now that you share our 
strength, it seems only proper that you should have one of our bows. I 
sang it myself from a yew tree. The string will never break. And so long 
as you use these arrows, you will be hard-pressed to miss your target, 
even if the wind should gust during your shot.” 


Once again, Eragon was overwhelmed by the elves’ generosity. He 
bowed. “What can I say, my Lady? You honor me that you saw fit to give 
me the labor of your own hands.” 


Islanzadi nodded, as if agreeing with him, then stepped past him and 


said, “Saphira, I brought you no gifts because I could think of nothing you 
might need or want, but if there is aught of ours you desire, name it and 


520 


it shall be yours.” 


Dragons, said Saphira, do not require possessions to be happy. What use 
have we for riches when our hides are more glorious than any treasure hoard 
in existence? No, I am content with the kindness that you have shown Er- 
agon. 


Then Islanzadi bade them a safe journey. Sweeping around, her red 
cape billowing from her shoulders, she made to leave the gardens, only to 
stop at the edge of the pleasance and say, “And, Eragon?” 


“Yes, Your Majesty?” 


“When you meet with Arya, please express my affection to her and tell 
her that she is sorely missed in Ellesméra.” The words were stiff and for- 
mal. Without waiting for a reply, she strode away and disappeared among 
the shadowed boles that guarded the interior of Tialdari Hall, followed 
by the elf lords and ladies. 


It took Saphira less than a minute to fly to the sparring field, where 
Orik sat on his bulging pack, tossing his war ax from one hand to the 
other and scowling ferociously. “About time you got here,” he grumbled. 
He stood and slipped the ax back under his belt. Eragon apologized for 
the delay, then tied Orik’s pack onto the back of his saddle. The dwarf 
eyed Saphira’s shoulder, which loomed high above him. “And how, by 
Morgothal’s black beard, am I supposed to get up there? A cliff has more 
handholds than you, Saphira.” 


Here, she said. She lay flat on her belly and pushed her right hind leg 
out as far as she could, forming a knobby ramp. Pulling himself onto her 
shin with a loud huff, Orik crawled up her leg on hands and knees. A 
small jet of flame burst from Saphira’s nostrils as she snorted. Hurry up— 
that tickles! 


Orik paused on the ledge of her haunches, then placed one foot on ei- 
ther side of Saphira’s spine and carefully walked his way up her back to- 
ward the saddle. He tapped one of the ivory spikes between his legs and 
said, “There be as good a way to lose your manhood as ever I’ve seen.” 


Eragon grinned. “Don’t slip.” When Orik lowered himself onto the front 
of the saddle, Eragon mounted Saphira and sat behind the dwarf. To hold 
Orik in place when Saphira turned or inverted, Eragon loosened the 
thongs that were meant to secure his arms and had Orik put his legs 
through them. 


As Saphira rose to her full height, Orik swayed, then clutched the spike 
in front of him. “Garr! Eragon, don’t let me open my eyes until we're in 
the air, else I fear I'll be sick. This is unnatural, it is. Dwarves aren’t meant 
to ride dragons. It’s never been done before.” 


“Never?” 

Orik shook his head without answering. 

Clusters of elves drifted out of Du Weldenvarden, gathered along the 
edge of the field, and with solemn expressions watched Saphira lift her 
translucent wings in preparation to take off. 

Eragon tightened his grip as he felt her mighty thews bunch underneath 
his legs. With a rush of acceleration, Saphira launched herself into the az- 
ure sky, flapping swift and hard to rise above the giant trees. She wheeled 
over the vast forest—spiraling upward as she gained altitude—and then 
aimed herself south, toward the Hadarac Desert. 

Though the wind was loud in Eragon’s ears, he heard an elf woman in 
Ellesméra raise her clear voice in song, as he had when they first arrived. 
She sang: 

Away, away, you shall fly away, 

O’er the peaks and vales 

To the lands beyond. 

Away, away, you shall fly away, 


And never return to me... 


THE MAW OF THE OCEAN 





The obsidian seas heaved underneath the Dragon Wing, propelling the 
ship high in the air. There it teetered on the precipitous crest of a foam- 
capped swell before pitching forward and racing down the face of the 
wave into the black trough below. Billows of stinging mist drove through 
the frigid air as the wind groaned and howled like a monstrous spirit. 


Roran clung to the starboard rigging at the waist of the ship and 
retched over the gunwale; nothing came up but sour bile. He had prided 
himself that his stomach never bothered him while on Clovis’s barges, 
but the storm they raced before was so violent that even Uthar’s men— 
seasoned tars each and every one—had difficulty keeping their whisky 
down. 


It felt like a boulder of ice clouted Roran between the shoulder blades 
as a wave struck the ship crossways, drenching the deck before draining 
through the scuppers and pouring back into the frothing, furrowed, furi- 
ous ocean from whence it came. Roran wiped the salty water from his 
eyes with fingers as clumsy as frozen lumps of wood, and squinted to- 
ward the inky horizon to the aft. 


Maybe this will shake them off our scent. Three black-sailed sloops had 
pursued them ever since they passed the Iron Cliffs and rounded what 
Jeod dubbed Edur Carthungavé and Uthar identified as Rathbar’s Spur. 
“The tailbone of the Spine, that’s what it be,’ Uthar said, grinning. The 
sloops were faster than the Dragon Wing, weighed down with villagers as 
it was, and had quickly gained upon the merchant ship until they were 
close enough to exchange volleys of arrows. Worst of all, it seemed that 
the lead sloop carried a magician, for its arrows were uncannily accurate, 
splitting ropes, destroying ballistae, and clogging the blocks. From their 
attacks, Roran deduced that the Empire no longer cared about capturing 
him and only wanted to stop him from finding sanctuary with the 
Varden. He had just been preparing the villagers to repel boarding parties 
when the clouds above ripened to a bruised purple, heavy with rain, and 
a ravening tempest blew in from the northwest. At the present, Uthar 
had the Dragon Wing tacked crossways to the wind, heading toward the 
Southern Isles, where he hoped to elude the sloops among the shoals and 
coves of Beirland. 


A sheet of horizontal lightning flickered between two bulbous thun- 
derheads, and the world became a tableau of pale marble before darkness 


reigned once more. Every blinding flash imprinted a motionless scene 


523 


upon Roran’s eyes that lingered, pulsing, long after the brazen bolts van- 


ished. 


Then came another round of forked lightning, and Roran saw—as if in 
a series of monochrome paintings—the mizzen topmast twist, crack, and 
topple into the thrashing sea, port amidships. Grabbing a lifeline, Roran 
pulled himself to the quarterdeck and, in unison with Bonden, hacked 
through the cables that still connected the topmast to the Dragon Wing 
and dragged the stern low in the water. The ropes writhed like snakes as 
they were cut. 


Afterward, Roran sank to the deck, his right arm hooked through the 
gunwale to hold himself in place as the ship dropped twenty... thirty... 
feet between waves. A swell washed over him, leaching the warmth from 


his bones. Shivers racked his body. 


Don’t let me die here, he pleaded, though whom he addressed, he knew 
not. Not in these cruel waves. My task is yet unfinished. During that long 
night, he clung to his memories of Katrina, drawing solace from them 
when he grew weary and hope threatened to desert him. 


The storm lasted two full days and broke during the wee hours of the 
night. The following morning brought with it a pale green dawn, clear 
skies, and three black sails riding the northern horizon. To the southwest, 
the hazy outline of Beirland lay underneath a shelf of clouds gathered 
about the ridged mountain that dominated the island. 


Roran, Jeod, and Uthar met in a small fore cabin—since the captain’s 
stateroom was given over to the infirm—where Uthar unrolled sea charts 
on the table and tapped a point above Beirland. “This’d be where we are 
now,” he said. He reached for a larger map of Alagaésia’s coastline and 
tapped the mouth of the Jiet River. “An’ this’d be our destination, since 
food won't last us to Reavstone. How we get there, though, without be- 
ing overtaken is beyond me. Without our mizzen topgallant, those ac- 
cursed sloops will catch us by noon tomorrow, evening if we manage the 
sails well.” 


“Can we replace the mast?” asked Jeod. “Vessels of this size carry spars 
to make just such repairs.” 


Uthar shrugged. “We could, provided we had a proper ship’s carpenter 
among us. Seeing as we don't, I'd rather not let inexperienced hands 


524 


mount a spar, only to have it crash down on deck and perhaps injure 
somebody.” 


Roran said, “If it weren't for the magician or magicians, I’d say we 
should stand and fight, since we far outnumber the crews of the sloops. 
As it is, I’m chary of battle. It seems unlikely that we could prevail, con- 
sidering how many ships sent to help the Varden have disappeared.” 


Grunting, Uthar drew a circle around their current position. “This’d be 
how far we can sail by tomorrow evening, assuming the wind stays with 
us. We could make landfall somewhere on Beirland or Nia if we wanted, 
but I can’t see how that'd help us. We’d be trapped. The soldiers on those 
sloops or the Ra’zac or Galbatorix himself could hunt us at his leisure.” 


Roran scowled as he considered their options; a fight with the sloops 
appeared inevitable. 


For several minutes, the cabin was silent except for the slap of waves 
against the hull. Then Jeod placed his finger on the map between Beir- 
land and Nia, looked at Uthar, and asked, “What about the Boar’s Eye?” 


To Roran’s amazement, the scarred sailor actually blanched. “I'd not risk 
that, Master Jeod, not on my life. I’d rather face the sloops an’ die in the 
open sea than go to that doomed place. There has consumed twice as 
many ships as in Galbatorix’s fleet.” 


“I seem to recall reading,” said Jeod, leaning back in his chair, “that the 
passage is perfectly safe at high tide and low tide. Is that not so?” 


With great and evident reluctance, Uthar admitted, “Aye. But the Eye 
is so wide, it requires the most precise timing to cross without being de- 
stroyed. We'd be hard-pressed to accomplish that with the sloops near on 
our tail.” 


“If we could, though,” pressed Jeod, “if we could time it right, the 
sloops would be wrecked or—if their nerve failed them—forced to cir- 
cumvent Nia. It would give us time to find a place to hide along Beir- 


land.” 
“If, if... You'd send us to the crushing deep, you would.” 
“Come now, Uthar, your fear is unreasoning. What I propose is danger- 


ous, I admit, but no more than fleeing Teirm was. Or do you doubt your 
ability to sail the gap? Are you not man enough to do it?” 


525 


Uthar crossed his bare arms. “You've never seen the Eye have ou, sir?” 
, y 
“T can't Say I have.” 


‘It’s not that I’m not man enough, but that the Eye far exceeds the 
strength of men; it puts to shame our biggest ships, our grandest build- 
ings, an’ anything else you’d care to name. Tempting it would be like try- 
ing to outrun an avalanche; you might succeed, but then you just as well 
might be ground into dust.” 


“What,” asked Roran, “is this Boar's Eye?” 
“The all-devouring maw of the ocean,” proclaimed Uthar. 


In a milder tone, Jeod said, “It’s a whirlpool, Roran. The Eye forms as 
the result of tidal currents that collide between Beirland and Nia. When 
the tide waxes, the Eye rotates north to west. When the tide wanes, it 
rotates north to east.” 


“That doesn’t sound so dangerous.” 


Uthar shook his head, queue whipping the sides of his wind-burned 
neck, and laughed. “Not so dangerous, he says! Hal” 


“What you fail to comprehend,” continued Jeod, “is the size of the vor- 
tex. On average, the center of the Eye is a league in diameter, while the 
arms of the pool can be anywhere from ten to fifteen miles across. Ships 
unlucky enough to be snared by the Eye are borne down to the floor of 
the ocean and dashed against the jagged rocks therein. Remnants of the 
vessels are often found as flotsam on the beaches of the two islands.” 


“Would anyone expect us to take this route?” Roran queried. 


“No, an’ for good reason,” growled Uthar. Jeod shook his head at the 
same time. 


“Is it even possible for us to cross the Eye?” 
“It'd be a blasted fool thing to do.” 
Roran nodded. “I know it’s not something you want to risk, Uthar, but 


our options are limited. I’m no seaman, so I must rely upon your judg- 
ment: Can we cross the Eye?” 


526 


The captain hesitated. “Maybe, maybe not. You'd have t’ be stark raving 
mad to go nearer’n five miles of that monster.” 


Pulling out his hammer, Roran banged it on the table, leaving a dent a 
half-inch deep. “Then I’m stark raving mad!” He held Uthar’s gaze until 
the sailor shifted with discomfort. “Must I remind you, we’ve only gotten 
this far by doing what quibbling worrywarts said couldn’t, or shouldn't, 
be done? We of Carvahall dared to abandon our homes and cross the 
Spine. Jeod dared to imagine we could steal the Dragon Wing. What will 
you dare, Uthar? If we can brave the Eye and live to tell the tale, you 
shall be hailed as one of the greatest mariners in history. Now answer me 
and answer me well and true: Can this be done?” 


Uthar drew a hand over his face. When he spoke, it was in a low voice, 
as if Roran’s outburst had caused him to abandon all bluster. “I don’t 
know, Stronghammer.... If we wait for the Eye to subside, the sloops may 
be so close to us that if we escape, they’d escape. An’ if the wind should 
falter, we’d be caught in the current, unable to break free.” 


“As captain, are you willing to attempt it? Neither Jeod nor I can 
command the Dragon Wing in your place.” 


Long did Uthar stare down at the charts, one hand clasped over the 
other. He drew a line or two from their position and worked a table of 
figures that Roran could make nothing of. At last he said, “I fear we sail 


to our doom, but aye, I'll do my best to see us through.” 


Satisfied, Roran put away his hammer. “So be it.” 


Daz 


RUNNING THE BOAR’S EYE 





The sloops continued to draw closer to the Dragon Wing over the 
course of the day. Roran watched their progress whenever he could, con- 
cerned that they would get near enough to attack before the Dragon 
Wing reached the Eye. Still, Uthar seemed able to outrun them, at least 
for a little while longer. 


At Uthar’s orders, Roran and the other villagers worked to tidy up the 
ship after the storm and prepare for the ordeal that was to come. Their 
work ended at nightfall, when they extinguished every light on board in 
an attempt to confuse their pursuers as to the Dragon Wing ’s heading. 
The ruse succeeded in part, for when the sun rose, Roran saw that the 
sloops had fallen back to the northwest another mile or so, though they 
soon made up the lost distance. 


Late that morning, Roran climbed the mainmast and pulled himself up 
into the crow’s nest a hundred and thirty feet above the deck, so high 
that the men below appeared no larger than his little finger. The water 
and sky seemed to rock perilously about him as the Dragon Wing heeled 
from side to side. 


Taking out the spyglass he had brought with him, Roran put it to his 
eye and adjusted it until the sloops came into focus not four miles astern 
and approaching faster than he would have liked. They must have realized 
what we intend to do, he thought. Sweeping the glass around, he searched 
the ocean for any sign of the Boar’s Eye. He stopped as he descried a great 
disk of foam the size of an island, gyrating from north to east. We’re late, 
he thought, a pit in his stomach. High tide had already passed and the 
Boar’s Eye was gathering in speed and strength as the ocean withdrew 
from land. Roran trained the glass over the edge of the crow’s nest and 
saw that the knotted rope Uthar had tied to the starboard side of the 
stern—to detect when they entered the pull of the whirlpool—now 
floated alongside the Dragon Wing instead of trailing behind as was usual. 
The one thing in their favor was that they were sailing with the Eye’s 
current and not against it. If it had been the other way around, they 
would have had no choice but to wait until the tide turned. 


Below, Roran heard Uthar shout for the villagers to man the oars. A 
moment later, the Dragon Wing sprouted two rows of poles along each 
side, making the ship look like nothing more than a giant water strider. 
At the beat of an ox-hide drum, accompanied by Bonden’s rhythmic 
chant as he set the tempo, the oars arched forward, dipped into the sea of 


528 


green, and swept back across the surface of the water, leaving white 
streaks of bubbles in their wake. The Dragon Wing accelerated quickly, 
now moving faster than the sloops, which were still outside the Eye’s in- 
fluence. 


Roran watched with horrified fascination the play that unfolded around 
him. The essential plot element, the crux upon which the outcome de- 
pended, was time. Though they were late, was the Dragon Wing, with its 
oars and sails combined, fast enough to traverse the Eye? And could the 
sloops—which had deployed their own oars now—narrow the gap be- 
tween them and the Dragon Wing enough to ensure their own survival? 
He could not tell. The pounding drum measured out the minutes; Roran 
was acutely aware of each moment as it trickled by. 


He was surprised when an arm reached over the edge of the basket and 
Baldor’s face appeared, looking up at him. “Give me a hand, won't you? I 
feel like I’m about to fall.” 


Bracing himself, Roran helped Baldor into the basket. Baldor handed 
Roran a biscuit and a dried apple and said, “Thought you might like some 
lunch.” With a nod of thanks, Roran tore into the biscuit and resumed 
gazing through the spyglass. When Baldor asked, “Can you see the Eye?” 
Roran passed him the glass and concentrated on eating. 


Over the next half hour, the foam disk increased the speed of its revo- 
lutions until it spun like a top. The water around the foam bulged and 
began to rise, while the foam itself sank from view into the bottom of a 
gigantic pit that continued to deepen and enlarge. The air over the vortex 
filled with a cyclone of twisting mist, and from the ebony throat of the 
abyss came a tortured howl like the cries of an injured wolf. 


The speed with which the Boar’s Eye formed amazed Roran. “You'd 
better go tell Uthar,” he said. 


Baldor climbed out of the nest. “Tie yourself to the mast or you may 
get thrown off.” 


“T will.” 


Roran left his arms free when he secured himself, making sure that, if 
needed, he could reach his belt knife to cut himself free. Anxiety filled 
him as he surveyed the situation. The Dragon Wing was but a mile past 
the median of the Eye, the sloops were but two miles behind her, and the 
Eye itself was quickly building toward its full fury. Worse, disrupted by 


529 


the whirlpool, the wind sputtered and gasped, blowing first from one di- 
rection and then the other. The sails billowed for a moment, then fell 
slack, then filled again as the confused wind swirled about the ship. 


Perhaps Uthar was right, thought Roran. Perhaps I’ve gone too far and 
pitted myself against an opponent that cannot be overcome by sheer deter- 
mination. Perhaps I am sending the villagers to their deaths. The forces of 
nature were immune to intimidation. 


The gaping center of the Boar's Eye was now almost nine and a half 
miles in circumference, and how many fathoms deep no one could say, 
except for those who had been trapped within it. The sides of the Eye 
slanted inward at a forty-five-degree angle; they were striated with shal- 
low grooves, like wet clay being molded on a potter’s wheel. The bass 
howl grew louder, until it seemed to Roran that the entire world must 
crumble to pieces from the intensity of the vibrations. A glorious rain- 
bow emerged from the mist over the whirling chasm. 


The current moved faster than ever, driving the Dragon Wing at a 
breakneck pace as it whipped around the rim of the whirlpool and mak- 
ing it more and more unlikely that the ship could break free at the Eye’s 
southern edge. So prodigious was her velocity, the Dragon Wing tilted far 
to the starboard, suspending Roran out over the rushing water. 


Despite the Dragon Wing ’s progress, the sloops continued to gain on 
her. The enemy ships sailed abreast less than a mile away, their oars mov- 
ing in perfect accord, two fins of water flying from each prow as they 
plowed the ocean. Roran could not help but admire the sight. 


He tucked the spyglass away in his shirt; he had no need of it now. The 
sloops were close enough for the naked eye, while the whirlpool was in- 
creasingly obscured by the clouds of white vapor thrown off the lip of 
the funnel. As it was pulled into the deep, the vapor formed a spiral lens 
over the gulf, mimicking the whirlpool’s appearance. 


Then the Dragon Wing tacked port, diverging from the current in 
Uthar’s bid for the open sea. The keel chattered across the puckered wa- 
ter, and the ship’s speed dropped in half as the Dragon Wing fought the 
deadly embrace of the Boar’s Eye. A shudder ran up the mast, jarring Ro- 
ran’s teeth, and the crow’s nest swung in the new direction, making him 
giddy with vertigo. 


Fear gripped Roran when they continued to slow. He slashed off his 
bindings and—with reckless disregard for his own safety—swung himself 


53° 


over the edge of the basket, grabbed the ropes underneath, and shinnied 
down the rigging so quickly that he lost his grip once and fell several feet 
before he could catch himself. He jumped to the deck, ran to the fore 
hatchway, and descended to the first bank of oars, where he joined Bal- 
dor and Albriech on an oak pole. 


They said not a word, but labored to the sound of their own desperate 
breathing, the frenzied beat of the drum, Bonden’s hoarse shouts, and the 
roar of the Boar's Eye. Roran could feel the mighty whirlpool resisting 
with every stroke of the oar. 


And yet their efforts could not keep the Dragon Wing from coming to 
a virtual standstill. We’re not going to make it, thought Roran. His back 
and legs burned from the exertion. His lungs stabbed. Between the 
drumbeats, he heard Uthar ordering the hands above deck to trim the 
sails to take full advantage of the fickle wind. 


Two places ahead of Roran, Darmmen and Hamund surrendered their 
oar to Thane and Ridley, then lay in the middle of the aisle, their limbs 
trembling. Less than a minute later, someone else collapsed farther down 
the gallery and was immediately replaced by Birgit and another woman. 


If we survive, thought Roran, it’ll only be because we have enough people 
to sustain this pace however long is necessary. 


It seemed an eternity that he worked the oar in the murky, smoky 
room, first pushing, then pulling, doing his best to ignore the pain mount- 
ing within his body. His neck ached from hunching underneath the low 
ceiling. The dark wood of the pole was streaked with blood where his 
skin had blistered and torn. He ripped off his shirt—dropping the spy- 
glass to the floor—wrapped the cloth around the oar, and continued row- 
ing. 


At last Roran could do no more. His legs gave way and he fell on his 
side, slipping across the aisle because he was so sweaty. Orval took his 
place. Roran lay still until his breath returned, then pushed himself onto 
his hands and knees and crawled to the hatchway. 


Like a fever-mad drunk, he pulled himself up the ladder, swaying with 
the motion of the ship and often slumping against the wall to rest. When 
he came out on deck, he took a brief moment to appreciate the fresh air, 
then staggered aft to the helm, his legs threatening to cramp with every 
step. 


531 


“How goes it?” he gasped to Uthar, who manned the wheel. 
Uthar shook his head. 


Peering over the gunwale, Roran espied the three sloops perhaps a half 
mile away and slightly more to the west, closer to the center of the Eye. 
The sloops appeared motionless in relation to the Dragon Wing. 


At first, as Roran watched, the positions of the four ships remained un- 
changed. Then he sensed a shift in the Dragon Wing ’s speed, as if the 
ship had crossed some crucial point and the forces restraining her had 
diminished. It was a subtle difference and amounted to little more than a 
few additional feet per minute—but it was enough that the distance be- 
tween the Dragon Wing and the sloops began to increase. With every 
stroke of the oars, the Dragon Wing gained momentum. 


The sloops, however, could not overcome the whirlpool’s dreadful 
strength. Their oars gradually slowed until, one by one, the ships drifted 
backward and were drawn toward the veil of mist, beyond which waited 
the gyrating walls of ebony water and the gnashing rocks at the bottom of 
the ocean floor. 


They can’t keep rowing, realized Roran. Their crews are too small and 
they’re too tired. He could not help but feel a pang of sympathy for the 
fate of the men on the sloops. 


At that precise instant, an arrow sprang from the nearest sloop and 
burst into green flame as it raced toward the Dragon Wing. The dart 
must have been sustained by magic to have flown so far. It struck the 
mizzen sail and exploded into globules of liquid fire that stuck to what- 
ever they touched. Within seconds, twenty small fires burned along the 
mizzenmast, the mizzen sail, and the deck below. 


“We can’t put it out,” shouted one of the sailors with a panicked ex- 
pression. 


“Chop off whatever’s burning an’ throw it overboard!” roared Uthar in 
reply. 


Unsheathing his belt knife, Roran set to work excising a dollop of green 
fire from the boards by his feet. Several tense minutes elapsed before the 
unnatural blazes were removed and it became clear that the conflagra- 
tions would not spread to the rest of the ship. 


532 


Once the cry of “All clear!” was sounded, Uthar relaxed his grip on the 
steering wheel. “If that was the best their magician can do, then I’d say 
we have nothing more to fear of him.” 


“We're going to get out of the Eye, aren’t we?” asked Roran, eager to 
confirm his hope. 


Uthar squared his shoulders and flashed a quick grin, both proud and 
disbelieving. “Not quite this cycle, but we'll be close. We won't make real 
progress away from that gaping monster until the tide slacks off. Go tell 
Bonden to lower the tempo a bit; I don’t want them fainting at the oars 
ifn I can help it.” 


And so it was. Roran took another shift rowing and, by the time he re- 
turned to the deck, the whirlpool was subsiding. The vortex’s ghastly 
howl faded into the usual noise of the wind; the water assumed a calm, 
flat quality that betrayed no hint of the habitual violence visited upon 
that location; and the contorted fog that had writhed above the abyss 
melted under the warm rays of the sun, leaving the air as clear as oiled 
glass. Of the Boar’s Eye itself—as Roran saw when he retrieved the spy- 
glass from among the rowers—nothing remained but the selfsame disk of 
yellow foam rotating upon the water. 


And in the center of the foam, he thought he could discern, just barely, 
three broken masts and a black sail floating round and round and round 
in an endless circle. But it might have been his imagination. 

Leastways, that’s what he told himself. 

Elain came up beside him, one hand resting on her swollen belly. In a 
small voice, she said, “We were lucky, Roran, more lucky than we had 


reason to expect.” 


“Aye,” he agreed. 


533 


TO ABERON 





Underneath Saphira, the pathless forest stretched wide to each white 
horizon, fading as it did from the deepest green to a hazy, washed-out 
purple. Martins, rooks, and other woodland birds flitted above the 
gnarled pines, uttering shrieks of alarm when they beheld Saphira. She 
flew low to the canopy in order to protect her two passengers from the 
arctic temperatures in the upper reaches of the sky. 


Except for when Saphira fled the Ra’zac into the Spine, this was the 
first time she and Eragon had had the opportunity to fly together over a 
great stretch of distance without having to stop or hold back for compan- 
ions on the ground. Saphira was especially pleased with the trip, and she 
delighted in showing Eragon how Glaedr’s tutelage had enhanced her 
strength and endurance. 


After his initial discomfort abated, Orik said to Eragon, “I doubt I could 
ever be comfortable in the air, but I can understand why you and Saphira 
enjoy it so. Flying makes you feel free and unfettered, like a fierce-eyed 
hawk hunting his prey! It sets my heart a-pounding, it does.” 


To reduce the tedium of the journey, Orik played a game of riddles 
with Saphira. Eragon excused himself from the contest as he had never 
been particularly adept at riddles; the twist of thought necessary to solve 
them always seemed to escape him. In this, Saphira far exceeded him. As 
most dragons are, she was fascinated by puzzles and found them quite 
easy to unravel. 

Orik said, “The only riddles I know are in Dwarvish. I will do mine best 


to translate them, but the results may be rough and unwieldy.” Then he 
asked: 


Tall I am young. 
Short I am old. 
While with life I do glow, 


Urar’s breath is my foe. 


Not fair, growled Saphira. I know little of your gods. Eragon had no need 


534 


to repeat her words, for Orik had granted permission for her to project 
them directly into his mind. 


Orik laughed. “Do you give up?” 


Never. For a few minutes, the only sound was the sweep of her wings, 
until she asked, Is it a candle? 


“Right you are.” 
A puff of hot smoke floated back into Orik’s and Eragon’s faces as she 
snorted. I do poorly with such riddles. I’ve not been inside a house since the 


day I hatched, and I find enigmas difficult that deal with domestic subjects. 
Next she offered: 


What herb cures all ailments? 


This proved a terrible poser for Orik. He grumbled and groaned and 
gnashed his teeth in frustration. Behind him, Eragon could not help but 
grin, for he saw the answer plain in Saphira’s mind. Finally, Orik said, 
“Well, what is it? You have bested me with this.” 

By the black raven’s crime, and by this rhyme, 

the answer would be thyme. 

Now it was Orik’s turn to cry, “Not fair! This is not mine native 
tongue. You cannot expect me to grasp such wordplay!” 

Fair is fair. It was a proper riddle. 

Eragon watched the muscles at the back of Orik’s neck bunch and knot 
as the dwarf jutted his head forward. “If that is your stance, O Irontooth, 
then I'd have you solve this riddle that every dwarf child knows.” 


Iam named Morgothal’s Forge and Helzvog’s Womb. 


I veil Nordvig’s Daughter and bring gray death, 


535 


And make the world anew with Helzvog’s Blood. 


What be I? 


And so they went, exchanging riddles of increasing difficulty while Du 
Weldenvarden sped past below. Gaps in the thatched branches often re- 
vealed patches of silver, sections of the many rivers that threaded the for- 
est. Around Saphira, the clouds billowed in a fantastic architecture: vault- 
ing arches, domes, and columns; crenelated ramparts; towers the size of 
mountains; and ridges and valleys suffused with a glowing light that made 
Eragon feel as if they flew through a dream. 


So fast was Saphira that, when dusk arrived, they had already left Du 
Weldenvarden behind and entered the auburn fields that separated the 
great forest from the Hadarac Desert. They made their camp among the 
grass and hunkered round their small fire, utterly alone upon the flat face 
of the earth. They were grim-faced and said little, for words only empha- 
sized their insignificance in that bare and empty land. 


Eragon took advantage of their stop to store some of his energy in the 
ruby that adorned Zar’roc’s pommel. The gem absorbed all the power he 
gave it, as well as Saphira’s when she lent her strength. It would, con- 
cluded Eragon, be a number of days before they could saturate both the 
ruby and the twelve diamonds concealed within the belt of Beloth the 
Wise. 


Weary from the exercise, he wrapped himself in blankets, lay beside 
Saphira, and drifted into his waking sleep, where his night phantasms 
played out against the sea of stars above. 


Soon after they resumed their journey the following morning, the rip- 
pling grass gave way to tan scrub, which grew ever more scarce until, in 
turn, it was replaced by sunbaked ground bare of all but the most hardy 
plants. Reddish gold dunes appeared. From his vantage on Saphira, they 
looked to Eragon like lines of waves forever sailing toward a distant 
shore. 


As the sun began its descent, he noticed a cluster of mountains in the 


distant east and knew he beheld Du Fells Nangoréth, where the wild 
dragons had gone to mate, to raise their young, and eventually to die. We 


536 


must visit there someday, said Saphira, following his gaze. 
Aye. 


That night, Eragon felt their solitude even more keenly than before, for 
they were camped in the emptiest region of the Hadarac Desert, where 
so little moisture existed in the air that his lips soon cracked, though he 
smeared them with nalgask every few minutes. He sensed little life in the 
ground, only a handful of miserable plants interspersed with a few insects 
and lizards. 


As he had when they fled Gil’ead through the desert, Eragon drew wa- 
ter from the soil to replenish their waterskins, and before he allowed the 
water to drain away, he scryed Nasuada in the pool’s reflection to see if 
the Varden had been attacked yet. To his relief, they had not. 


On the third day since leaving Ellesméra, the wind rose up behind 
them and wafted Saphira farther than she could have flown on her own, 
carrying them entirely out of the Hadarac Desert. 


Near the edge of the waste, they passed over a number of horse- 
mounted nomads who were garbed in flowing robes to ward against the 
heat. The men shouted in their rough tongue and shook their swords and 
spears at Saphira, though none of them dared loose an arrow at her. 


Eragon, Saphira, and Orik bivouacked for the night at the southernmost 
end of Silverwood Forest, which lay along Lake Tiidosten and was named 
so because it was composed almost entirely of beeches, willows, and 
trembling poplars. In contrast to the endless twilight that lay beneath the 
brooding pines of Du Weldenvarden, Silverwood was filled with bright 
sunshine, larks, and the gentle rustling of green leaves. The trees seemed 
young and happy to Eragon, and he was glad to be there. And though all 
signs of the desert had vanished, the weather remained far warmer than 
he was accustomed to at that time of year. It felt more like summer than 
spring. 


From there they flew straight to Aberon, the capital of Surda, guided 
by directions Eragon gleaned from the memories of birds they encoun- 
tered. Saphira made no attempt to conceal herself along the way, and 
they often heard cries of amazement and alarm from the villages she 


537 


swept over. 


It was late afternoon when they arrived at Aberon, a low, walled city 
centered around a bluff in an otherwise flat landscape. Borromeo Castle 
occupied the top of the bluff. The rambling citadel was protected by 
three concentric layers of walls, numerous towers, and, Eragon noted, 
hundreds of ballistae made for shooting down a dragon. The rich amber 
light from the low sun cast Aberon’s buildings in sharp relief and illumi- 
nated a plume of dust rising from the city’s western gate, where a line of 
soldiers sought entrance. 


As Saphira descended toward the inner ward of the castle, she brought 
Eragon into contact with the combined thoughts of the people in the 
capital. The noise overwhelmed him at first—how was he supposed to 
listen for foes and still function at the same time?—until he realized that, 
as usual, he was concentrating too much on specifics. All he had to do 
was sense people’s general intentions. He broadened his focus, and the 
individual voices clamoring for his attention subsided into a continuum 
of the emotions surrounding him. It was like a sheet of water that lay 
draped over the nearby landscape, undulating with the rise and fall of 
people’s feelings and spiking whenever someone was racked by extremes 
of passion. 


Thus, Eragon was aware of the alarm that gripped the people below as 
word of Saphira spread. Careful, he told her. We don’t want them to at- 
tack us. 


Dirt billowed into the air with each beat of Saphira’s powerful wings as 
she settled in the middle of the courtyard, sinking her claws into the bare 
ground to steady herself. The horses tethered in the yard neighed with 
fear, creating such an uproar that Eragon finally inserted himself in their 
minds and calmed them with words from the ancient language. 


Eragon dismounted after Orik, eyeing the many soldiers that lined the 
parapets and the drawn ballistae they manned. He did not fear the weap- 
ons, but he had no desire to become engaged in a fight with his allies. 


A group of twelve men, some soldiers, hurried out of the keep toward 
Saphira. They were led by a tall man with the same dark skin as Nasuada, 
only the third person Eragon had met with such a complexion. Halting 
ten paces away, the man bowed—as did his followers—then said, “Wel- 
come, Rider. 1 am Dahwar, son of Kedar. I am King Orrin’s seneschal.” 


Eragon inclined his head. “And I, Eragon Shadeslayer, son of none.” 


538 


“And I, Orik, Thrifk’s son.” 


And I, Saphira, daughter of Vervada, said Saphira, using Eragon as her 
mouthpiece. 


Dahwar bowed again. “I apologize that no one of higher rank than my- 
self is present to greet guests as noble as you, but King Orrin, Lady 
Nasuada, and all the Varden have long since marched to confront Galba- 
torix’s army.” Eragon nodded. He had expected as much. “They left or- 
ders that if you came here seeking them, you should join them directly, 
for your prowess is needed if we are to prevail.” 


“Can you show us on a map how to find them?” asked Eragon. 


“Of course, sir. While I have that fetched, would you care to step out 
of the heat and partake of some refreshments?” 


Eragon shook his head. “We have no time to waste. Besides, it is not I 
who needs to see the map but Saphira, and I doubt she would fit in your 
halls.” 


That seemed to catch the seneschal off guard. He blinked and ran his 
eyes over Saphira, then said, “Quite right, sir. In either case, our hospital- 
ity is yours. If there is aught you and your companions desire, you have 
but to ask.” 


For the first time, Eragon realized that he could issue commands and 
expect them to be followed. “We need a week’s worth of provisions. For 
me, only fruit, vegetables, flour, cheese, bread—things like that. We also 
need our waterskins refilled.” He was impressed that Dahwar did not 
question his avoidance of meat. Orik added his requests then for jerky, 
bacon, and other such products. 


Snapping his fingers, Dahwar sent two servants running back into the 
keep to collect the supplies. While everyone in the ward waited for the 
men to return, he asked, “May I assume by your presence here, Shade- 
slayer, that you completed your training with the elves?” 


“My training shall never end so long as I’m alive.” 
“I see.” Then, after a moment, Dahwar said, “Please excuse my imperti- 


nence, sir, for I am ignorant of the ways of the Riders, but are you not 
human? I was told you were.” 


539 


“That he is,” growled Orik. “He was... changed. And you should be glad 
he was, or our predicament would be far worse than it is.” Dahwar was 
tactful enough not to pursue the subject, but from his thoughts Eragon 
concluded that the seneschal would have paid a handsome price for fur- 
ther details—any information about Eragon or Saphira was valuable in 
Orrin’s government. 


The food, water, and map were soon brought by two wide-eyed pages. 
At Eragon’s word, they deposited the items beside Saphira, looking terri- 
bly frightened as they did, then retreated behind Dahwar. Kneeling on 
the ground, Dahwar unrolled the map—which depicted Surda and the 
neighboring lands—and drew a line northwest from Aberon to Cithri. He 
said, “Last I heard, King Orrin and Lady Nasuada stopped here for prov- 
ender. They did not intend to stay, however, because the Empire is ad- 
vancing south along the Jiet River and they wished to be in place to con- 
front Galbatorix’s army when it arrives. The Varden could be anywhere 
between Cithri and the Jiet River. This is only my humble opinion, but I 
would say the best place to look for them would be the Burning Plains.” 


“The Burning Plains?” 


Dahwar smiled. “You may know them by their old name, then, the 
name the elves use: Du Véllar Eldrvarya.” 


“Ah, yes.” Now Eragon remembered. He had read about them in one of 
the histories Oromis assigned him. The plains—which contained huge 
deposits of peat—lay along the eastern side of the Jiet River where 
Surda’s border crossed it and had been the site of a skirmish between the 
Riders and the Forsworn. During the fight, the dragons inadvertently lit 
the peat with the flames from their mouths and the fire had burrowed 
underground, where it remained smoldering ever since. The land had 
been rendered uninhabitable by the noxious fumes that poured out of 
the glowing vents in the charred earth. 


A shiver crawled down Eragon’s left side as he recalled his premonition: 
banks of warriors colliding upon an orange and yellow field, accompanied 
by the harsh screams of gore-crows and the whistle of black arrows. He 
shivered again. Fate is converging upon us, he said to Saphira. Then, ges- 
turing at the map: Have you seen enough? 


I have. 


In short order, he and Orik packed the supplies, remounted Saphira, 


540 


and from her back thanked Dahwar for his service. As Saphira was about 
to take off again, Eragon frowned; a note of discord had entered the 
minds he was monitoring. “Dahwar, two grooms in the stables have got- 
ten into an argument and one of them, Tathal, intends to commit mur- 
der. You can stop him, though, if you send men right away.” 


Dahwar widened his eyes in an expression of astonishment, and even 
Orik twisted round to look at Eragon. The seneschal asked, “How do you 
know this, Shadeslayer?” 


Eragon merely said, “Because I am a Rider.” 


Then Saphira unfurled her wings, and everyone on the ground ran back 
to avoid being battered by the rush of air as she flapped downward and 
soared into the sky. As Borromeo Castle dwindled behind them, Orik 
said, “Can you hear my thoughts, Eragon?” 


“Do you want me to try? I haven't, you know.” 
“Try.” 


Frowning, Eragon concentrated his attention on the dwarf’s conscious- 
ness and was surprised to find Orik’s mind well protected behind thick 
mental barriers. He could sense Orik’s presence, but not his thoughts and 
feelings. “Nothing.” 


Orik grinned. “Good. I wanted to make sure I hadn’t forgotten my old 
lessons.” 


By unspoken consent, they did not stop for the night, but rather forged 
onward through the blackened sky. Of the moon and stars they saw no 
sign, no flash or pale gleam to breach the oppressive gloom. The dead 
hours bloated and sagged and, it seemed to Eragon, clung to each second 
as if reluctant to surrender to the past. 


When the sun finally returned—bringing with it its welcome light— 
Saphira landed by the edge of a small lake so Eragon and Orik could 
stretch their legs, relieve themselves, and eat breakfast without the con- 
stant movement they experienced on her back. 


They had just taken off again when a long, low brown cloud appeared 
on the edge of the horizon, like a smudge of walnut ink on a sheet of 
white paper. The cloud grew wider and wider as Saphira approached it, 
until by late morning it obscured the entire land beneath a pall of foul 


541 


vapors. 


They had reached the Burning Plains of Alagaésia. 


542 


THE BURNING PLAINS 





Eragon coughed as Saphira descended through the layers of smoke, an- 
gling toward the Jiet River, which was hidden behind the haze. He 
blinked and wiped back tears. The fumes made his eyes smart. 


Closer to the ground, the air cleared, giving Eragon an unobstructed 
view of their destination. The rippling veil of black and crimson smoke 
filtered the sun’s rays in such a way that everything below was bathed in 
a lurid orange. Occasional rents in the besmirched sky allowed pale bars 
of light to strike the ground, where they remained, like pillars of translu- 
cent glass, until they were truncated by the shifting clouds. 


The Jiet River lay before them, as thick and turgid as a gorged snake, its 
crosshatched surface reflecting the same ghastly hue that pervaded the 
Burning Plains. Even when a splotch of undiluted light happened to fall 
upon the river, the water appeared chalky white, opaque and opales- 
cent—almost as if it were the milk of some fearsome beast—and seemed 
to glow with an eerie luminescence all its own. 


Two armies were arrayed along the eastern banks of the oozing water- 
way. To the south were the Varden and the men of Surda, entrenched 
behind multiple layers of defense, where they displayed a fine panoply of 
woven standards, ranks of proud tents, and the picketed horses of King 
Orrin’s cavalry. Strong as they were, their numbers paled in comparison 
to the size of the force assembled in the north. Galbatorix’s army was so 
large, it measured three miles across on its leading edge and how many in 
length it was impossible to tell, for the individual men melded into a 
shadowy mass in the distance. 


Between the mortal foes was an empty span of perhaps two miles. This 
land, and the land that the armies camped on, was pocked with countless 
ragged orifices in which danced green tongues of fire. From those sickly 
torches billowed plumes of smoke that dimmed the sun. Every scrap of 
vegetation had been scorched from the parched soil, except for growths 
of black, orange, and chartreuse lichen that, from the air, gave the earth a 
scabbed and infected appearance. 


It was the most forbidding vista Eragon had clapped eyes upon. 
Saphira emerged over the no-man’s-land that separated the grim armies, 
and now she twisted and dove toward the Varden as fast as she dared, for 


so long as they remained exposed to the Empire, they were vulnerable to 


543 


attacks from enemy magicians. Eragon extended his awareness as far as he 
could in every direction, hunting for hostile minds that could feel his 
probing touch and would react to it—the minds of magicians and those 
trained to fend off magicians. 


What he felt instead was the sudden panic that overwhelmed the 
Varden’s sentinels, many of whom, he realized, had never before seen 
Saphira. Fear made them ignore their common sense, and they released a 
flock of barbed arrows that arched up to intercept her. 


Raising his right hand, Eragon cried, “Letta orya thorna!” The arrows 
froze in place. With a flick of his wrist and the word “Ganga,” he redi- 
rected them, sending the darts boring toward the no-man’s-land, where 
they could bury themselves in the barren soil without causing harm. He 
missed one arrow, though, which was fired a few seconds after the first 
volley. 


Eragon leaned as far to his right as he could and, faster than any normal 
human, plucked the arrow from the air as Saphira flew past it. 


Only a hundred feet above the ground, Saphira flared her wings to slow 
her steep descent before alighting first on her hind legs and then her front 
legs as she came to a running stop among the Varden’s tents. 


“Werg,” growled Orik, loosening the thongs that held his legs in place. 
‘Td rather fight a dozen Kull than experience such a fall again.” He let 
himself hang off one side of the saddle, then dropped to Saphira’s foreleg 
below and, from there, to the ground. 


Even as Eragon dismounted, dozens of warriors with awestruck expres- 
sions gathered around Saphira. From within their midst strode a big bear 
of a man whom Eragon recognized: Fredric, the Varden’s weapon master 
from Farthen Dar, still garbed in his hairy ox-hide armor. “Come on, you 
slack-jawed louts!” roared Fredric. “Don’t stand here gawking; get back to 
your posts or I'll have the lot of you chalked up for extra watches!” At 
his command, the men began to disperse with many a grumbled word 
and backward glance. Then Fredric drew nearer and, Eragon could tell, 
was startled by the change in Eragon’s countenance. The bearded man did 
his best to conceal the reaction by touching his brow and saying, “Wel- 
come, Shadeslayer. You've arrived just in time... I can’t tell you how 
ashamed I am you were attacked. The honor of every man here has been 
blackened by this mistake. Were the three of you hurt?” 


“No ” 


544 


Relief spread across Fredric’s face. “Well, there’s that to be grateful for. 
I’ve had the men responsible pulled from duty. They'll each be whipped 
and reduced in rank.... Will that punishment satisfy you, Rider?” 


“I want to see them,” said Eragon. 


Sudden concern emanated from Fredric; it was obvious he feared that 
Eragon wanted to enact some terrible and unnatural retribution on the 
sentinels. Fredric did not voice his concern, however, but said, “If you’d 
follow me, then, sir.” 


He led them through the camp to a striped command tent where 
twenty or so miserable-looking men were divesting themselves of their 
arms and armor under the watchful eye of a dozen guards. At the sight of 
Eragon and Saphira, the prisoners all went down on one knee and re- 
mained there, gazing at the ground. “Hail, Shadeslayer!” they cried. 


Eragon said nothing, but walked along the line of men while he studied 
their minds, his boots sinking through the crust of the baked earth with 
an ominous crunch. At last he said, “You should be proud that you re- 
acted so quickly to our appearance. If Galbatorix attacks, that’s exactly 
what you should do, though I doubt arrows would prove any more effec- 
tive against him than they were against Saphira and me.” The sentinels 
glanced at him with disbelief, their upturned faces tinted the color of 
tarnished brass by the variegated light. “I only ask that, in the future, you 
take a moment to identify your target before shooting. Next time I might 
be too distracted to stop your missiles. Am I understood?” 


“Yes, Shadeslayer!” they shouted. 


Stopping before the second-to-last man in the line, Eragon held out the 
arrow he had snared from Saphira’s back. “I believe this is yours, Harwin.” 


With an expression of wonder, Harwin accepted the arrow from Er- 
agon. “So it is! It has the white band I always paint on my shafts so I can 
find them later. Thank you, Shadeslayer.” 

Eragon nodded and then said to Fredric so all could hear, “These are 
good and true men, and I want no misfortune to befall them because of 


this event.” 


“I will see to it personally,” said Fredric, and smiled. 


545 


“Now, can you take us to Lady Nasuada?” 
“Yes, sir.” 


As he left the sentinels, Eragon knew that his kindness had earned him 
their undying loyalty, and that tidings of his deed would spread through- 
out the Varden. 


The path Fredric took through the tents brought Eragon into close con- 
tact with more minds than he had ever touched before. Hundreds of 
thoughts, images, and sensations pressed against his consciousness. De- 
spite his effort to keep them at a distance, he could not help absorbing 
random details of people’s lives. Some revelations he found shocking, 
some meaningless, others touching or, conversely, disgusting, and many 
embarrassing. A few people perceived the world so differently, their 
minds leaped out at him on account of that very difference. 


How easy it is to view these men as nothing more than objects that I and a 
few others can manipulate at will. Yet they each possess hopes and dreams, 
potential for what they might achieve and memories of what they have al- 
ready accomplished. And they all feel pain. 


A handful of the minds he touched were aware of the contact and re- 
coiled from it, hiding their inner life behind defenses of varying strength. 
At first Eragon was concerned—imagining that he had discovered a great 
many enemies who had infiltrated the Varden—but then he realized 
from his quick glimpse that they were the individual members of Du 
Vrangr Gata. 


Saphira said, They must be scared out of their wits, thinking that they're 
about to be assaulted by some strange magician. 


I can’t convince them otherwise while they block me like this. 


You should meet them in person, and soon too, before they decide to band 
together and attack. 


Aye, although I don’t think they pose a threat to us.... Du Vrangr Gata— 
their very name betrays their ignorance. Properly, in the ancient language, it 
should be Du Gata Vrangr. 


Their trip ended near the back of the Varden, at a large red pavilion 


flying a pennant embroidered with a black shield and two parallel swords 
slanting underneath. Fredric pulled back the flap and Eragon and Orik en- 


546 


tered the pavilion. Behind them, Saphira pushed her head through the 
opening and peered over their shoulders. 


A broad table occupied the center of the furnished tent. Nasuada stood 
at one end, leaning on her hands, studying a slew of maps and scrolls. Er- 
agon’s stomach clenched as he saw Arya opposite her. Both women were 
armored as men for battle. 


Nasuada turned her almond-shaped face toward him. “Eragon?” she 
whispered. 


He was unprepared for how glad he was to see her. With a broad grin, 
he twisted his hand over his sternum in the elves’ gesture of fealty and 
bowed. “At your service.” 


“Eragon!” This time Nasuada sounded delighted and relieved. Arya, too, 
appeared pleased. “How did you get our message so quickly?” 


“I didn’t; I learned about Galbatorix’s army from my scrying and left 
Ellesméra the same day.” He smiled at her again. “It’s good to be back 
with the Varden.” 


While he spoke, Nasuada studied him with a wondering expression. 
“What has happened to you, Eragon?” 


Arya must not have told her, said Saphira. 


And so Eragon gave a full account of what had befallen Saphira and 
him since they left Nasuada in Farthen Dtr so long ago. Much of what he 
said, he sensed that she had already heard, either from the dwarves or 
from Arya, but she let him speak without interrupting. Eragon had to be 
circumspect about his training. He had given his word not to reveal 
Oromis’s existence without permission, and most of his lessons were not 
to be shared with outsiders, but he did his best to give Nasuada a good 
idea of his skills and their attendant risks. Of the Agaeti Blédhren, he 
merely said, “... and during the celebration, the dragons worked upon me 
the change you see, giving me the physical abilities of an elf and healing 
my back.” 


“Your scar is gone, then?” asked Nasuada. He nodded. A few more sen- 
tences served to end his narrative, briefly mentioning the reason they had 
left Du Weldenvarden and then summarizing their journey thence. She 
shook her head. “What a tale. You and Saphira have experienced so 
much since you left Farthen Dar.” 


547 


“As have you.” He gestured at the tent. “It’s amazing what you've ac- 
complished. It must have taken an enormous amount of work to get the 
Varden to Surda.... Has the Council of Elders caused you much trouble?” 


“A bit, but nothing extraordinary. They seem to have resigned them- 
selves to my leadership.” Her mail clinking together, Nasuada seated her- 
self in a large, high-backed chair and turned to Orik, who had yet to 
speak. She welcomed him and asked if he had aught to add to Eragon’s 
tale. Orik shrugged and provided a few anecdotes from their stay in 
Ellesméra, though Eragon suspected that the dwarf kept his true observa- 
tions a secret for his king. 


When he finished, Nasuada said, “I am heartened to know that if we 
can weather this onslaught, we shall have the elves by our side. Did any 
of you happen to see Hrothgar’s warriors during your flight from Aberon? 
We are counting on their reinforcements.” 


No, answered Saphira through Eragon. But then, it was dark and I was 
often above or between clouds. I could have easily missed a camp under 
those conditions. In any case, I doubt we would have crossed paths, for I 
flew straight from Aberon, and it seems likely the dwarves would choose a 
different route—perhaps following established roads—rather than march 
through the wilderness. 


“What,” asked Eragon, “is the situation here?” 


Nasuada sighed and then told of how she and Orrin had learned about 
Galbatorix’s army and the desperate measures they had resorted to since 
in order to reach the Burning Plains before the king’s soldiers. She fin- 
ished by saying, “The Empire arrived three days ago. Since then, we’ve 
exchanged two messages. First they asked for our surrender, which we 
refused, and now we wait for their reply.” 


“How many of them are there?” growled Orik. “It looked a mighty 
number from Saphira’s back.” 


“Aye. We estimate Galbatorix mustered as many as a hundred thou- 
sand soldiers.” 


Eragon could not contain himself: “A hundred thousand! Where did 


they come from? It seems impossible that he could find more than a 
handful of people willing to serve him.” 


548 


“They were conscripted. We can only hope that the men who were 
torn from their homes won't be eager to fight. If we can frighten them 
badly enough, they may break ranks and flee. Our numbers are greater 
than in Farthen Dar, for King Orrin has joined forces with us and we 
have received a veritable flood of volunteers since we began to spread the 
word about you, Eragon, although we are still far weaker than the Em- 
pire. 


Then Saphira asked, and Eragon was forced to repeat the dreadful ques- 
tion: What do you think our chances of victory are? 


“That,” said Nasuada, putting emphasis on the word, “depends a great 
deal upon you and Eragon, and the number of magicians seeded through- 
out their troops. If you can find and destroy those magicians, then our 
enemies shall be left unprotected and you can slay them at will. Outright 
victory, I think, is unlikely at this point, but we might be able to hold 
them at bay until their supplies run low or until Islanzadi can come to 
our assistance. That is... if Galbatorix doesn't fly into battle himself. In 
that case, I fear retreat will be our only option.” 


Just then, Eragon felt a strange mind approaching, one that knew he 
was watching and yet did not shrink from the contact. One that felt cold 
and hard, calculating. Alert for danger, Eragon turned his gaze toward the 
rear of the pavilion, where he saw the same black-haired girl who had 
appeared when he scryed Nasuada from Ellesméra. The girl stared at him 
with violet eyes, then said, “Welcome, Shadeslayer. Welcome, Saphira.” 


Eragon shivered at the sound of her voice, the voice of an adult. He wet 
his dry mouth and asked, “Who are you?” 


Without answering, the girl brushed back her glossy bangs and exposed 
a silvery white mark on her forehead, exactly like Eragon’s gedwéy igna- 
sia. He knew then whom he faced. 


No one moved as Eragon went to the girl, accompanied by Saphira, 
who extended her neck farther into the pavilion. Dropping to one knee, 
Eragon took the girl’s right hand in his own; her skin burned as if with 
fever. She did not resist him, but merely left her hand limp in his grip. In 
the ancient language—and also with his mind, so that she would under- 
stand—Eragon said, “I am sorry. Can you forgive me for what I did to 
you?” 


The girl’s eyes softened, and she leaned forward and kissed Eragon upon 
the brow. “I forgive you,” she whispered, for the first time sounding her 


549 


age. “How could I not? You and Saphira created who I am, and I know 
you meant no harm. I forgive you, but I shall let this knowledge torture 
your conscience: You have condemned me to be aware of all the suffer- 
ing around me. Even now your spell drives me to rush to the aid of a man 
not three tents away who just cut his hand, to help the young flag carrier 
who broke his left index finger in the spokes of a wagon wheel, and to 
help countless others who have been or are about to be hurt. It costs me 
dearly to resist those urges, and even more if I consciously cause someone 
discomfort, as I do by saying this.... I cannot even sleep at night for the 
strength of my compulsion. That is your legacy, O Rider.” By the end, her 
voice had regained its bitter, mocking edge. 


Saphira interposed herself between them and, with her snout, touched 
the girl in the center of her mark. Peace, Changeling. You have much an- 
ger in your heart. 


“You don't have to live like this forever,” said Eragon. “The elves taught 
me how to undo a spell, and I believe I can free you of this curse. It 
won't be easy, but it can be done.” 


For a moment, the girl seemed to lose her formidable self-control. A 
small gasp escaped her lips, her hand trembled against Eragon’s, and her 
eyes glistened with a film of tears. Then just as quickly, she hid her true 
emotions behind a mask of cynical amusement. “Well, we shall see. Ei- 
ther way, you shouldn’t try until after this battle.” 


“I could save you a great deal of pain.” 


“It wouldn't do to exhaust you when our survival may depend on your 
talents. I do not deceive myself; you are more important than me.” A sly 
grin crossed her face. “Besides, if you remove your spell now, I won't be 
able to help any of the Varden if they are threatened. You wouldn't want 
Nasuada to die because of that, would you?” 


“No,” admitted Eragon. He paused for a long time, considering the is- 
sue, then said, “Very well, I will wait. But I swear to you: If we win this 


fight, I shall right this wrong.” 


The girl tilted her head to one side. “I will hold you to your word, 
Rider.” 


Rising from her chair, Nasuada said, “Elva was the one who saved me 
from an assassin in Aberon.” 


55° 


“Did she? In that case, I am in your debt... Elva... for protecting my 
liegelord.” 


“Come now,” said Nasuada. “I must introduce the three of you to Orrin 
and his nobles. Have you met the king before, Orik?” 


The dwarf shook his head. “I’ve never been this far west.” 


As they left the pavilion—Nasuada in the lead, with Elva by her side— 
Eragon tried to position himself so he could talk with Arya, but when he 
neared her, she quickened her pace until she was level with Nasuada. 
Arya never even looked at him while she walked, a slight that caused 
him more anguish than any physical wound he had endured. Elva glanced 
back at him, and he knew that she was aware of his distress. 


They soon arrived at another large pavilion, this one white and yel- 
low—although it was difficult to determine the exact hue of the colors, 
given the garish orange that glazed everything on the Burning Plains. 
Once they were granted entrance, Eragon was astonished to find the tent 
crammed with an eccentric collection of beakers, alembics, retorts, and 
other instruments of natural philosophy. Who would bother toting all this 
onto a battlefield? he wondered, bewildered. 


“Eragon,” said Nasuada, “I would like you to meet Orrin, son of Larkin 
and monarch of the realm of Surda.” 


From the depths of the tangled piles of glass emerged a rather tall, 
handsome man with shoulder-length hair held back by the gold coronet 
resting upon his head. His mind, like Nasuada’s, was protected behind 
walls of iron; it was obvious he had received extensive training in that 
skill. Orrin seemed pleasant enough to Eragon from their discussion, if a 
bit green and untried when it came to commanding men in war and more 
than a little odd in the head. On the whole, Eragon trusted Nasuada’s 
leadership more. 


After fending off scores of questions from Orrin about his stay among 
the elves, Eragon found himself smiling and nodding politely as one earl 
after another paraded past, each of whom insisted on shaking his hand, 
telling him what an honor it was to meet a Rider, and inviting him to 
their respective estates. Eragon dutifully memorized their many names 
and titles—as he knew Oromis would expect—and did his best to main- 
tain a calm demeanor, despite his growing frustration. 


We’re about to engage one of the largest armies in history, and here we 
fag & ry. 


351 


are, stuck exchanging pleasantries. 


Patience, counseled Saphira. There aren’t that many more.... Besides, 
look at it this way: if we win, they'll owe us an entire year of free dinners, 
what with all their promises. 


He stifled a chuckle. I think it would dismay them to know what it takes 
to feed you. Not to mention that you could empty their cellars of beer and 
wine in a single night. 


I would never, she sniffed, then relented. Maybe in two nights. 


When at last they won free of Orrin’s pavilion, Eragon asked Nasuada, 
“What shall I do now? How can I serve you?” 


Nasuada eyed him with a curious expression. “How do you think you 
can best serve me, Eragon? You know your own abilities far better than I 
do.” Even Arya watched him now, waiting to hear his response. 


Eragon gazed up at the bloody sky while he pondered her question. “I 
shall take control of Du Vrangr Gata, as they once asked me to, and or- 
ganize them underneath me so I can lead them into battle. Working to- 
gether will give us the best chance of foiling Galbatorix’s magicians.” 


“That seems an excellent idea.” 


Is there a place, asked Saphira, where Eragon can leave his bags? I don’t 
want to carry them or this saddle any longer than I have to. 


When Eragon repeated her question, Nasuada said, “Of course. You 
may leave them in my pavilion, and I will arrange to have a tent erected 
for you, Eragon, where you can keep them permanently. I suggest, 
though, that you don your armor before parting with your bags. You 
might need it at any moment... That reminds me: we have your armor 
with us, Saphira. I shall have it unpacked and brought to you.” 


“And what of me, Lady?” asked Orik. 
“We have several knurlan with us from Dargrimst Ingeitum who have 
lent their expertise to the construction of our earthen defenses. You may 


take command of them if you wish.” 


Orik seemed heartened by the prospect of seeing fellow dwarves, espe- 
cially ones from his own clan. He clapped his fist to his chest and said, “I 


552 


think I will at that. If you'll excuse me, I'll see to it at once.” Without a 
backward glance, he trundled off through the camp, heading north to- 
ward the breastwork. 


Returning to her pavilion with the four who remained, Nasuada said to 
Eragon, “Report to me once you have settled matters with Du Vrangr 
Gata.” Then she pushed aside the entrance flap to the pavilion and disap- 
peared with Elva through the dark opening. 


As Arya started to follow, Eragon reached toward her and, in the an- 
cient language, said, “Wait.” The elf paused and looked at him, betraying 
nothing. He held her gaze without wavering, staring deep into her eyes, 
which reflected the strange light around them. “Arya, I won't apologize 
for how I feel about you. However, I wanted you to know that Iam sorry 
for how I acted during the Blood-oath Celebration. I wasn’t myself that 
night; otherwise, I would have never been so forward with you.” 


“And you won't do it again?” 

He suppressed a humorless laugh. “It wouldn’t get me anywhere if I 
did, now would it?” When she remained silent, he said, “No matter. I 
don’t want to trouble you, even if you—’ He bit off the end of his sen- 


tence before he made a remark he knew he would regret. 


Arya’s expression softened. “I’m not trying to hurt you, Eragon. You 
must understand that.” 


“I understand,” he said, but without conviction. 


An awkward pause stretched between them. “Your flight went well, I 
trust?” 


“Well enough.” 

“You encountered no difficulty in the desert?” 

“Should we have?” 

“No. I only wondered.” Then, in an even gentler voice, Arya asked, 


“What of you, Eragon? How have you been since the celebration? I heard 
what you said to Nasuada, but you mentioned nothing other than your 


back.” 


“J...” He tried to lie—not wanting her to know how much he had 


558 


missed her—but the ancient language stopped the words dead in his 
mouth and rendered him mute. Finally, he resorted to a technique of the 
elves: telling only part of the truth in order to create an impression oppo- 
site the whole truth. “I’m better than before,” he said, meaning, in his 
mind, the condition of his back. 


Despite his subterfuge, Arya appeared unconvinced. She did not press 
him on the subject, though, but rather said, “I am glad.” Nasuada’s voice 
emanated from inside the pavilion, and Arya glanced toward it before 
facing him again. “I am needed elsewhere, Eragon.... We are both needed 
elsewhere. A battle is about to take place.” Lifting the canvas flap, she 
stepped halfway into the gloomy tent, then hesitated and added, “Take 
care, Eragon Shadeslayer.” 


Then she was gone. 


Dismay rooted Eragon in place. He had accomplished what he wanted 
to, but it seemed to have changed nothing between him and Arya. He 
balled his hands into fists and hunched his shoulders and glared at the 
ground without seeing it, simmering with frustration. 


He started when Saphira nosed him on the shoulder. Come on, little 
one, she said gently. You can’t stay here forever, and this saddle is begin- 
ning to itch. 


Going to her side, Eragon pulled on her neck strap, muttering under his 
breath when it caught in the buckle. He almost hoped the leather would 
break. Undoing the rest of the straps, he let the saddle and everything 
tied to it fall to the ground in a jumbled heap. It feels good to have that 
off, said Saphira, rolling her massive shoulders. 


Digging his armor out of the saddlebags, Eragon outfitted himself in the 
bright dress of war. First he pulled his hauberk over his elven tunic, then 
strapped his chased greaves to his legs and his inlaid bracers to his fore- 
arms. On his head went his padded leather cap, followed by his coif of 
tempered steel and then his gold and silver helm. Last of all, he replaced 
his regular gloves with his mail-backed gauntlets. 


Zarroc he hung on his left hip using the belt of Beloth the Wise. 
Across his back, he placed the quiver of white swan feathers Islanzadi 
had given him. The quiver, he was pleased to find, could also hold the 


bow the elf queen had sung for him, even when it was strung. 


After depositing his and Orik’s belongings into the pavilion, Eragon and 


554 


Saphira set out together to find Trianna, the current leader of Du Vrangr 
Gata. They had gone no more than a few paces when Eragon sensed a 
nearby mind that was shielded from his view. Assuming that it was one 
of the Varden’s magicians, they veered toward it. 


Twelve yards from their starting point, they came upon a small green 
tent with a donkey picketed in front. To the left of the tent, a blackened 
iron cauldron hung from a metal tripod placed over one of the malodor- 
ous flames birthed deep within the earth. Cords were strung about the 
cauldron, over which were draped nightshade, hemlock, rhododendron, 
savin, bark of the yew tree, and numerous mushrooms, such as death cap 
and spotted cort, all of which Eragon recognized from Oromis’s lessons 
on poison. And standing next to the cauldron, wielding a long wood pad- 
dle with which she stirred the brew, was Angela the herbalist. At her feet 
sat Solembum. 


The werecat uttered a mournful meow, and Angela looked up from 
her task, her corkscrew hair forming a billowing thundercloud around her 
glistening face. She frowned, and her expression became positively ghoul- 
ish, for it was lit from beneath by the flickering green flame. “So you’ve 
returned, eh!” 


“We have,” said Eragon. 


“Is that all you have to say for yourself? Have you seen Elva yet? Have 
you seen what you did to that poor girl?” 


“Aye.” 


“Aye!” cried Angela. “How inarticulate can a person be? All this time in 
Ellesméra being tutored by the elves, and aye is the best you can manage? 
Let me tell you something, blockhead: anyone who is stupid enough to 
do what you did deserves—’ 


Eragon clasped his hands behind his back and waited as Angela in- 
formed him, in many explicit, detailed, and highly inventive terms, ex- 
actly how great a blockhead he was; what kind of ancestors he must pos- 
sess to be such a monumental blockhead—she even went so far as to in- 
sinuate that one of his grandparents had mated with an Urgal—and the 
quite hideous punishments he ought to receive for his idiocy. If anyone 
else had insulted him in that manner, Eragon would have challenged 
them to a duel, but he tolerated her spleen because he knew he could 
not judge her behavior by the same standards as he did others, and be- 
cause he knew her outrage was justified; he had made a dreadful mistake. 


555 


When she finally paused for breath, he said, “You're quite right, and I’m 
going to try to remove the spell once the battle is decided.” 


Angela blinked three times, one right after the other, and her mouth 
remained open for a moment in a small “O” before she clamped it shut. 
With a glare of suspicion, she asked, “You're not saying that just to pla- 
cate me, are you?” 


“IT would never.” 


“And you really intend to undo your curse? I thought such things were 
irrevocable.” 


“The elves have discovered many uses of magic.” 


“Ah... Well, then, that’s settled, isn’t it?” She flashed him a wide smile 
and then strode past him to pat Saphira on her jowls. “It’s good to see you 
again, Saphira. You’ve grown.” 


Well met indeed, Angela. 


As Angela returned to stirring her concoction, Eragon said, “That was 
an impressive tirade you gave.” 


“Thank you. I worked on it for several weeks. It’s a pity you didn’t get 
to hear the ending; it’s memorable. I could finish it for you if you want.” 


“No, that’s all right. I can imagine what it’s like.” Glancing at her out of 
the corner of his eye, Eragon then said, “You don’t seem surprised by how 


I've changed.” 


The herbalist shrugged. “I have my sources. It’s an improvement, in my 
opinion. You were a bit... oh, how shall I say it?...unfinished before.” 


“That I was.” He gestured at the hanging plants. “What do you plan to 
do with these?” 


“Oh, it’s just a little project of mine—an experiment, if you will.” 
“Mmm.” Examining the pattern of colors on a dried mushroom that 


dangled before him, Eragon asked, “Did you ever figure out if toads exist 
or not?” 


556 


“As a matter of fact, I did! It seems that all toads are frogs, but not all 
frogs are toads. So in that sense, toads don’t really exist, which means that 
I was right all along.” She stopped her patter abruptly, leaned to the side, 
grabbed a mug from a bench next to her, and offered it to Eragon. “Here, 
have a cup of tea.” 


Eragon glanced at the deadly plants surrounding them and then back at 
Angela’s open face before he accepted the mug. Under his breath—so the 
herbalist would not hear—he muttered three spells to detect poison. 
Only once he ascertained that the tea was free of contamination did he 
dare drink. The tea was delicious, though he could not identify the ingre- 
dients. 


At that moment, Solembum padded over to Saphira and began to arch 
his back and rub himself up against her leg, just as any normal cat would. 
Twisting her neck, Saphira bent down and with the tip of her nose 
brushed the werecat the length of his spine. She said, I met someone in 
Ellesméra who knows you. 

Solembum stopped rubbing and cocked his head. Is that so? 


Yes. Her name was Quickpaw and The Dream Dancer and also Maud. 


Solembum’s golden eyes widened. A deep, throaty purr rumbled in his 
chest, and he rubbed against Saphira with renewed vigor. 


“So,” said Angela, “I assume you already spoke with Nasuada, Arya, and 
King Orrin.” He nodded. “And what did you think of dear old Orrin?” 


Eragon chose his words with care, for he was aware that they were talk- 
ing about a king. “Well... he seems to have a great many interests.” 


“Yes, he’s as balmy as a moonstruck fool on Midsummer Night Eve. But 
then everyone is, in one way or another.” 


Amused by her forthrightness, Eragon said, “He must be crazy to have 
carted so much glass all the way from Aberon.” 


Angela raised an eyebrow. “What’s this now?” 
“Haven't you seen the inside of his tent?” 


“Unlike some people,” she sniffed, “I don’t ingratiate myself with every 
monarch I meet.” So he described for her the mass of instruments Orrin 


557 


had brought to the Burning Plains. Angela abandoned her stirring as he 
spoke and listened with great interest. The instant he finished, she began 
bustling around the cauldron, gathering the plants off the lines—often us- 
ing tongs to do so—and saying, “I think I had best pay Orrin a visit. The 
two of you will have to tell me about your trip to Ellesméra at a later 
time.... Well, go on, both of you. Be gone!” 


Eragon shook his head as the short little woman drove him and Saphira 
away from her tent, and he still holding the cup of tea. Talking with her is 
always... 


Different? suggested Saphira. 


Exactly. 


558 


THE CLOUDS OF WAR 





From there it took them almost half an hour to locate Trianna’s tent, 
which apparently served as the unofficial headquarters of Du Vrangr 
Gata. They had difficulty finding the tent because few people knew of its 
existence, and even fewer could tell them where it lay because the tent 
was hidden behind a spur of rock that served to conceal it from the gaze 
of enemy magicians in Galbatorix’s army. 


As Eragon and Saphira approached the black tent, the entrance was 
thrust open and Trianna strode out, her arms bare to the elbow in prepa- 
ration to use magic. Behind her clustered a group of determined if fright- 
ened-looking spellcasters, many of whom Eragon had seen during the bat- 
tle in Farthen Dar, either fighting or healing the wounded. 


Eragon watched as Trianna and the others reacted with the now- 
expected surprise at his altered appearance. Lowering her arms, Trianna 
said, “Shadeslayer, Saphira. You should have told us sooner that you were 
here. We've been preparing to confront and battle what we thought was 
a mighty foe.” 


“I didn’t mean to upset you,” said Eragon, “but we had to report to 
Nasuada and King Orrin immediately after we landed.” 


“And why have you graced us with your presence now? You never 
deigned to visit us before, we who are more your brethren than any in 
the Varden.” 


“I have come to take command of Du Vrangr Gata.” The assembled 
spellcasters muttered with surprise at his announcement, and Trianna 
stiffened. Eragon felt several magicians probe his consciousness in an at- 
tempt to divine his true intentions. Instead of guarding himself—which 
would blind him to impending attacks—Eragon retaliated by jabbing the 
minds of the would-be invaders hard enough that they retreated behind 
their own barriers. As he did, Eragon had the satisfaction of seeing two 
men and a woman flinch and avert their gazes. 


“By whose order?” demanded Trianna. 
) ” 


“By Nasuada’s. 


“Ah,” said the sorceress with a triumphant smile, “but Nasuada has no 
direct authority over us. We help the Varden of our own free will.” 


559 


Her resistance puzzled Eragon. “I’m sure Nasuada would be surprised 
to hear that, after everything she, and her father, have done for Du 
Vrangr Gata. It might give her the impression that you no longer wanted 
the support and protection of the Varden.” He let the threat hang in the 
air for a moment. “Besides, I seem to remember you were willing to give 
me this post before. Why not now?” 


Trianna lifted an eyebrow. “You refused my offer, Shadeslayer... or have 
you forgotten?” Composed as she was, a trace of defensiveness colored 
her response, and Eragon suspected she knew her position was untenable. 
She seemed more mature to him than when they last met, and he had to 
remind himself of the hardships she must have endured since: marching 
across Alagaésia to Surda, supervising the magicians of Du Vrangr Gata, 
and preparing for war. 


“We could not accept then. It was the wrong time.” 


Abruptly changing tack, she asked, “Why does Nasuada believe you 
should command us anyway? Surely you and Saphira would be more use- 
ful elsewhere.” 


“Nasuada wants me to lead you, Du Vrangr Gata, in the coming battle, 
and so I shall.” Eragon thought it best not to mention that it was his idea. 


A dark scowl gave Trianna a fierce appearance. She pointed at the clus- 
ter of spellcasters behind her. “We have devoted our lives to the study of 
our art. You have been casting spells for less than two years. What makes 
you more qualified for this task than any of us?... No matter. Tell me: 
What is your strategy? How do you plan to employ us?” 


“My plan is simple,” he said. “The lot of you will join minds and search 
for enemy spellcasters. When you find one, I'll add my strength to yours, 
and together we can crush the spellcaster’s resistance. Then we can slay 
the troops that previously were protected by his or her wards.” 

“And what will you be doing the rest of the time?” 


“Fighting alongside Saphira.” 


After an awkward silence, one of the men behind Trianna said, “It’s a 
good plan.” He quailed as Trianna cast an angry glare at him. 


She slowly faced Eragon again. “Ever since the Twins died, I have led 


560 


Du Vrangr Gata. Under my guidance, they have provided the means to 
fund the Varden’s war effort, ferreted out the Black Hand—Galbatorix’s 
network of spies that tried to assassinate Nasuada—as well as performing 
innumerable other services. I do not boast when I say these are no mean 
accomplishments. And I’m certain I can continue to produce such re- 
sults... Why, then, does Nasuada want to depose me? How have I dis- 
pleased her?” 


Everything became clear to Eragon, then. She has grown accustomed to 
power and doesn’t want to surrender it. But more than that, she thinks that 
my replacing her is a criticism of her leadership. 


You need to resolve this debate, and quickly too, said Saphira. Our time 
grows short. 


Eragon racked his brain for a way to establish his authority in Du 
Vrangr Gata without further alienating Trianna. At last he said, “I didn’t 
come here to stir up trouble. I came to ask for your help.” He spoke to 
the entire congregation but looked only at the sorceress. “I am strong, yes. 
Saphira and I could probably defeat any number of Galbatorix’s pet ma- 
gicians. But we cannot protect everyone in the Varden. We cannot be 
everywhere. And if the Empire’s battle-mages join forces against us, then 
even we will be hard-pressed to survive... We cannot fight this battle 
alone. You are quite right, Trianna—you have done well with Du Vrangr 
Gata, and I’m not here to usurp your authority. It’s only that—as a magi- 
cian—I need to work with Du Vrangr Gata, and—as a Rider—I may also 
need to give you orders, orders that I have to know will be obeyed with- 
out question. The chain of command must be established. That said, you 
will retain the greater part of your autonomy. Most times I'll be too busy 
to devote my attention to Du Vrangr Gata. Nor do I intend to ignore 
your counsel, for I’m aware that you have far more experience than I... 
So I ask again, will you help us, for the good of the Varden?” 


Trianna paused, then bowed. “Of course, Shadeslayer—for the good of 
the Varden. It will be an honor to have you lead Du Vrangr Gata.” 


“Then let us begin.” 


Over the next few hours, Eragon talked with every one of the assem- 
bled magicians, although a fair number were absent, being occupied with 
one task or another to help the Varden. He did his best to acquaint him- 
self with their knowledge of magic. He learned that the majority of men 
and women in Du Vrangr Gata had been introduced to their craft by a 
relative, and usually in profound secrecy to avoid attracting attention 


561 


from those who feared magic—and, of course, Galbatorix himself. Only a 
handful had received proper apprenticeships. As a result, most of the 
spellcasters knew little about the ancient language—none could truly 
speak it fluently—their beliefs about magic were often distorted by reli- 
gious superstitions, and they were ignorant of numerous applications of 
gramarye. 


No wonder the Twins were so desperate to extract your vocabulary of the 
ancient language when they tested you in Farthen Dir, observed Saphira. 
With it they could have easily conquered these lesser magicians. 


They're all we have to work with, though. 


True. I hope you can see now I was right about Trianna. She places her 
own desires before the good of the many. 


You were right, he agreed. But I don’t condemn her for it. Trianna deals 
with the world in the best way she can, as do we all. I understand that, 
even if I don’t approve, and understanding—as Oromis said—breeds empa- 
thy. 


A bit more than a third of the spellcasters specialized as healers. Those 
Eragon sent on their way after giving them a quintet of new spells to 
memorize, enchantments that would allow them to treat a greater range 
of injuries. The remaining spellcasters Eragon worked with to establish a 
clear chain of command—he appointed Trianna his lieutenant and let her 
ensure that his orders were carried out—and to weld their disparate per- 
sonalities into a cohesive fighting unit. Trying to convince magicians to 
cooperate, he discovered, was like trying to get a pack of dogs to share a 
meat bone. Nor did it help that they were in evident awe of him, for he 
could find no way of using his influence to smooth relations among the 
contentious magicians. 


In order to gain a better idea of their exact proficiency, Eragon had 
them cast a series of spells. As he watched them struggle with enchant- 
ments that he now considered simple, Eragon became aware of just how 
far his own powers had advanced. To Saphira, he marveled, And to think 
I once had trouble lifting a pebble in the air. 


And to think, she replied, Galbatorix has had over a century to hone his 
talent. 


The sun was low in the west, intensifying the fermented orange light 
until the Varden’s camp, the livid Jiet River, and the entirety of the 


562 


Burning Plains glowed in the mad, marbled effulgence, as if in a scene 
from a lunatic’s dreams. The sun was no more than a finger’s breadth 
above the horizon when a runner arrived at the tent. He told Eragon that 
Nasuada ordered him to attend her at once. “An’ I think you'd better 
hurry, Shadeslayer, if you don’t mind me saying so.” 


After extracting a promise from Du Vrangr Gata that they would be 
ready and willing when he called upon them for assistance, Eragon ran 
alongside Saphira through the rows of gray tents toward Nasuada’s pavil- 
ion. A harsh tumult above them caused Eragon to lift his eyes from the 
treacherous ground long enough to glance overhead. 


What he saw was a giant flock of birds wheeling between the two ar- 
mies. He spotted eagles, hawks, and falcons, along with countless greedy 
crows and their larger, dagger-beaked, blue-backed, rapacious cousin, the 
raven. Each bird shrieked for blood to wet its throat and enough hot 
meat to fill its belly and sate its hunger. By experience and instinct, they 
knew that whenever armies appeared in Alagaésia, they could expect to 
feast on acres of carrion. 


The clouds of war are gathering, observed Eragon. 


563 


NAR GARZHVOG 





Eragon entered the pavilion, Saphira pushing her head through after 
him. He was met by a steely rasp as Jormundur and a half-dozen of 
Nasuada’s commanders drew their swords at the intruders. The men 
lowered their weapons as Nasuada said, “Come here, Eragon.” 


“What is your bidding?” Eragon asked. 


“Our scouts report that a company of some hundred Kull approach 
from the northeast.” 


Eragon frowned. He had not expected to encounter Urgals in this bat- 
tle, since Durza no longer controlled them and so many had been killed 
in Farthen Dar. But if they had come, they had come. He felt his blood- 
lust rise and allowed himself a savage grin as he contemplated destroying 
Urgals with his new strength. Clapping his hand to Zar’roc’s hilt, he said, 
“It will be a pleasure to eliminate them. Saphira and I can handle it by 
ourselves, if you want.” 


Nasuada watched his face carefully as she said, “We can’t do that, Er- 
agon. They’re flying a white flag, and they have asked to talk with me.” 


Eragon gaped at her. “Surely you don’t intend to grant them an audi- 
ence?” 


“I will offer them the same courtesies I would to any foe who arrives 
under the banner of truce.” 


“They’re brutes, though. Monsters! It’s folly to allow them into the 
camp.... Nasuada, I have seen the atrocities Urgals commit. They relish 
pain and suffering and deserve no more mercy than a rabid dog. There is 
no need for you to waste time over what is surely a trap. Just give the 
word and I and every last one of your warriors will be more than willing 
to kill these foul creatures for you.” 


“In this,” said Jormundur, “I agree with Eragon. If you won't listen to us, 
Nasuada, at least listen to him.” 


First Nasuada said to Eragon in a murmur low enough that no one else 
could hear, “Your training is indeed unfinished if you are so blinded.” 
Then she raised her voice, and in it Eragon heard the same adamantine 
notes of command that her father had possessed: “You all forget that I 


564 


fought in Farthen Dar, the same as you, and that I saw the savagery of 
the Urgals.... However, I also saw our own men commit acts just as hei- 
nous. I shall not denigrate what we have endured at the Urgals’ hands, 
but neither shall I ignore potential allies when we are so greatly outnum- 
bered by the Empire.” 


“My Lady, it’s too dangerous for you to meet with a Kull.” 


“Too dangerous?” Nasuada raised an eyebrow. “While I am protected 
by Eragon, Saphira, Elva, and all the warriors around me? I think not.” 


Eragon gritted his teeth with frustration. Say something, Saphira. You 
can convince her to abandon this harebrained scheme. 


No, I won’t. Your mind is clouded on this issue. 


You can’t agree with her! exclaimed Eragon, aghast. You were there in 
Yazuac with me; you know what the Urgals did to the villagers. And what 
about when we left Teirm, my capture at Gil’ead, and Farthen Dir? Every 
time we've encountered Urgals, they've tried to kill us or worse. They’re 
nothing more than vicious animals. 


The elves believed the same thing about dragons during Du Fym 
Skulblaka. 


At Nasuada’s behest, her guards tied back the front and side panels of 
the pavilion, leaving it open for all to see and allowing Saphira to crouch 
low next to Eragon. Then Nasuada seated herself in her high-backed 
chair, and Jormundur and the other commanders arranged themselves in 
two parallel rows so that anyone who sought an audience with her had to 
walk between them. Eragon stood at her right hand, Elva by her left. 


Less than five minutes later, a great roar of anger erupted from the 
eastern edge of the camp. The storm of jeers and insults grew louder and 
louder until a single Kull entered their view, walking toward Nasuada 
while a mob of the Varden peppered him with taunts. The Urgal—or 
ram, as Eragon remembered they were called—held his head high and 
bared his yellow fangs, but did not otherwise react to the abuse directed 
at him. He was a magnificent specimen, eight and a half feet tall, with 
strong, proud—if grotesque—features, thick horns that spiraled all the 
way around, and a fantastic musculature that made it seem he could kill a 
bear with a single blow. His only clothing was a knotted loincloth, a few 
plates of crude iron armor held together with scraps of mail, and a curved 
metal disk nestled between his two horns to protect the top of his head. 


565 


His long black hair was in a queue. 


Eragon felt his lips tighten in a grimace of hate; he had to struggle to 
keep from drawing Zar’roc and attacking. Yet despite himself, he could 
not help but admire the Urgal’s courage in confronting an entire army of 
enemies alone and unarmed. To his surprise, he found the Kull’s mind 
strongly shielded. 


When the Urgal stopped before the eaves of the pavilion, not daring to 
come any closer, Nasuada had her guards shout for quiet to settle the 
crowd. Everyone looked at the Urgal, wondering what he would do next. 


The Urgal lifted his bulging arms toward the sky, inhaled a mighty 
breath, and then opened his maw and bellowed at Nasuada. In an instant, 
a thicket of swords pointed at the Kull, but he paid them no attention 
and continued his ululation until his lungs were empty. Then he looked 
at Nasuada, ignoring the hundreds of people who, it was obvious, longed 
to kill him, and growled in a thick, guttural accent, “What treachery is 
this, Lady Nightstalker? I was promised safe passage. Do humans break 
their word so easily?” 


Leaning toward her, one of Nasuada’s commanders said, “Let us punish 
him, Mistress, for his insolence. Once we have taught him the meaning of 
respect, then you can hear his message, whatever it is.” 


Eragon longed to remain silent, but he knew his duty to Nasuada and 
the Varden, so he bent down and said in Nasuada’s ear, “Don’t take of- 
fense. This is how they greet their war chiefs. The proper response is to 


then butt heads, but I don’t think you want to try that.” 


“Did the elves teach you this?” she murmured, never taking her eyes off 
the waiting Kull. 


“Aye.” 

“What else did they teach you of the Urgals?” 

“A great deal,” he admitted reluctantly. 

Then Nasuada said to the Kull and also to her men beyond, “The 
Varden are not liars like Galbatorix and the Empire. Speak your mind; 


you need fear no danger while we hold council under the conditions of 
truce.” 


566 


The Urgal grunted and raised his bony chin higher, baring his throat; 
Eragon recognized it as a gesture of friendship. To lower one’s head was a 
threat in their race, for it meant that an Urgal intended to ram you with 
his horns. “I am Nar Garzhvog of the Bolvek tribe. I speak for my peo- 
ple.” It seemed as if he chewed on each word before spitting it out. “Ur- 
gals are hated more than any other race. Elves, dwarves, humans all hunt 
us, burn us, and drive us from our halls.” 


“Not without good reason,” pointed out Nasuada. 


Garzhvog nodded. “Not without reason. Our people love war. Yet how 
often are we attacked just because you find us as ugly as we find you? 
We have thrived since the fall of the Riders. Our tribes are now so large, 
the harsh land we live in can no longer feed us.” 


“So you made a pact with Galbatorix.” 


“Aye, Lady Nightstalker. He promised us good land if we killed his 
enemies. He tricked us, though. His flame-haired shaman, Durza, bent 
the minds of our war chiefs and forced our tribes to work together, as is 
not our way. When we learned this in the dwarves’ hollow mountain, the 
Herndall, the dams who rule us, sent my brood mate to Galbatorix to ask 
why he used us so.” Garzhvog shook his ponderous head. “She did not re- 
turn. Our finest rams died for Galbatorix, then he abandoned us like a 
broken sword. He is drajl and snake-tongued and a lack-horned betrayer. 
Lady Nightstalker, we are fewer now, but we will fight with you if you 
let us.” 


“What is the price?” asked Nasuada. “Your Herndall must want some- 
thing in return.” 


“Blood. Galbatorix’s blood. And if the Empire falls, we ask that you 
give us land, land for breeding and growing, land to avoid more battles in 
the future.” 

Eragon guessed Nasuada’s decision by the set of her face, even before 
she spoke. So apparently did Jormundur, for he leaned toward her and 
said in an undertone, “Nasuada, you can’t do this. It goes against nature.” 

“Nature can’t help us defeat the Empire. We need allies.” 


“The men will desert before they'll fight with Urgals.” 


“That can be worked around. Eragon, will they keep their word?” 


567 


“Only so long as we share a common enemy.” 


With a sharp nod, Nasuada again lifted her voice: “Very well, Nar 
Garzhvog. You and your warriors may bivouac along the eastern flank of 
our army, away from the main body, and we shall discuss the terms of 
our pact.” 


“Ahgrat ukmar,” growled the Kull, clapping his fists to his brow. “You 
are a wise Herndall, Lady Nightstalker.” 


“Why do you call me that?” 
“Herndall?” 
“No, Nightstalker.” 


Garzhvog made a ruk-ruk sound in his throat that Eragon interpreted as 
laughter. “Nightstalker is the name we gave your sire because of how he 
hunted us in the dark tunnels under the dwarf mountain and because of 
the color of his hide. As his cub, you are worthy of the same name.” With 
that he turned on his heel and strode out of the camp. 


Standing, Nasuada proclaimed, “Anyone who attacks the Urgals shall be 
punished as if he attacked a fellow human. See that word of this is posted 
in every company.” 


No sooner had she finished than Eragon noticed King Orrin approach- 
ing at a quick pace, his cape flapping around him. When he was close 
enough, he cried, “Nasuada! Is it true you met with an Urgal? What do 
you mean by it, and why wasn’t I alerted sooner? I don’t—’” 


He was interrupted as a sentry emerged from the ranks of gray tents, 
shouting, “A horseman approaches from the Empire!” 


In an instant, King Orrin forgot his argument and joined Nasuada as she 
hurried toward the vanguard of the army, followed by at least a hundred 
people. Rather than stay among the crowd, Eragon pulled himself onto 
Saphira and let her carry him to their destination. 


When Saphira halted at the ramparts, trenches, and rows of sharpened 
poles that protected the Varden’s leading edge, Eragon saw a lone soldier 
riding at a furious clip across the bleak no-man’s-land. Above him, the 
birds of prey swooped low to discover if the first course of their feast had 


568 


arrived. 


The soldier reined in his black stallion some thirty yards from the 
breastwork, keeping as much distance as possible between him and the 
Varden. He shouted, “By refusing King Galbatorix’s generous terms of 
surrender, you choose death as your fate. No more shall we negotiate. 
The hand of friendship has turned into the fist of war! If any of you still 
hold regard for your rightful sovereign, the all-knowing, all-powerful 
King Galbatorix, then flee! None may stand before us once we set forth 
to cleanse Alagaésia of every miscreant, traitor, and subversive. And 
though it pains our lord—for he knows that most of these rebellious acts 
are instigated by bitter and misguided leaders—we shall gently chastise 
the unlawful territory known as Surda and return it to the benevolent 
rule of King Galbatorix, he who sacrifices himself day and night for the 
good of his people. So flee, I say, or suffer the doom of your herald.” 


With that the soldier untied a canvas sack and flourished a severed 
head. He threw it into the air and watched it fall among the Varden, then 
turned his stallion, dug in his spurs, and galloped back toward the dark 
mass of Galbatorix’s army. 


“Shall I kill him?” asked Eragon. 


Nasuada shook her head. “We will have our due soon enough. I won't 
violate the sanctity of envoys, even if the Empire has.” 


“As you—” He yelped with surprise and clutched Saphira’s neck to 
keep from falling as she reared above the ramparts, planting her front legs 
upon the chartreuse bank. Opening her jaws, Saphira uttered a long, deep 
roar, much like Garzhvog had done, only this roar was a defiant challenge 
to their enemies, a warning of the wrath they had roused, and a clarion 
call to all who hated Galbatorix. 


The sound of her trumpeting voice frightened the stallion so badly, he 
jinked to the right, slipped on the heated ground, and fell on his side. The 
soldier was thrown free of the horse and landed in a gout of fire that 
erupted at that very instant. He uttered a single cry so horrible, it made 
Eragon’s scalp prickle, then was silent and still forevermore. 


The birds began to descend. 
The Varden cheered Saphira’s accomplishment. Even Nasuada allowed 


herself a small smile. Then she clapped her hands and said, “They will at- 
tack at dawn, I think. Eragon, gather Du Vrangr Gata and prepare your- 


569 


self for action. I will have orders for you within the hour.” Taking Orrin 
by the shoulder, she guided him back toward the center of the com- 
pound, saying, “Sire, there are decisions we must make. I have a certain 
plan, but it will require...” 


Let them come, said Saphira. The tip of her tail twitched like that of a 
cat stalking a rabbit. They will all burn. 


379 


WITCH’S BREW 





Night had fallen on the Burning Plains. The roof of opaque smoke cov- 
ered the moon and stars, plunging the land into profound darkness that 
was broken only by the sullen glow of the sporadic peat fires, and by the 
thousands of torches each army lit. From Eragon’s position near the fore 
of the Varden, the Empire looked a dense nest of uncertain orange lights 
as large as any city. 


As Eragon buckled the last piece of Saphira’s armor onto her tail, he 
closed his eyes to maintain better contact with the magicians from Du 
Vrangr Gata. He had to learn to locate them at a moment’s notice; his life 
would depend on communicating with them in a quick and timely man- 
ner. In turn, the magicians had to learn to recognize the touch of his mind 
so they did not block him when he needed their assistance. 


Eragon smiled and said, “Hello, Orik.” He opened his eyes to see Orik 
clambering up the low knuckle of rock where he and Saphira sat. The 
dwarf, who was fully armored, carried his Urgal-horn bow in his left 


hand. 


Hunkering beside Eragon, Orik wiped his brow and shook his head. 
“How’d you know it was me? I was shielding myself.” 


Every consciousness feels different, explained Saphira. Just like no two 
voices sound exactly the same. 


“Ah.” 
Eragon asked, “What brings you here?” 


Orik shrugged. “It struck me you might appreciate a spot of company 
in this grim night. Especially since Arya’s otherwise engaged and you 
don’t have Murtagh with you for this battle.” 


And I wish I did, thought Eragon. Murtagh had been the only human 
who matched Eragon’s skill with a sword, at least before the Agaeti 
Blédhren. Sparring with him had been one of Eragon’s few pleasures dur- 


ing their time together. I would have enjoyed fighting with you again, old 
friend. 


Remembering how Murtagh was killed—dragged underground by Ur- 
gals in Farthen Dar—forced Eragon to confront a sobering truth: No mat- 


571 


ter how great a warrior you were, as often as not, pure chance dictated 
who lived and who died in war. 


Orik must have sensed his mood, for he clapped Eragon on the shoul- 
der and said, “You'll be fine. Just imagine how the soldiers out there feel, 
knowing they have to face you before long!” 


Gratitude made Eragon smile again. “I’m glad you came.” 


The tip of Orik’s nose reddened, and he glanced down, rolling his bow 
between gnarled hands. “Ah, well,” he grumbled, “Hrothgar wouldn't 
much like it if I let something happen to you. Besides, we're foster broth- 
ers now, eh?” 


Through Eragon, Saphira asked, What about the other dwarves? Aren’t 
they under your command? 


A twinkle sprang into Orik’s eyes. “Why, yes, so they are. And they'll 
be joining us before long. Seeing as Eragon’s a member of Dtrgrimst 
Ingeitum, it’s only right we fight the Empire together. That way, the two 
of you won't be so vulnerable; you can concentrate on finding Galba- 
torix’s magicians instead of defending yourselves from constant attacks.” 


“A good idea. Thank you.” Orik grunted an acknowledgment. Then Er- 
agon asked, “What do you think about Nasuada and the Urgals?” 


“She made the right choice.” 
“You agree with her!” 
“I do. I don’t like it any more than you, but I do.” 


Silence enveloped them after that. Eragon sat against Saphira and stared 
out at the Empire, trying to prevent his growing anxiety from over- 
whelming him. Minutes dragged by. To him, the interminable waiting be- 
fore a battle was as stressful as the actual fighting. He oiled Saphira’s sad- 
dle, polished rust off his hauberk, and then resumed familiarizing himself 
with the minds of Du Vrangr Gata, anything to pass the time. 


Over an hour later, he paused as he sensed two beings approaching 
from across the no-man’s-land. Angela? Solembum? Puzzled and alarmed, 


he woke Orik—who had dozed off—and told him what he had discov- 


ered. 


BY ies 


The dwarf frowned and drew his war ax from his belt. “I’ve only met 
the herbalist a few times, but she didn’t seem like the sort who would 
betray us. She’s been welcome among the Varden for decades.” 


“We should still find out what she was doing,” said Eragon. 


Together they picked their way through the camp to intercept the duo 
as they approached the fortifications. Angela soon trotted into the light, 
Solembum at her heels. The witch was muffled in a dark, full-length 
cloak that allowed her to blend into the mottled landscape. Displaying a 
surprising amount of alacrity, strength, and flexibility, she clambered over 
the many rows of breastwork the dwarves had engineered, swinging from 
pole to pole, leaping over trenches, and finally running helter-skelter 
down the steep face of the last rampart to stop, panting, by Saphira. 


Throwing back the hood of her cloak, Angela flashed them a bright 
smile. “A welcoming committee! How thoughtful of you.” As she spoke, 
the werecat shivered along his length, fur rippling. Then his outline 
blurred as if seen through cloudy water, resolving once more into the 
nude figure of a shaggy-haired boy. Angela dipped her hand into a leather 
purse at her belt and passed a child’s tunic and breeches back to Solem- 
bum, along with the small black dagger he fought with. 


“What were you doing out there?” asked Orik, peering at them with a 
suspicious gaze. 


“Oh, this and that.” 
“I think you better tell us,” said Eragon. 


Her face hardened. “Is that so? Don’t you trust Solembum and me?” 
The werecat bared his pointed teeth. 


“Not really,” admitted Eragon, but with a small smile. 

“That’s good,” said Angela. She patted him on the cheek. “You'll live 
longer. If you must know, then, I was doing my best to help defeat the 
Empire, only my methods don’t involve yelling and running around with 
a sword.” 


“And what exactly are your methods?” growled Orik. 


Angela paused to roll up her cloak into a tight bundle, which she stored 
in her purse. “I’d rather not say; I want it to be a surprise. You won't have 


5/3 


to wait long to find out. It'll start in a few hours.” 


Orik tugged on his beard. “What will start? If you can’t give us a 
straight answer, we'll have to take you to Nasuada. Maybe she can wring 
some sense out of you.” 


‘It’s no use dragging me off to Nasuada,” said Angela. “She gave me 
permission to cross lines.” 


“So you say,” challenged Orik, ever more belligerent. 


“And so I say,” announced Nasuada, walking up to them from behind, 
as Eragon knew she would. He also sensed that she was accompanied by 
four Kull, one of whom was Garzhvog. Scowling, he turned to face them, 
making no attempt to hide his anger at the Urgals’ presence. 


“My Lady,” muttered Eragon. 


Orik was not as composed; he jumped back with a mighty oath, grasp- 
ing his war ax. He quickly realized that they were not under attack and 
gave Nasuada a terse greeting. But his hand never left the haft of his 
weapon and his eyes never left the hulking Urgals. Angela seemed to 
have no such inhibitions. She paid Nasuada the respect due to her, then 
addressed the Urgals in their own harsh language, to which they an- 
swered with evident delight. 


Nasuada drew Eragon off to the side so they could have a measure of 
privacy. There, she said, “I need you to put aside your feelings for a mo- 
ment and judge what I am about to tell you with logic and reason. Can 
you do that?” He nodded, stiff-faced. “Good. I’m doing everything I can to 
ensure we don’t lose tomorrow. It doesn’t matter, though, how well we 
fight, or how well I lead the Varden, or even if we rout the Empire if 
you, ” she poked him in the chest, “are killed. Do you understand?” He 
nodded again. “There’s nothing I can do to protect you if Galbatorix re- 
veals himself; if he does, you will face him alone. Du Vrangr Gata poses 
no more of a threat to him than they do to you, and I'll not have them 
eradicated without reason.” 


“I have always known,” said Eragon, “that I would face Galbatorix alone 
but for Saphira.” 


A sad smile touched Nasuada’s lips. She looked very tired in the flicker- 


ing torchlight. “Well, there’s no reason to invent trouble where none ex- 
ists. It’s possible Galbatorix isn’t even here.” She did not seem to believe 


574 


her own words, though. “In any case, I can at least keep you from dying 
from a sword in the gut. I heard what the dwarves intend to do, and I 
thought I could improve upon the concept. I asked Garzhvog and three 
of his rams to be your guards, so long as they agreed—which they have— 
to let you examine their minds for treachery.” 


Eragon went rigid. “You can’t expect me to fight with those monsters. 
Besides, I already accepted the dwarves’ offer to defend Saphira and me. 
They would take it poorly if I rejected them in favor of Urgals.” 


“Then they can both guard you,” retorted Nasuada. She searched his 
face for a long time, looking for what he could not tell. “Oh, Eragon. I’d 
hoped you could see past your hate. What else would you do in my posi- 
tion?” She sighed when he remained silent. “If anyone has cause to hold a 
grudge against the Urgals, it is I. They killed my father. Yet I cannot al- 
low that to interfere with deciding what’s best for the Varden.... At least 
ask Saphira’s opinion before you say yea or nay. I can order you to accept 
the Urgals’ protection, but I would rather not.” 


You're being foolish, observed Saphira without prompting. 

Foolish to not want Kull watching my back? 

No, foolish to refuse help, no matter where it comes from, in our present 
situation. Think. You know what Oromis would do, and you know what he 
would say. Don’t you trust his judgment? 

He can’t be right about everything, said Eragon. 

That’s no argument.... Search yourself, Eragon, and tell me whether I 
speak the truth. You know the correct path. I would be disappointed if you 
could not bring yourself to embrace it. 

Saphira and Nasuada’s cajoling only made Eragon more reluctant to 
agree. Still, he knew he had no choice. “All right, I’ll let them guard me, 
but only if I find nothing suspicious in their minds. Will you promise 


that, after this battle, you won’t make me work with an Urgal again?” 


Nasuada shook her head. “I can’t do that, not when it might hurt the 
Varden.” She paused and said, “Oh, and Eragon?” 


“Yes, my Lady?” 


“In the event of my death, I have chosen you as my successor. If that 


575 


should happen, I suggest you rely upon Jormundur’s advice—he has more 
experience than the other members of the Council of Elders—and I 
would expect you to place the welfare of those underneath you before 
all else. Am I clear, Eragon?” 


Her announcement caught him by surprise. Nothing meant more to her 
than the Varden. Offering it to him was the greatest act of trust she 
could make. Her confidence humbled and touched him; he bowed his 
head. “I would strive to be as good a leader as you and Ajihad have been. 
You honor me, Nasuada.” 


“Yes, I do.” Turning away from him, she rejoined the others. 


Still overwhelmed by Nasuada’s revelation, and finding his anger tem- 
pered by it, Eragon slowly walked back to Saphira. He studied Garzhvog 
and the other Urgals, trying to gauge their mood, but their features were 
so different from those he was accustomed to, he could discern nothing 
more than the broadest of emotions. Nor could he find any empathy 
within himself for the Urgals. To him, they were feral beasts that would 
kill him as soon as not and were incapable of love, kindness, or even true 
intelligence. In short, they were lesser beings. 


Deep within his mind, Saphira whispered, I’m sure Galbatorix is of the 
same opinion. 


And for good reason, he growled, intending to shock her. Suppressing his 
revulsion, he said out loud, “Nar Garzhvog, I am told that the four of you 
agreed to allow me within your minds.” 


“That is so, Firesword. Lady Nightstalker told us what was required. 
We are honored to have the chance to battle alongside such a mighty 
warrior, and one who has done so much for us.” 


“What do you mean? I have killed scores of your kin.” Unbidden, ex- 
cerpts from one of Oromis’s scrolls rose in Eragon’s memory. He remem- 
bered reading that Urgals, both male and female, determined their rank in 
society through combat, and that it was this practice, above all else, that 
had led to so many conflicts between Urgals and other races. Which 
meant, he realized, that if they admired his feats in battle, then they may 
have accorded him the same status as one of their war chiefs. 


“By killing Durza, you freed us from his control. We are in your debt, 


Firesword. None of our rams will challenge you, and if you visit our halls, 
you and the dragon, Flametongue, will be welcomed as no outsiders ever 


576 


before.” 


Of all the responses Eragon had expected, gratitude was the last, and it 
was the one he was least prepared to deal with. Unable to think of any- 
thing else, he said, “I won't forget.” He switched his gaze to the other Ur- 
gals, then returned it to Garzhvog and his yellow eyes. “Are you ready?” 


“Aye, Rider.” 


As Eragon reached toward Garzhvog’s consciousness, it reminded him 
of how the Twins invaded his mind when he first entered Farthen Dar. 
That observation was swept away as he immersed himself in the Urgal’s 
identity. The very nature of his search—looking for malevolent intent 
perhaps hidden somewhere in Garzhvog’s past—meant Eragon had to 
examine years of memories. Unlike the Twins, Eragon avoided causing 
deliberate pain, but he was not overly gentle. He could feel Garzhvog 
flinch with occasional pangs of discomfort. Like dwarves and elves, the 
mind of an Urgal possessed different elements than a human mind. Its 
structure emphasized rigidity and hierarchy—a result of the tribes the 
Urgals organized themselves into—but it felt rough and raw, brutal and 
cunning: the mind of a wild animal. 


Though he made no effort to learn more about Garzhvog as an individ- 
ual, Eragon could not help absorbing pieces of the Urgal’s life. Garzhvog 
did not resist. Indeed, he seemed eager to share his experiences, to con- 
vince Eragon that Urgals were not his born enemies. We cannot afford to 
have another Rider rise up who seeks to destroy us, said Garzhvog. Look 
well, O Firesword, and see if we are truly the monsters you call us.... 


So many images and sensations flashed between them, Eragon almost 
lost track: Garzhvog’s childhood with the other members of his brood in 
a ramshackle village built deep in the heart of the Spine; his dam brush- 
ing his hair with an antler comb and singing a soft song; learning to hunt 
deer and other prey with his bare hands; growing larger and larger until it 
was apparent that the old blood still flowed in his veins and he would 
stand over eight feet tall, making him a Kull; the dozens of challenges he 
made, accepted, and won; venturing out of the village to gain renown, so 
he might mate, and gradually learning to hate, distrust, and fear—yes, fear 
—a world that had condemned his race; fighting in Farthen Dar, discov- 
ering they had been manipulated by Durza; and realizing that their only 
hope of a better life was to put aside old differences, befriend the 
Varden, and see Galbatorix overthrown. Nowhere was there evidence 
that Garzhvog lied. 


577 


Eragon could not understand what he had seen. Tearing himself from 
Garzhvog’s mind, he dove into each of the three remaining Urgals. Their 
memories confirmed the facts presented by Garzhvog. They made no at- 
tempt to conceal that they had killed humans, but it had been done at 
the command of Durza when the sorcerer controlled them, or when 
fighting humans over food or land. We did what we had to in order to care 
for our families, they said. 


When he finished, Eragon stood before Garzhvog and knew the Urgal’s 
bloodline was as regal as any prince’s. He knew that, though uneducated, 
Garzhvog was a brilliant commander and as great a thinker and philoso- 
pher as Oromis himself. He’s certainly brighter than me, admitted Eragon 
to Saphira. Baring his throat as a sign of respect, he said out loud, “Nar 
Garzhvog,” and for the first time, he was aware of the lofty origins of the 
title nar. “I am proud to have you at my side. You may tell the Herndall 
that so long as the Urgals remain true to their word and do not turn 
against the Varden, I shall not oppose you.” Eragon doubted that he 
would ever like an Urgal, but the iron certitude of his prejudice only a 
few minutes before now seemed ignorant, and he could not retain it in 
good conscience. 


Saphira flicked him on the arm with her barbed tongue, making the 
mail clink together. It takes courage to admit you were wrong. 


Only if you are afraid of looking foolish, and I would have looked far 
more foolish if I persisted with an erroneous belief. 


Why, little one, you just said something wise. Despite her teasing, he 
could sense her warm pride in what he had accomplished. 


“Again, we are in your debt, Firesword,” said Garzhvog. He and the 
other Urgals pressed their fists against their jutting brows. 


Eragon could tell that Nasuada wanted to know the details of what had 
just transpired but that she restrained herself. “Good. Now that this is 
settled, I must be off. Eragon, you'll receive my signal from Trianna when 
the time has arrived.” With that she strode away into the darkness. 


As Eragon settled against Saphira, Orik sidled up to him. “It’s lucky we 
dwarves are going to be here, eh? We'll watch the Kull like hawks, we 
will. We won't let them catch you while your back is turned. The mo- 


ment they attack, we'll cut their legs out from under them.” 


“I thought you agreed with Nasuada’s accepting the Urgals’ offer.” 


578 


“That doesn’t mean I trust them or want to be right alongside them, 
now does it?” Eragon smiled and did not bother to argue; it would be im- 
possible to convince Orik that the Urgals were not rapacious killers when 
he himself had refused to consider the possibility until sharing an Urgal’s 
memories. 


The night lay heavy around them as they waited for dawn. Orik re- 
moved a whetstone from his pocket and proceeded to hone the edge of 
his curved ax. Once they arrived, the six other dwarves did the same, and 
the rasp of metal on stone filled the air with a grating chorus. The Kull 
sat back to back, chanting death songs under their breaths. Eragon spent 
the time casting wards about himself, Saphira, Nasuada, Orik, and even 
Arya. He knew that it was dangerous to protect so many, but he could 
not bear it if they were harmed. When he finished, he transferred what 
power he dared into the diamonds embedded within the belt of Beloth 
the Wise. 


Eragon watched with interest as Angela clad herself in green and black 
armor and then, taking out a carved-wood case, assembled her staff- 
sword from two separate handles that attached in the middle and two 
blades of watered steel that threaded into the ends of the resulting pole. 
She twirled the completed weapon around her head a few times before 
seeming satisfied that it would hold up to the shock of battle. 


The dwarves eyed her with disapproval, and Eragon heard one grumble, 
“. blasphemy that any but Dargrimst Quan should wield the hathvir.” 


After that the only sound was the discordant music of the dwarves 
honing their blades. 


It was near dawn when the cries began. Eragon and Saphira noticed 
them first because of their heightened senses, but the agonized screams 
were soon loud enough for the others to hear. Rising to his feet, Orik 
looked out toward the Empire, where the cacophony originated. “What 
manner of creatures are they torturing to extract such fearsome howls? 
The sound chills the marrow in my bones, it does.” 


“I told you that you wouldn't have to wait very long,” said Angela. Her 
former cheer had deserted her; she looked pale, drawn, and gray in the 


face, as if she were ill. 


From his post by Saphira, Eragon asked, “You did this?” 


79 


“Aye. I poisoned their stew, their bread, their drink—anything I could 
get my hands on. Some will die now, others will die later as the various 
toxins take their toll. I slipped the officers nightshade and other such poi- 
sons so they will hallucinate in battle.” She tried to smile, but without 
much success. “Not a very honorable way to fight, I suppose, but I’d 
rather do this than be killed. Confusion to our enemies and all that.” 


“Only a coward or a thief uses poison!” exclaimed Orik. “What glory is 
there in defeating a sick opponent?” The screams intensified even as he 
spoke. 


Angela gave an unpleasant laugh. “Glory? If you want glory, there are 
thousands more troops I didn’t poison. I’m sure you will have your fill of 
glory by the end of today.” 


“Is this why you needed the equipment in Orrin’s tent?” asked Eragon. 
He found her deed repugnant but did not pretend to know whether it 
was good or evil. It was necessary. Angela had poisoned the soldiers for 
the same reason Nasuada had accepted the Urgals’ offer of friendship— 
because it might be their only hope of survival. 


“That's right.” 


The soldiers’ wails increased in number until Eragon longed to plug his 
ears and block out the sound. It made him wince and fidget, and it put 
his teeth on edge. He forced himself to listen, though. This was the cost 
of resisting the Empire. It would be wrong to ignore it. So he sat with his 
hands clenched into fists and his jaw forming painful knots while the 
Burning Plains echoed with the disembodied voices of dying men. 


580 


THE STORM BREAKS 





The first horizontal rays of dawn already streaked across the land when 
Trianna said to Eragon, It is time. A surge of energy erased Eragon’s 
sleepiness. Jumping to his feet, he shouted the word to everyone around 
him, even as he clambered into Saphira’s saddle, pulling his new bow 
from its quiver. The Kull and dwarves surrounded Saphira, and together 
they hurried down the breastwork until they reached the opening that 
had been cleared during the night. 


The Varden poured through the gap, quiet as they could be. Rank 
upon rank of warriors marched past, their armor and weapons padded 
with rags so no sound would alert the Empire of their approach. Saphira 
joined the procession when Nasuada appeared on a roan charger in the 
midst of the men, Arya and Trianna by her side. The five of them ac- 
knowledged each other with quick glances, nothing more. 


During the night, the mephitic vapors had accumulated low to the 
ground, and now the dim morning light gilded the turgid clouds, turning 
them opaque. Thus, the Varden managed to cross three-quarters of the 
no-man’s-land before they were seen by the Empire’s sentries. As the 
alarm horns rang out before them, Nasuada shouted, “Now, Eragon! Tell 
Orrin to strike. To me, men of the Varden! Fight to win back your 
homes. Fight to guard your wives and children! Fight to overthrow Gal- 
batorix! Attack and bathe your blades in the blood of our enemies! 
Charge!” She spurred her horse forward, and with a great bellow, the 
men followed, shaking their weapons above their heads. 


Eragon conveyed Nasuada’s order to Barden, the spellcaster who rode 
with King Orrin. A moment later, he heard the drumming of hooves as 
Orrin and his cavalry—accompanied by the rest of the Kull, who could 
run as fast as horses—galloped out of the east. They charged into the 
Empire’s flank, pinning the soldiers against the Jiet River and distracting 
them long enough for the Varden to cross the remainder of the distance 
between them without opposition. 


The two armies collided with a deafening roar. Pikes clashed against 
spears, hammers against shields, swords against helms, and above it all 
whirled the hungry gore-crows uttering their harsh croaks, driven into a 
frenzy by the smell of fresh meat below. 


Eragon’s heart leaped within his chest. I must now kill or be killed. Al- 
most immediately he felt his wards drawing upon his strength as they de- 


581 


flected attacks from Arya, Orik, Nasuada, and Saphira. 


Saphira held back from the leading edge of the battle, for they would 
be too exposed to Galbatorix’s magicians at the front. Taking a deep 
breath, Eragon began to search for those magicians with his mind, firing 
arrows all the while. 


Du Vrangr Gata found the first enemy spellcaster. The instant he was 
alerted, Eragon reached out to the woman who made the discovery, and 
from there to the foe she grappled with. Bringing the full power of his 
will to bear, Eragon demolished the magician’s resistance, took control of 
his consciousness—doing his best to ignore the man’s terror—determined 
which troops the man was guarding, and slew the man with one of the 
twelve words of death. Without pause, Eragon located the minds of each 
of the now-unprotected soldiers and killed them as well. The Varden 
cheered as the knot of men went limp. 


The ease with which he slew them amazed Eragon. The soldiers had 
had no chance to escape or fight back. How different from Farthen Diir, he 
thought. Though he marveled at the perfection of his skills, the deaths 
sickened him. But there was no time to dwell on it. 


Recovering from the Varden’s initial assault, the Empire began to man 
their engines of war: catapults that cast round missiles of hard-baked ce- 
ramic, trebuchets armed with barrels of liquid fire, and ballistae that 
bombarded the attackers with a hail of arrows six feet long. The ceramic 
balls and the liquid fire caused terrific damage when they landed. One 
ball exploded against the ground not ten yards from Saphira. As Eragon 
ducked behind his shield, a jagged fragment spun toward his head, only to 
be stopped dead in the air by one of his wards. He blinked at the sudden 
loss of energy. 


The engines soon stalled the Varden’s advance, sowing mayhem wher- 
ever they aimed. They have to be destroyed if we're going to last long 
enough to wear down the Empire, realized Eragon. It would be easy for 
Saphira to dismantle the machines, but she dared not fly among the sol- 
diers for fear of an attack by magic. 


Breaking through the Varden lines, eight soldiers stormed toward 
Saphira, jabbing at her with pikes. Before Eragon could draw Zar’roc, the 


dwarves and Kull eliminated the entire group. 


“A good fight!” roared Garzhvog. 


“A good fight!” agreed Orik with a bloody grin. 


Eragon did not use spells against the engines; they would be protected 
against any conceivable enchantment. Unless... Extending himself, he 
found the mind of a soldier who tended one of the catapults. Though he 
was sure the soldier was defended by some magician, Eragon was able to 
gain dominance over him and direct his actions from afar. He guided the 
man up to the weapon, which was being loaded, then had him use his 
sword to hack at the skein of twisted rope that powered the machine. 
The rope was too thick to sever before the soldier was dragged away by 
his comrades, but the damage was already done. With a mighty crack, the 
partially wound skein broke, sending the arm of the catapult flying 
backward and injuring several men. His lips curled in a grim smile, Er- 
agon proceeded to the next catapult and, in short order, disabled the re- 
mainder of the engines. 


Returning to himself, Eragon became aware of dozens of the Varden 
collapsing around Saphira; one of Du Vrangr Gata had been over- 
whelmed. He uttered a dreadful curse and flung himself back along the 
trail of magic as he searched for the man who cast the fatal spell, entrust- 
ing the welfare of his body to Saphira and his guards. 


For over an hour, Eragon hunted Galbatorix’s magicians, but to little 
avail, for they were wily and cunning and did not directly attack him. 
Their reticence puzzled Eragon until he tore from the mind of one spell- 
caster—moments before he committed suicide—the thought,... ordered 
not to kill you or the dragon... not to kill you or the dragon. 


That answers my question, he said to Saphira, but why does Galbatorix 
still want us alive? We’ve made it clear we support the Varden. 


Before she could respond, Nasuada appeared before them, her face 
streaked with filth and gore, her shield covered with dents, blood sheet- 
ing down her left leg from a wound on her thigh. “Eragon,” she gasped. “I 
need you, both of you, to fight, to show yourselves and embolden the 
men... to frighten the soldiers.” 


Her condition shocked Eragon. “Let me heal you first,” he cried, afraid 
she might faint. I should have put more wards around her. 


“No! I can wait, but we are lost unless you stem the tide of soldiers.” 


Her eyes were glazed and empty, blank holes in her face. “We need... a 
Rider.” She swayed in her saddle. 


583 


Eragon saluted her with Zar’roc. “You have one, my Lady.” 
“Go,” she said, “and may what gods there are watch over you.” 


Eragon was too high on Saphira’s back to strike his enemies below, so 
he dismounted and positioned himself by her right paw. To Orik and 
Garzhvog, he said, “Protect Saphira’s left side. And whatever you do, 
don’t get in our way.” 


“You will be overrun, Firesword.” 


“No,” said Eragon, “I won't. Now take your places!” As they did, he put 
his hand on Saphira’s leg and looked her in one clear-cut sapphire eye. 
Shall we dance, friend of my heart? 


We shall, little one. 


Then he and she merged their identities to a greater degree than ever 
before, vanquishing all differences between them to become a single en- 
tity. They bellowed, leaped forward, and forged a path to the front line. 
Once there, Eragon could not tell from whose mouth emanated the rav- 
enous jet of flame that consumed a dozen soldiers, cooking them in their 
mail, nor whose arm it was that brought Zar’roc down in an arc, cleaving 
a soldier’s helm in half. 


The metallic scent of blood clogged the air, and curtains of smoke 
wafted over the Burning Plains, alternately concealing and revealing the 
knots, clumps, ranks, and battalions of thrashing bodies. Overhead, the 
carrion birds waited for their meal and the sun climbed in the firmament 
toward noon. 


From the minds of those around them, Eragon and Saphira caught 
glimpses of how they appeared. Saphira was always noticed first: a great 
ravening creature with claws and fangs dyed red, who slew all in her path 
with swipes of her paws and lashes of her tail and with billowing waves 
of flame that engulfed entire platoons of soldiers. Her brilliant scales glit- 
tered like stars and nearly blinded her foes with their reflected light. 
Next they saw Eragon running alongside Saphira. He moved faster than 
the soldiers could react and, with strength beyond men, splintered shields 
with a single blow, rent armor, and clove the swords of those who op- 
posed him. Shot and dart cast at him fell to the pestilent ground ten feet 
away, stopped by his wards. 


It was harder for Eragon—and, by extension, Saphira—to fight his own 


584 


race than it had been to fight the Urgals in Farthen Dar. Every time he 
saw a frightened face or looked into a soldier’s mind, he thought, This 
could be me. But he and Saphira could afford no mercy; if a soldier stood 


before them, he died. 


Three times they sallied forth and three times Eragon and Saphira slew 
every man in the Empire’s first few ranks before retreating to the main 
body of the Varden to avoid being surrounded. By the end of their last 
attack, Eragon had to reduce or eliminate certain wards around Arya, 
Orik, Nasuada, Saphira, and himself in order to keep the spells from ex- 
hausting him too quickly. For though his strength was great, so too were 
the demands of battle. 


Ready? he asked Saphira after a brief respite. She growled an affirma- 
tive. 


A cloud of arrows whistled toward Eragon the instant he dove back 
into combat. Fast as an elf, he dodged the bulk of them—since his magic 
no longer protected him from such missiles—caught twelve on his shield, 
and stumbled as one struck his belly and one his side. Neither shaft 
pierced his armor, but they knocked the wind out of him and left bruises 
the size of apples. Don’t stop! You’ve dealt with worse pain than this be- 


fore, he told himself. 


Rushing a cluster of eight soldiers, Eragon darted from one to the next, 
knocking aside their pikes and jabbing Zar’roc like a deadly bolt of light- 
ning. The fighting had dulled his reflexes, though, and one soldier man- 
aged to drive his pike through Eragon’s hauberk, slicing his left triceps. 


The soldiers cringed as Saphira roared. 

Eragon took advantage of the distraction to fortify himself with energy 
stored within the ruby in Zar'roc’s pommel and then to kill the three re- 
maining soldiers. 

Sweeping her tail over him, Saphira knocked a score of men out of his 
way. In the lull that followed, Eragon looked over at his throbbing arm 
and said, “Waise heill.” He also healed his bruises, relying upon Zar'roc’s 
ruby, as well as the diamonds in the belt of Beloth the Wise. 


Then the two of them pressed onward. 


Eragon and Saphira choked the Burning Plains with mountains of their 
enemies, and yet the Empire never faltered or fell back. For every man 


585 


they killed, another stepped forth to take his place. A sense of hopeless- 
ness engulfed Eragon as the mass of soldiers gradually forced the Varden 
to retreat toward their own camp. He saw his despair mirrored in the 
faces of Nasuada, Arya, King Orrin, and even Angela when he passed 
them in battle. 


All our training and we still can’t stop the Empire, raged Eragon. There 
are just too many soldiers! We can’t keep this up forever. And Zar’roc and 
the belt are almost depleted. 


You can draw energy from your surroundings if you have to. 


I won't, not unless I kill another of Galbatorix’s magicians and can take 
it from the soldiers. Otherwise, I'll just be hurting the rest of the Varden, 
since there are no plants or animals here I can use to support us. 


As the long hours dragged by, Eragon grew sore and weary and— 
stripped of many of his arcane defenses—accumulated dozens of minor 
injuries. His left arm went numb from the countless blows that ham- 
mered his mangled shield. A scratch on his forehead kept blinding him 
with rivulets of hot, sweat-mixed blood. He thought one of his fingers 
might be broken. 


Saphira fared no better. The soldiers’ armor tore the inside of her 
mouth, dozens of swords and arrows cut her unprotected wings, and a 
javelin punctured one of her own plates of armor, wounding her in the 
shoulder. Eragon saw the spear coming and tried to deflect it with a spell 
but was too slow. Whenever Saphira moved, she splattered the ground 


with hundreds of drops of blood. 
Beside them, three of Orik’s warriors fell, and two of the Kull. 
And the sun began its descent toward evening. 


As Eragon and Saphira prepared for their seventh and final assault, a 
trumpet sounded in the east, loud and clear, and King Orrin shouted, 
“The dwarves are here! The dwarves are here!” 


Dwarves? Eragon blinked and glanced around, confused. He saw noth- 
ing but soldiers. Then a jolt of excitement raced through him as he un- 
derstood. The dwarves! He climbed onto Saphira and she jumped into the 
air, hanging for a moment on her tattered wings as they surveyed the bat- 


tlefield. 


586 


It was true—a great host marched out of the east toward the Burning 
Plains. At its head strode King Hrothgar, clad in gold mail, his jeweled 
helm upon his brow, and Volund, his ancient war hammer, gripped in his 
iron fist. The dwarf king raised Volund in greeting when he saw Eragon 
and Saphira. 


Eragon howled at the top of his lungs and returned the gesture, bran- 
dishing Zar’roc in the air. A surge of renewed vigor made him forget his 
wounds and feel fierce and determined again. Saphira added her voice to 
his, and the Varden looked to her with hope, while the Empire’s soldiers 
hesitated with fear. 


“What did you see?” cried Orik as Saphira dropped back to earth. “Is it 
Hrothgar? How many warriors did he bring?” 


Ecstatic with relief, Eragon stood in his stirrups and shouted, “Take 
heart, King Hrothgar is here! And it looks like every single dwarf is be- 
hind him! We'll crush the Empire!” After the men stopped cheering, he 
added, “Now take your swords and remind these flea-bitten cowards why 
they should fear us. Charge!” 


Just as Saphira leaped toward the soldiers, Eragon heard a second cry, 
this one from the west: “A ship! A ship is coming up the Jiet River!” 


“Blast it,’ he snarled. We can’t let a ship land if it’s bringing reinforce- 
ments for the Empire. Contacting Trianna, he said, Tell Nasuada that 
Saphira and I will take care of this. We'll sink the ship if it’s from Galba- 


torix. 
As you wish, Argetlam, replied the sorceress. 


Without hesitation, Saphira took flight, circling high over the trampled, 
smoking plain. As the relentless clamor of combat faded from his ears, 
Eragon took a deep breath, feeling his mind clear. Below, he was sur- 
prised by how scattered both armies had become. The Empire and the 
Varden had disintegrated into a series of smaller groups contending 
against one another over the entire breadth and width of the Burning 
Plains. It was into this confused tumult that the dwarves inserted them- 
selves, catching the Empire from the side—as Orrin had done earlier with 
his cavalry. 


Eragon lost sight of the battle when Saphira turned to her left and 


soared through the clouds in the direction of the Jiet River. A gust of 
wind blew the peat smoke out of their way and unveiled a large three- 


587 


masted ship riding upon the orange water, rowing against the current 
with two banks of oars. The ship was scarred and damaged and flew no 
colors to declare its allegiance. Nevertheless, Eragon readied himself to 
destroy the vessel. As Saphira dove toward it, he lifted Zar’roc overhead 
and loosed his savage war cry. 


588 


CONVERGENCE 





Roran stood at the prow of the Dragon Wing and listened to the oars 
swish through the water. He had just finished a stint rowing and a cold, 
jagged ache permeated his right shoulder. Will I always have to deal with 
this reminder of the Ra’zac? He wiped the sweat from his face and ignored 
the discomfort, concentrating instead on the river ahead, which was ob- 
scured by a bank of sooty clouds. 


Elain joined him at the railing. She rested a hand on her swollen belly. 
“The water looks evil,” she said. “Perhaps we should have stayed in 
Dauth, rather than drag ourselves in search of more trouble.” 


He feared she spoke the truth. After the Boar's Eye, they had sailed east 
from the Southern Isles back to the coast and then up the mouth of the 
Jiet River to Surda’s port city of Dauth. By the time they made landfall, 
their stores were exhausted and the villagers sickly. 


Roran had every intention of staying in Dauth, especially after they re- 
ceived an enthusiastic welcome from its governor, Lady Alarice. But that 
was before he was told about Galbatorix’s army. If the Varden were de- 
feated, he would never see Katrina again. So, with the help of Jeod, he 
convinced Horst and many of the other villagers that if they wanted to 
live in Surda, safe from the Empire, they had to row up the Jiet River and 
assist the Varden. It was a difficult task, but in the end Roran prevailed. 
And once they told Lady Alarice about their quest, she gave them all the 
supplies they wanted. 


Since then, Roran often wondered if he made the right choice. By now 
everyone hated living on the Dragon Wing. People were tense and short- 
tempered, a situation only aggravated by the knowledge they were sailing 
toward a battle. Was it all selfishness on my part? wondered Roran. Did I 
really do this for the benefit of the villagers, or only because it will bring me 
one step closer to finding Katrina? 


“Perhaps we should have,” he said to Elain. 


Together they watched as a thick layer of smoke gathered overhead, 
darkening the sky, obscuring the sun, and filtering the remaining light so 
that everything below was colored a nauseating hue of orange. It pro- 
duced an eerie twilight the likes of which Roran had never imagined. The 
sailors on deck looked about fearfully and muttered charms of protec- 
tion, pulling out stone amulets to ward off the evil eye. 


589 


“Listen,” said Elain. She tilted her head. “What is that?” 


Roran strained his ears and caught the faint ring of metal striking metal. 
“That,” he said, “is the sound of our destiny.” Twisting, he shouted back 
over his shoulder, “Captain, there’s fighting just ahead)” 


“Man the ballistae!” roared Uthar. “Double-time on those oars, Bonden. 
An’ every able-bodied man jack among you better be ready or you'll be 
using your guts for pillows!” 


Roran remained where he was as the Dragon Wing exploded with ac- 
tivity. Despite the increase in noise, he could still hear swords and shields 
clanging together in the distance. The screams of men were audible now, 
as were the roars of some giant beast. 


He glanced over as Jeod joined them at the prow. The merchant’s face 
was pale. “Have you ever been in battle before?” asked Roran. 


The knob in Jeod’s throat bobbed as he swallowed and shook his head. 
“I got into plenty of fights along with Brom, but never anything of this 
scale.” 


“A first for both of us, then.” 


The bank of smoke thinned on the right, providing them with a 
glimpse of a dark land that belched forth fire and putrid orange vapor and 
was covered with masses of struggling men. It was impossible to tell who 
was the Empire and who was the Varden, but it was apparent to Roran 
that the battle could tip in either direction given the right nudge. We can 
provide that nudge. 


Then a voice echoed over the water as a man shouted, “A ship! A ship 
is coming up the Jiet River!” 


“You should go belowdecks,” said Roran to Elain. “It won't be safe for 
you here.” She nodded and hurried to the fore hatchway, where she 
climbed down the ladder, closing the opening behind her. A moment 
later, Horst bounded up to the prow and handed Roran one of Fisk’s 
shields. 

“Thought you might need that,” said Horst. 


“Thanks. I—” 


59? 


Roran stopped as the air around them vibrated, as if from a mighty 
concussion. Thud. His teeth jarred together. Thud. His ears hurt from the 
pressure. Close upon the heels of the second impact came a third— 
thud—and with it a raw-throated yell that Roran recognized, for he had 
heard it many times in his childhood. He looked up and beheld a gigantic 
sapphire dragon diving out of the shifting clouds. And on the dragon’s 
back, at the juncture between its neck and shoulders, sat his cousin, Er- 
agon. 


It was not the Eragon he remembered, but rather as if an artist had 
taken his cousin’s base features and enhanced them, streamlined them, 
making them both more noble and more feline. This Eragon was garbed 
like a prince, in fine cloth and armor—though tarnished by the grime of 
war—and in his right hand he wielded a blade of iridescent red. This Er- 
agon, Roran knew, could kill without hesitation. This Eragon was power- 
ful and implacable.... This Eragon could slay the Ra’zac and their mounts 
and help him to rescue Katrina. 


Flaring its translucent wings, the dragon pulled up sharply and hung be- 
fore the ship. Then Eragon met Roran’s eyes. 


Until that moment, Roran had not completely believed Jeod’s story 
about Eragon and Brom. Now, as he stared at his cousin, a wave of con- 
fused emotions washed over him. Eragon is a Rider! It seemed inconceiv- 
able that the slight, moody, overeager boy he grew up with had turned 
into this fearsome warrior. Seeing him alive again filled Roran with unex- 
pected joy. Yet, at the same time, a terrible, familiar anger welled up in- 
side him over Eragon’s role in Garrow’s death and the siege of Carvahall. 
In those few seconds, Roran knew not whether he loved or hated Eragon. 


He stiffened with alarm as a vast and alien being touched his mind. 
From that consciousness emanated Eragon’s voice: Roran? 


“Aye.” 


Think your answers and I'll hear them. Is everyone from Carvahall with 
you? 


Just about. 
How did you... No, we can’t go into it; there’s no time. Stay where you are 


until the battle is decided. Better yet, go back farther down the river, where 
the Empire can’t attack you. 


591 


We have to talk, Eragon. You have much to answer for. 


Eragon hesitated with a troubled expression, then said, I know. But not 
now, later. With no visible prompting, the dragon veered away from the 
ship and flew off to the east, vanishing in the haze over the Burning 
Plains. 


In an awed voice, Horst said, “A Rider! A real Rider! I never thought I'd 
see the day, much less that it would be Eragon.” He shook his head. “I 
guess you told us the truth, eh, Longshanks?” Jeod grinned in response, 


looking like a delighted child. 


Their words sounded muted to Roran as he stared at the deck, feeling 
like he was about to explode with tension. A host of unanswerable ques- 
tions assailed him. He forced himself to ignore them. I can’t think about 
Eragon now. We have to fight. The Varden must defeat the Empire. 


A rising tide of fury consumed him. He had experienced this before, a 
berserk frenzy that allowed him to overcome nearly any obstacle, to 
move objects he could not shift ordinarily, to face an enemy in combat 
and feel no fear. It gripped him now, a fever in his veins, quickening his 
breath and setting his heart a-pounding. 


He pushed himself off the railing, ran the length of the ship to the 
quarterdeck, where Uthar stood by the wheel, and said, “Ground the 
ship.” 


“What?” 


“Ground the ship, I say! Stay here with the rest of the soldiers and use 
the ballistae to wreak what havoc you can, keep the Dragon Wing from 
being boarded, and guard our families with your lives. Understand?” 


Uthar stared at him with flat eyes, and Roran feared he would not ac- 
cept the orders. Then the scarred sailor grunted and said, “Aye, aye, 


Stronghammer.” 


Horst’s heavy tread preceded his arrival at the quarterdeck. “What do 
you intend to do, Roran?” 


“Do?” Roran laughed and spun widdershins to stand toe to toe with the 
smith. “Do? Why, I intend to alter the fate of Alagaésia!” 


592 


ELDEST 





Eragon barely noticed as Saphira carried him back into the swirling 
confusion of the battle. He had known that Roran was at sea, but it never 
occurred to him that Roran might be heading for Surda, nor that they 
would reunite in this manner. And Roran’s eyes! His eyes seemed to bore 
into Eragon, questioning, relieved, enraged...accusing. In them, Eragon saw 
that his cousin had learned of Eragon’s role in Garrow’s death and had not 
yet forgiven him. 


It was only when a sword bounced off his greaves that Eragon returned 
his attention to his surroundings. He unleashed a hoarse shout and slashed 
downward, cutting away the soldier who struck him. Cursing himself for 
being so careless, Eragon reached out to Trianna and said, No one on that 
ship is an enemy. Spread the word that they’re not to be attacked. Ask 
Nasuada if, as a favor to us, she can send a herald to explain the situation 
to them and see that they stay away from the fighting. 


As you wish, Argetlam. 


From the western flank of the battle, where she alighted, Saphira trav- 
ersed the Burning Plains in a few giant leaps, stopping before Hrothgar 
and his dwarves. Dismounting, Eragon went to the king, who said, “Hail, 
Argetlam! Hail, Saphira! The elves seem to have done more for you than 
they promised.” Beside him stood Orik. 


“No, sir, it was the dragons.” 
“Really? I must hear your adventures once our bloody work here is 


done. I’m glad you accepted my offer to become Dtrgrimst Ingeitum. It 
is an honor to have you as mine kin.” 


“And you mine.” 

Hrothgar laughed, then turned to Saphira and said, “I still haven’t for- 
gotten your vow to mend Isidar Mithrim, dragon. Even now, our artisans 
are assembling the star sapphire in the center of Tronjheim. I look for- 
ward to seeing it whole once again.” 


She bowed her head. As I promised, so it shall be. 


After Eragon repeated her words, Hrothgar reached out with a gnarled 
finger and tapped one of the metal plates on her side. “I see you wear our 


593. 


armor. I hope it has served you well.” 


Very well, King Hrothgar, said Saphira through Eragon. It has saved me 
many an injury. 


Hrothgar straightened and lifted Volund, a twinkle in his deep-set eyes. 
“Well then, shall we march out and test it once again in the forge of 
war?” He looked back at his warriors and shouted, “Akh sartos oen dir- 
grimst!” 


“Vor Hrothgarz korda! Vor Hrothgarz kordal” 


Eragon looked at Orik, who translated with a mighty yell, “By Hroth- 
gar’s hammer!” Joining the chant, Eragon ran with the dwarf king toward 
the crimson ranks of soldiers, Saphira by his side. 


Now at last, with the help of the dwarves, the battle turned in favor of 
the Varden. Together they pushed back the Empire, dividing them, 
crushing them, forcing Galbatorix’s vast army to abandon positions they 
had held since morn. Their efforts were helped by the fact that more of 
Angela’s poisons had taken effect. Many of the Empire’s officers behaved 
irrationally, giving orders that made it easier for the Varden to penetrate 
deeper into the army, sowing chaos as they went. The soldiers seemed to 
realize that fortune no longer smiled upon them, for hundreds surren- 
dered, or defected outright and turned on their former comrades, or 
threw down their weapons and fled. 


And the day passed into the late afternoon. 


Eragon was in the midst of fighting two soldiers when a flaming javelin 
roared past overhead and buried itself in one of the Empire’s command 
tents twenty yards away, igniting the fabric. Dispatching his opponents, 
Eragon glanced back and saw dozens of fiery missiles arcing out from the 
ship on the Jiet River. What are you playing at, Roran? wondered Eragon 
before charging the next batch of soldiers. 


Soon afterward, a horn echoed from the rear of the Empire’s army, then 
another and another. Someone began to pound a sonorous drum, the 
peals of which stilled the field as everyone looked about for the source of 
the beat. Even as Eragon watched, an ominous figure detached itself from 
the horizon in the north and rose up in the lurid sky over the Burning 
Plains. The gore-crows scattered before the barbed black shadow, which 
balanced motionless upon the thermals. At first Eragon thought it a 
Lethrblaka, one of the Ra’zac’s mounts. Then a ray of light escaped the 


594 


clouds and struck the figure crossways from the west. 


A red dragon floated above them, glowing and sparkling in the sun- 
beam like a bed of blood-red coals. His wing membranes were the color 
of wine held before a lantern. His claws and teeth and the spikes along 
his spine were white as snow. In his vermilion eyes there gleamed a terri- 
ble glee. On his back was fixed a saddle, and in that saddle sat a man 
garbed in polished steel armor and armed with a hand-and-a-half sword. 


Dread clutched at Eragon. Galbatorix managed to get another dragon to 
hatch! 


Then the man in steel raised his left hand and a shaft of crackling ruby 
energy sprang from his palm and smote Hrothgar on the breast. The 
dwarf spellcasters cried out with agony as the energy from their bodies 
was consumed trying to block the attack. They collapsed, dead, then 
Hrothgar clutched his heart and toppled to the ground. The dwarves gave 
a great groan of despair as they saw their king fall. 


“No!” cried Eragon, and Saphira roared in protest. He glared with hate 
at the enemy Rider. I'll kill you for that. 


Eragon knew that, as they were, he and Saphira were too tired to con- 
front such a mighty opponent. Glancing around, Eragon spotted a horse 
lying in the mud, a spear through its side. The stallion was still alive. Er- 
agon put his hand on its neck and murmured, Sleep, brother. Then he 
transferred the horse’s remaining vitality into himself and Saphira. It was 
not enough energy to restore all their strength, but it soothed their aching 
muscles and stopped their limbs from shaking. 


Rejuvenated, Eragon leaped onto Saphira, shouting, “Orik, take com- 
mand of your kinsmen!” Across the field, he saw Arya gaze at him with 
concern. He put her out of his mind as he tightened the saddle straps 
around his legs. Then Saphira launched herself toward the red dragon, 
pumping her wings at a furious rate to gain the necessary speed. 


I hope you remember your lessons with Glaedr, he said. He tightened his 
grip on his shield. 


Saphira did not answer him but roared out with her thoughts at the 
other dragon, Traitor! Egg breaker, oath breaker, murderer! Then as one, 
she and Eragon assaulted the minds of the pair, seeking to overwhelm 
their defenses. The consciousness of the Rider felt strange to Eragon, as if 
it contained multitudes; scores of distinct voices whispered in the caverns 


595 


of his mind, like imprisoned spirits begging for release. 


The instant they made contact, the Rider retaliated with a blast of pure 
force greater than any even Oromis was capable of summoning. Eragon 
retreated deep behind his own barriers, frantically reciting a scrap of dog- 
gerel Oromis taught him to use in such predicaments: 


Under a cold and empty winter sky 
Stood a wee, small man with a silver sword. 
He jumped and stabbed in a fevered frenzy, 


Fighting the shadows massed before him... 


The siege on Eragon’s mind abated as Saphira and the red dragon 
crashed together, two incandescent meteors colliding head-on. They 
grappled, kicking each other's bellies with their hind legs. Their talons 
produced hideous screeches as they grated against Saphira’s armor and the 
red dragon’s flat scales. The red dragon was smaller than Saphira, but 
thicker in his legs and shoulders. He managed to kick her off for a mo- 
ment, then they closed again, each struggling to get their jaws around the 
other’s neck. 


It was all Eragon could do to keep hold of Zar’roc as the dragons tum- 
bled toward the ground, battering one another with terrible blows from 
their feet and tails. No more than fifty yards above the Burning Plains, 
Saphira and the red dragon disengaged, struggling to regain altitude. Once 
she halted her descent, Saphira reared her head, like a snake about to 
strike, and loosed a thick torrent of fire. 


It never reached its destination; twelve feet from the red dragon, the 
fire bifurcated and passed harmlessly on either side. Blast it, thought Er- 
agon. Even as the red dragon opened its maw to retaliate, Eragon cried, 
“Sk6lir nosu fra brisingr!” He was just in time. The conflagration swirled 
around them but did not even scorch Saphira’s scales. 


Now Saphira and the red dragon raced up through the striated smoke 
into the clear, chill sky beyond, darting back and forth as they tried to 
climb above their opponent. The red dragon nipped Saphira’s tail, and 
she and Eragon yelped with shared pain. Panting from the effort, Saphira 
executed a tight backward loop, ending up behind the dragon, who then 


596 


pivoted to the left and tried to spiral up and over Saphira. 


While the dragons dueled with increasingly complex acrobatics, Eragon 
became aware of a disturbance on the Burning Plains: the spellcasters of 
Du Vrangr Gata were beset by two new magicians from the Empire. 
These magicians were far more powerful than those who had preceded 
them. They had already killed one of Du Vrangr Gata and were battering 
past the barriers of a second. Eragon heard Trianna scream with her mind, 
Shadeslayer! You have to help us! We can't stop them. They'll kill all the 
Varden. Help us, it’s the— 


Her voice was lost to him as the Rider stabbed at his consciousness. 
“This must end,” spat Eragon between clenched teeth as he strove to 
withstand the onslaught. Over Saphira’s neck, he saw the red dragon dive 
toward them, angling beneath Saphira. Eragon dared not open his mind 
enough to talk with Saphira, so he said out loud, “Catch me!” With two 
strokes of Zar’roc, he severed the straps around his legs and jumped off 
Saphira’s back. 


This is insane, thought Eragon. He laughed with giddy exhilaration as 
the feeling of weightlessness took hold of him. The rush of air tore off his 
helm and made his eyes water and sting. Releasing his shield, Eragon 
spread out his arms and legs, as Oromis had taught him, in order to stabi- 
lize his flight. Below, the steel-clad Rider noticed Eragon’s action. The red 
dragon shied to Eragon’s left but could not evade him. Eragon lashed out 
with Zar’roc as the dragon’s flank flashed by, and he felt the blade sink 
into the creature’s hamstring before his momentum carried him past. 


The dragon roared in agony. 


The impact of the blow sent Eragon spinning up, down, and around. By 
the time he managed to stop his rotation, he had plummeted through the 
cloud cover and was heading toward a swift and fatal landing on the 
Burning Plains. He could stop himself with magic if he had to, but it 
would drain his last reserves of energy. He glanced over both his shoul- 
ders. Come on, Saphira, where are you? 


As if in answer, she dropped out of the foul smoke, her wings pressed 
tight against her body. She swooped underneath him and opened her 
wings a bit to slow her fall. Careful not to impale himself on one of her 
spikes, Eragon maneuvered himself back into the saddle, welcoming the 
return of gravity as she pulled out of the dive. 


Never do that to me again, she snapped. 


597 


He surveyed the steaming blood that laced Zar’roc’s blade. It worked, 
didn't it? 


His satisfaction disappeared as he realized that his stunt had placed 
Saphira at the mercy of the red dragon. He hurtled at her from above, 
harrying her this way and that as he forced her toward the ground. 
Saphira tried to maneuver out from under him, but every time she did, 
he dove at her, biting and buffeting her with his wings in order to make 
her change course. 


The dragons twisted and lunged until their tongues lolled out of their 
mouths, their tails drooped, and they gave up flapping and merely glided. 


His mind once again closed to all contact, friendly or not, Eragon said 
out loud, “Land, Saphira; it’s no good. I'll fight him on the ground.” 


With a grunt of weary resignation, Saphira descended to the nearest flat 
open area, a small stone plateau set along the western edge of the Jiet 
River. The water had turned red from the blood pouring into it from the 
battle. Eragon jumped off Saphira once she alighted on the plateau and 
tested his footing. It was smooth and hard, with nothing to trip on. He 
nodded, pleased. 


A few seconds later, the red dragon rushed by overhead and settled on 
the opposite side of the plateau. He held his left hind leg off the ground 
to avoid aggravating his wound: a long gash that nearly severed the mus- 
cle. The dragon trembled his entire length, like an injured dog. He tried 
to hop forward, then stopped and snarled at Eragon. 


The enemy Rider unbuckled his legs and slid down the uninjured side 
of his dragon. Then he walked around the dragon and examined his leg. 
Eragon let him; he knew how much pain it would cause the man to see 
the damage inflicted on his bonded partner. He waited too long, though, 
for the Rider muttered a few indecipherable words, and within the span 
of three seconds the dragon’s injury was healed. 


Eragon shivered with fear. How could he do that so quickly, and with 
such a short spell? Still, whoever he might be, the new Rider certainly 
was not Galbatorix, whose dragon was black. 


Eragon clung to that knowledge as he stepped forward to confront the 


Rider. As they met in the center of the plateau, Saphira and the red 
dragon circled in the background. 


598 


The Rider grasped his sword with both hands and swung it over his 
head toward Eragon, who lifted Zar’roc to defend himself. Their blades 
collided with a burst of crimson sparks. Then Eragon shoved back his 
opponent and started a complex series of blows. He stabbed and parried, 
dancing on light feet as he forced the steel-clad Rider to retreat toward 
the edge of the plateau. 


When they reached the edge, the Rider held his ground, fending off Er- 
agon’s attacks, no matter how clever. It’s as if he can anticipate my every 
move, thought Eragon, frustrated. If he were rested, it would have been 
easy for him to defeat the Rider, but as it was, he could make no head- 
way. The Rider did not have the speed and strength of an elf, but his 
technical skill was better than Vanir’s and as good as Eragon’s. 


Eragon felt a touch of panic when his initial surge of energy began to 
subside and he had accomplished nothing more than a slight scratch 
across the Rider’s gleaming breastplate. The last reserves of power stored 
in Zar’roc’s ruby and the belt of Beloth the Wise were only enough to 
maintain his exertions for another minute. Then the Rider took a step 
forward. Then another. And before Eragon knew it, they had returned to 
the center of the plateau, where they stood facing each other, exchanging 
blows. 


Zar roc grew so heavy in his hand, Eragon could barely lift it. His shoul- 
der burned, he gasped for breath, and sweat poured off his face. Not even 
his desire to avenge Hrothgar could help him to overcome his exhaus- 
tion. 


At last Eragon slipped and fell. Determined not to be killed lying down, 
he rolled back onto his feet and stabbed at the Rider, who knocked aside 
Zar roc with a lazy flick of his wrist. 


The way the Rider flourished his sword afterward—spinning it in a 
quick circle by his side—suddenly seemed familiar to Eragon, as did all 
his preceding swordsmanship. He stared with growing horror at his en- 
emy’s hand-and-a-half sword, then back up at the eye slits of his mirrored 
helm, and shouted, “I know you!” 


He threw himself at the Rider, trapping both swords between their 
bodies, hooked his fingers underneath the helm, and ripped it off. And 
there in the center of the plateau, on the edge of the Burning Plains of 
Alagaésia, stood Murtagh. 


INHERITANCE 





Murtagh grinned. Then he said, “Thrysta vindr,” and a hard ball of air 
coalesced between them and struck Eragon in the middle of his chest, 
tossing him twenty feet across the plateau. 


Eragon heard Saphira growl as he landed on his back. His vision flashed 
red and white, then he curled into a ball and waited for the pain to re- 
cede. Any delight he felt in Murtagh’s reappearance was overwhelmed by 
the macabre circumstances of their meeting. A unstable mixture of 
shock, confusion, and anger boiled within him. 


Lowering his sword, Murtagh pointed at Eragon with his steel-encased 
hand, curling every finger but his index into a spiny fist. “You never 
would give up.” 


A chill crept along Eragon’s spine, for he recognized the scene from his 
premonition while rafting the Az Ragni to Hedarth: A man sprawled in 
the clotted mud with a dented helm and bloody mail—his face concealed 
behind an upthrown arm. An armored hand entered Eragon’s view and 
pointed at the downed man with all the authority of fate itself. Past and fu- 
ture had converged. Now Eragon’s doom would be decided. 


Pushing himself to his feet, he coughed and said, “Murtagh... how can 
you be alive? I watched the Urgals drag you underground. I tried to scry 
you but saw only darkness.” 


Murtagh uttered a mirthless laugh. “You saw nothing, just as I saw 
nothing the times I tried to scry you during my days in Urt’baen.” 


“You died, though!” shouted Eragon, almost incoherent. “You died un- 
der Farthen Dar. Arya found your bloody clothes in the tunnels.” 


A shadow darkened Murtagh’s face. “No, I did not die. It was the 
Twins’ doing, Eragon. They took control of a group of Urgals and ar- 
ranged the ambush in order to kill Ajihad and capture me. Then they en- 
sorcelled me so I could not escape and spirited me off to Urt’baen.” 


Eragon shook his head, unable to comprehend what had happened. 
“But why did you agree to serve Galbatorix? You told me you hated him. 


You told me—’ 


“Agree!” Murtagh laughed again, and this time his outburst contained 


600 


an edge of madness. “I did not agree. First Galbatorix punished me for 
spiting his years of protection during my upbringing in Urd’baen, for de- 
fying his will and running away. Then he extracted everything I knew 
about you, Saphira, and the Varden.” 


“You betrayed us! I was mourning you, and you betrayed us!” 
“I had no choice.” 


“Ajihad was right to lock you up. He should have let you rot in your 
cell, then none of this—’” 


“I had no choice!” snarled Murtagh. “And after Thorn hatched for me, 
Galbatorix forced both of us to swear loyalty to him in the ancient lan- 
guage. We cannot disobey him now.” 


Pity and disgust welled inside of Eragon. “You have become your fa- 
ther.” 


A strange gleam leaped into Murtagh’s eyes. “No, not my father. I’m 
stronger than Morzan ever was. Galbatorix taught me things about magic 
you've never even dreamed of.... Spells so powerful, the elves dare not ut- 
ter them, cowards that they are. Words in the ancient language that were 
lost until Galbatorix discovered them. Ways to manipulate energy... Se- 
crets, terrible secrets, that can destroy your enemies and fulfill all your 
desires.” 


Eragon thought back to some of Oromis’s lessons and retorted, “Things 
that should remain secrets.” 


“If you knew, you would not say that. Brom was a dabbler, nothing 
more. And the elves, bah! All they can do is hide in their forest and wait 
to be conquered.” Murtagh ran his eyes over Eragon. “You look like an elf 
now. Did Islanzadi do that to you?” When Eragon remained silent, 
Murtagh smiled and shrugged. “No matter. I’ll learn the truth soon 
enough.” He stopped, frowned, then looked to the east. 


Following his gaze, Eragon saw the Twins standing at the front of the 
Empire, casting balls of energy into the midst of the Varden and the 
dwarves. The curtains of smoke made it difficult to tell, but Eragon was 
sure the hairless magicians were grinning and laughing as they slaughtered 
the men with whom they once pledged solemn friendship. What the 
Twins failed to notice—and what was clearly visible to Eragon and 
Murtagh from their vantage point—was that Roran was crawling toward 


601 


them from the side. 


Eragon’s heart skipped a beat as he recognized his cousin. You fool! Get 
away from them! You'll be killed. 


Just as he opened his mouth to cast a spell that would transport Roran 
out of danger—no matter the cost—Murtagh said, “Wait. I want to see 


what he’ll do.” 
“Why?” 


A bleak smile crossed Murtagh’s face. “The Twins enjoyed tormenting 
me when I was their captive.” 


Eragon glanced at him, suspicious. “You won't hurt him? You won't 
warn the Twins?” 


“Vel einradhin iet ai Shur’tugal.” Upon my word as a Rider. 


Together they watched as Roran hid behind a mound of bodies. Eragon 
stiffened as the Twins looked toward the pile. For a moment, it seemed 
they had spotted him, then they turned away and Roran jumped up. He 
swung his hammer and bashed one of the Twins in the head, cracking 
open his skull. The remaining Twin fell to the ground, convulsing, and 
emitted a wordless scream until he too met his end under Roran’s ham- 
mer. Then Roran planted his foot upon the corpses of his foes, lifted his 
hammer over his head, and bellowed his victory. 


“What now?” demanded Eragon, turning away from the battlefield. 
“Are you here to kill me?” 


“Of course not. Galbatorix wants you alive.” 
“What for?” 


Murtagh’s lips quirked. “You don’t know? Ha! There’s a fine jest. It’s 
not because of you; it’s because of her.” He jabbed a finger at Saphira. 
“The dragon inside Galbatorix’s last egg, the last dragon egg in the world, 
is male. Saphira is the only female dragon in existence. If she breeds, she 
will be the mother of her entire race. Do you see now? Galbatorix 
doesn’t want to eradicate the dragons. He wants to use Saphira to rebuild 
the Riders. He can’t kill you, either of you, if his vision is to become real- 
ity... And what a vision it is, Eragon. You should hear him describe it, 
then you might not think so badly of him. Is it evil that he wants to unite 


602 


Alagaésia under a single banner, eliminate the need for war, and restore 
the Riders?” 


“He’s the one who destroyed the Riders in the first place!” 


“And for good reason,” asserted Murtagh. “They were old, fat, and cor- 
rupt. The elves controlled them and used them to subjugate humans. 
They had to be removed so that we could start anew.” 


A furious scowl contorted Eragon’s features. He paced back and forth 
across the plateau, his breathing heavy, then gestured at the battle and 
said, “How can you justify causing so much suffering on the basis of a 
madman’s ravings? Galbatorix has done nothing but burn and slaughter 
and amass power for himself. He lies. He murders. He manipulates. You 
know this! It’s why you refused to work for him in the first place.” Eragon 
paused, then adopted a gentler tone: “I can understand that you were 
compelled to act against your will and that you aren't responsible for kill- 
ing Hrothgar. You can try to escape, though. I’m sure that Arya and | 
could devise a way to neutralize the bonds Galbatorix has laid upon 
you.... Join me, Murtagh. You could do so much for the Varden. With us, 
you would be praised and admired, instead of cursed, feared, and hated.” 


For a moment, as Murtagh gazed down at his notched sword, Eragon 
hoped he would accept. Then Murtagh said in a low voice, “You cannot 
help me, Eragon. No one but Galbatorix can release us from our oaths, 
and he will never do that.... He knows our true names, Eragon.... We are 
his slaves forever.” 


Though he wanted to, Eragon could not deny the sympathy he felt for 
Murtagh’s plight. With the utmost gravity, he said, “Then let us kill the 
two of you.” 


“Kill us! Why should we allow that?” 


Eragon chose his words with care: “It would free you from Galbatorix’s 
control. And it would save the lives of hundreds, if not thousands, of 
people. Isn't that a noble enough cause to sacrifice yourself for?” 


Murtagh shook his head. “Maybe for you, but life is still too sweet for 
me to part with it so easily. No stranger’s life is more important than 


Thorn’s or my own.” 


As much as he hated it—hated the entire situation, in fact—Eragon 
knew then what had to be done. Renewing his attack on Murtagh’s mind, 


603 


he leaped forward, both feet leaving the ground as he lunged toward 
Murtagh, intending to stab him through the heart. 


“Letta!” barked Murtagh. 


Eragon dropped back to the ground as invisible bands clamped around 
his arms and legs, immobilizing him. To his right, Saphira discharged a jet 
of rippling fire and sprang at Murtagh like a cat pouncing on a mouse. 


“Risa!” commanded Murtagh, extending a clawlike hand as if to catch 


her. 


Saphira yelped with surprise as Murtagh’s incantation stopped her in 
midair and held her in place, floating several feet above the plateau. No 
matter how much she wriggled, she could not touch the ground, nor 
could she fly any higher. 


How can he still be human and have the strength to do that? wondered 
Eragon. Even with my new abilities, such a task would leave me gasping for 
air and unable to walk. Relying upon his experience counteracting 
Oromis’s spells, Eragon said, “Brakka du vanyali sem huildar Saphira un 
eka!” 


Murtagh made no attempt to stop him, only gave him a flat stare, as if 
he found Eragon’s resistance a pointless inconvenience. Baring his teeth, 
Eragon redoubled his efforts. His hands went cold, his bones ached, and 
his pulse slowed as the magic sapped his energy. Without being asked, 
Saphira joined forces with him, granting him access to the formidable re- 
sources of her body. 

Five seconds passed... 

Twenty seconds... A thick vein pulsed on Murtagh’s neck. 

A minute... 

A minute and a half... Involuntary tremors racked Eragon. His quadri- 
ceps and hamstrings fluttered, and his legs would have given way if he 
were free to move. 


Two minutes passed... 


At last Eragon was forced to release the magic, else he risked falling un- 
conscious and passing into the void. He sagged, utterly spent. 


604 


He had been afraid before, but only because he thought he might fail. 


Now he was afraid because he did not know what Murtagh was capable 
of. 


“You cannot hope to compete with me,” said Murtagh. “No one can, 
except for Galbatorix.” Walking up to Eragon, he pointed his sword at 
Eragon’s neck, pricking his skin. Eragon resisted the impulse to flinch. “It 
would be so easy to take you back to Urt’baen.” 


Eragon gazed deep into his eyes. “Don't. Let me go.” 
“You just tried to kill me.” 


“And you would have done the same in my position.” When Murtagh 
remained silent and expressionless, Eragon said, “We were friends once. 
We fought together. Galbatorix can’t have twisted you so much that 
you've forgotten.... If you do this, Murtagh, you'll be lost forever.” 


A long minute passed where the only sound was the hue and cry of the 
clashing armies. Blood trickled down Eragon’s neck from where the 
sword point cut him. Saphira lashed her tail with helpless rage. 


Finally, Murtagh said, “I was ordered to try and capture you and 
Saphira.” He paused. “I have tried... Make sure we don’t cross paths again. 
Galbatorix will have me swear additional oaths in the ancient language 
that will prevent me from showing you such mercy when next we meet.” 
He lowered his sword. 


“You're doing the right thing,” said Eragon. He tried to step back but 
was still held in place. 


“Perhaps. But before I let you go...” Reaching out, Murtagh pried Zar’roc 
from Eragon’s fist and unbuckled Zar'roc’s red sheath from the belt of Be- 
loth the Wise. “If I have become my father, then I will have my father’s 
blade. Thorn is my dragon, and a thorn he shall be to all our enemies. It is 
only right, then, that I should also wield the sword Misery. Misery and 
Thorn, a fit match. Besides, Zar’roc should have gone to Morzan’s eldest 
son, not his youngest. It is mine by right of birth.” 


A cold pit formed in Eragon’s stomach. It can’t be. 


A cruel smile appeared on Murtagh’s face. “I never told you my 
mother’s name, did I? And you never told me yours. I'll say it now: 


605 


Selena. Selena was my mother and your mother. Morzan was our father. 
The Twins figured out the connection while they were digging around in 
your head. Galbatorix was quite interested to learn that particular piece 
of information.” 


“You're lying!” cried Eragon. He could not bear the thought of being 
Morzan’s son. Did Brom know? Does Oromis know?... Why didn’t they tell 
me? He remembered, then, Angela predicting that someone in his family 
would betray him. She was right. 


Murtagh merely shook his head and repeated his words in the ancient 
language, then put his lips to Eragon’s ear and whispered, “You and I, we 
are the same, Eragon. Mirror images of one another. You can’t deny it.” 


“You're wrong,” growled Eragon, struggling against the spell. “We're 
nothing alike. I don’t have a scar on my back anymore.” 


Murtagh recoiled as if he had been stung, his face going hard and cold. 
He lifted Zar’'roc and held it upright before his chest. “So be it. I take my 
inheritance from you, brother. Farewell.” 


Then he retrieved his helm from the ground and pulled himself onto 
Thorn. Not once did he look at Eragon as the dragon crouched, raised its 
wings, and flew off the plateau and into the north. Only after Thorn van- 
ished below the horizon did the web of magic release Eragon and Saphira. 


Saphira’s talons clicked on the stone as she landed. She crawled over to 
Eragon and touched him on the arm with her snout. Are you all right, lit- 
tle one? 


I’m fine. But he was not, and she knew it. 


Walking to the edge of the plateau, Eragon surveyed the Burning Plains 
and the aftermath of the battle, for the battle was over. With the death 
of the Twins, the Varden and dwarves regained lost ground and were 
able to rout the formations of confused soldiers, herding them into the 
river or chasing them back from whence they came. 


Though the bulk of their forces remained intact, the Empire had 
sounded the retreat, no doubt to regroup and prepare for a second at- 
tempt to invade Surda. In their wake, they left piles of tangled corpses 
from both sides of the conflict, enough men and dwarves to populate an 
entire city. Thick black smoke roiled off the bodies that had fallen into 
the peat fires. 


606 


Now that the fighting had subsided, the hawks and eagles, the crows 
and ravens, descended like a shroud over the field. 


Eragon closed his eyes, tears leaking from under the lids. 


They had won, but he had lost. 


607 


REUNION 





Eragon and Saphira picked their way between the corpses that littered 
the Burning Plains, moving slowly on account of their wounds and their 
exhaustion. They encountered other survivors staggering through the 
scorched battlefield, hollow-eyed men who looked without truly seeing, 
their gazes focused somewhere in the distance. 


Now that his bloodlust had subsided, Eragon felt nothing but sorrow. 
The fighting seemed so pointless to him. What a tragedy that so many 
must die to thwart a single madman. He paused to sidestep a thicket of 
arrows planted in the mud and noticed the gash on Saphira’s tail where 
Thorn had bitten her, as well as her other injuries. Here, lend me your 
strength; I’ll heal you. 


Tend to those in mortal danger first. 
Are you sure? 
Quite sure, little one. 


Acquiescing, he bent down and mended a soldier’s torn neck before 
moving on to one of the Varden. He made no distinction between friend 
and foe, treating both to the limit of his abilities. 


Eragon was so preoccupied with his thoughts, he paid little attention to 
his work. He wished he could repudiate Murtagh’s claim, but everything 
Murtagh had said about his mother—their mother—coincided with the 
few things Eragon knew about her: Selena left Carvahall twenty-some 
years ago, returned once to give birth to Eragon, and was never seen 
again. His mind darted back to when he and Murtagh first arrived in Far- 
then Dar. Murtagh had discussed how his mother had vanished from 
Morzan’s castle while Morzan was hunting Brom, Jeod, and Saphira’s egg. 
After Morzan threw Zar'roc at Murtagh and nearly killed him, Mother must 
have hidden her pregnancy and then gone back to Carvahall in order to pro- 
tect me from Morzan and Galbatorix. 


It heartened Eragon to know that Selena had cared for him so deeply. It 
also grieved him to know she was dead and they would never meet, for 
he had nurtured the hope, faint as it was, that his parents might still be 
alive. He no longer harbored any desire to be acquainted with his father, 
but he bitterly resented that he had been deprived of the chance to have 
a relationship with his mother. 


608 


Ever since he was old enough to understand that he was a fosterling, 
Eragon had wondered who his father was and why his mother left him to 
be raised by her brother, Garrow, and his wife, Marian. Those answers 
had been thrust upon him from such an unexpected source, and in such 
an unpropitious setting, it was more than he could make sense of at the 
moment. It would take months, if not years, to come to terms with the 
revelation. 


Eragon always assumed he would be glad to learn the identity of his fa- 
ther. Now that he had, the knowledge revolted him. When he was 
younger, he often entertained himself by imagining that his father was 
someone grand and important, though Eragon knew the opposite was far 
more likely. Still, it never occurred to him, even in his most extravagant 
daydreams, that he might be the son of a Rider, much less one of the For- 
sworn. 


It turned a daydream into a nightmare. 


I was sired by a monster.... My father was the one who betrayed the Rid- 
ers to Galbatorix. It left Eragon feeling sullied. 


But no...As he healed a man’s broken spine, a new way of viewing the 
situation occurred to him, one that restored a measure of his self- 
confidence: Morzan may be my parent, but he is not my father. Garrow was 
my father. He raised me. He taught me how to live well and honorably, 
with integrity. I am who I am because of him. Even Brom and Oromis are 
more my father than Morzan. And Roran is my brother, not Murtagh. 


Eragon nodded, determined to maintain that outlook. Until then, he 
had refused to completely accept Garrow as his father. And even though 
Garrow was dead, doing so relieved Eragon, gave him a sense of closure, 
and helped to ameliorate his distress over Morzan. 


You have grown wise, observed Saphira. 


Wise? He shook his head. No, I’ve just learned how to think. That much, 
at least, Oromis gave me. Eragon wiped a layer of dirt off the face of a 
fallen banner boy, making sure he really was dead, then straightened, 
wincing as his muscles spasmed in protest. You realize, don’t you, that 
Brom must have known about this. Why else would he choose to hide in 
Carvahall while he waited for you to hatch?... He wanted to keep an eye 
upon his enemy’s son. It unsettled him to think that Brom might have 
considered him a threat. And he was right too. Look what ended up hap- 


609 


pening to me! 


Saphira ruffled his hair with a gust of her hot breath. Just remember, 
whatever Brom’s reasons, he always tried to protect us from danger. He died 
saving you from the Ra’zac. 


I know.... Do you think he didn't tell me about this because he was afraid 
I might emulate Morzan, like Murtagh has? 


Of course not. 


He looked at her, curious. How can you be so certain? She lifted her 
head high above him and refused to meet his eyes or to answer. Have it 
your way, then. Kneeling by one of King Orrin’s men, who had an arrow 
through the gut, Eragon grabbed his arms to stop him from writhing. 
“Easy now.” 


“Water,” groaned the man. “For pity’s sake, water. My throat is as dry as 
sand. Please, Shadeslayer.” Sweat beaded his face. 


Eragon smiled, trying to comfort him. “I can give you a drink now, but 
it'd be better if you wait until after I heal you. Can you wait? If you do, I 
promise you can have all the water you want.” 


“You promise, Shadeslayer?” 
“I promise.” 


The man visibly struggled against another wave of agony before saying, 
“If I must.” 


With the aid of magic, Eragon drew out the shaft, then he and Saphira 
worked to repair the man’s innards, using some of the warrior’s own en- 
ergy to fuel the spell. It took several minutes. Afterward, the man exam- 
ined his belly, pressing his hands against the flawless skin, then gazed at 
Eragon, tears brimming in his eyes. “I... Shadeslayer, you...” 


Eragon handed him his waterskin. “Here, keep it. You have greater 
need of it than I.” 


A hundred yards beyond, Eragon and Saphira breached an acrid wall of 
smoke. There they came upon Orik and ten other dwarves—some 
women—arrayed around the body of Hrothgar, who lay upon four 
shields, resplendent in his golden mail. The dwarves tore at their hair, 


610 


beat their breasts, and wailed their lamentations to the sky. Eragon 
bowed his head and murmured, “Stydja unin mor’ranr, Hrothgar 
Konungr.” 


After a time, Orik noticed them and rose, his face red from crying and 
his beard torn free of its usual braid. He staggered over to Eragon and, 
without preempt, asked, “Did you kill the coward responsible for this?” 


“He escaped.” Eragon could not bring himself to explain that the Rider 
was Murtagh. 


Orik stamped his fist into his hand. “Barztln!” 


“But I swear to you upon every stone in Alagaésia that, as one of Dar- 
grimst Ingeitum, I'll do everything I can to avenge Hrothgar’s death.” 


“Aye, you're the only one besides the elves strong enough to bring this 
foul murderer to justice. And when you find him... grind his bones to 
dust, Eragon. Pull his teeth and fill his veins with molten lead; make him 
suffer for every minute of Hrothgar’s life that he stole.” 


“Wasn't it a good death? Wouldn't Hrothgar have wanted to die in bat- 
tle, with Volund in his hand?” 


“In battle, yes, facing an honest foe who dared stand and fight like a 
man. Not brought low by a magician’s trickery....” Shaking his head, Orik 
looked back at Hrothgar, then crossed his arms and tucked his chin 
against his collarbone. He took several ragged breaths. “When my parents 
died of the pox, Hrothgar gave me a life again. He took me into his hall. 
He made me his heir. Losing him...” Orik pinched the bridge of his nose 
between his thumb and forefinger, covering his face. “Losing him is like 
losing my father again.” 


The grief in his voice was so clear, Eragon felt as if he shared the 
dwarf’s sorrow. “I understand,” he said. 


“I know you do, Eragon.... 1 know you do.” After a moment, Orik wiped 
his eyes and gestured at the ten dwarves. “Before anything else is done, 
we have to return Hrothgar to Farthen Dar so he can be entombed with 
his predecessors. Dtirgrimst Ingeitum must choose a new grimstborith, 
and then the thirteen clan chiefs—including the ones you see here—will 
select our next king from among themselves. What happens next, I know 
not. This tragedy will embolden some clans and turn others against our 
cause....” He shook his head again. 


Eragon put his hand on Orik’s shoulder. “Don’t worry about that now. 
You have but to ask, and my arm and my will are at your service.... If you 
want, come to my tent and we can share a cask of mead and toast Hroth- 
gar’s memory.” 


‘Td like that. But not yet. Not until we finish pleading with the gods to 
grant Hrothgar safe passage to the afterlife.” Leaving Eragon, Orik re- 


turned to the circle of dwarves and added his voice to their keening. 


Continuing on through the Burning Plains, Saphira said, Hrothgar was a 
great king. 


Aye, and a good person. Eragon sighed. We should find Arya and 
Nasuada. I couldn’t even heal a scratch right now, and they need to know 
about Murtagh. 

Agreed. 

They angled south toward the Varden’s encampment, but before they 
traveled more than a few yards, Eragon saw Roran approaching from the 
Jiet River. Trepidation filled him. Roran stopped directly in front of 
them, planted his feet wide apart, and stared at Eragon, working his jaw 
up and down as if he wanted to talk but was unable to get the words past 
his teeth. 

Then he punched Eragon on the chin. 


It would have been easy for Eragon to avoid the blow, but he allowed 
it to land, rolling away from it a bit so Roran did not break his knuckles. 


It still hurt. 

Wincing, Eragon faced his cousin. “I guess I deserved that.” 
“That you did. We have to talk.” 

“Now?” 


“It can’t wait. The Ra’zac captured Katrina, and I need your help to res- 
cue her. They’ve had her ever since we left Carvahall.” 


So that’s it. In an instant, Eragon realized why Roran appeared so grim 
and haunted, and why he had brought the entire village to Surda. Brom 


612 


was right, Galbatorix sent the Ra’zac back to Palancar Valley. Eragon 
frowned, torn between his responsibility to Roran and his duty to report 
to Nasuada. “There’s something I need to do first, and then we can talk. 
All right? You can accompany me if you want...” 


‘Tl come.” 


As they traversed the pockmarked land, Eragon kept glancing at Roran 
out of the corner of his eye. Finally, he said in a low voice, “I missed you.” 


Roran faltered, then responded with a curt nod. A few steps later, he 
asked, “This is Saphira, right? Jeod said that was her name.” 


“Aye.” 


Saphira peered at Roran with one of her glittering eyes. He bore her 
scrutiny without turning away, which was more than most people could 
do. I have always wanted to meet Eragon’s nest-mate. 


“She speaks!” exclaimed Roran when Eragon repeated her words. 


This time Saphira addressed him directly: What? Did you think I was as 
mute as a rock lizard? 


Roran blinked. “I beg your pardon. I didn’t know that dragons were so 
intelligent.” A grim smile twisted his lips. “First Ra’zac and magicians, 
now dwarves, Riders, and talking dragons. It seems the whole world has 
gone mad.” 


“It does seem that way.” 


“I saw you fight that other Rider. Did you wound him? Is that why he 
fled?” 


“Wait. You'll hear.” 


When they reached the pavilion Eragon was searching for, he swept 
back the flap and ducked inside, followed by Roran and Saphira, who 
pushed her head and neck in after them. In the center of the tent, 
Nasuada sat on the edge of the table, letting a maid remove her twisted 
armor while she carried on a heated discussion with Arya. The cut on her 


thigh had been healed. 


Nasuada stopped in the middle of her sentence as she spotted the new 


613 


arrivals. Running toward them, she threw her arms around Eragon and 
cried, “Where were you? We thought you were dead, or worse.” 


“Not quite.” 
“The candle still burns,” murmured Arya. 


Stepping back, Nasuada said, “We couldn't see what happened to you 
and Saphira after you landed on the plateau. When the red dragon left 
and you didn’t appear, Arya tried to contact you but felt nothing, so we 
assumed...” She trailed off. “We were just debating the best way to trans- 
port Du Vrangr Gata and an entire company of warriors across the river.” 


“I’m sorry. I didn’t mean to worry you. I was just so tired after the fight, 
I forgot to lower my barriers.” Then Eragon brought Roran forward. 
“Nasuada, I would like to introduce my cousin, Roran. Ajihad may have 
mentioned him to you before. Roran, Lady Nasuada, leader of the Varden 
and my liegelord. And this is Arya Svit-kona, the elves’ ambassador.” Ro- 
ran bowed to each of them in turn. 


“It is an honor to meet Eragon’s cousin,” said Nasuada. 
“Indeed,” added Arya. 


After they finished exchanging greetings, Eragon explained that the en- 
tire village of Carvahall had arrived on the Dragon Wing, and that Roran 
was the one responsible for killing the Twins. 


Nasuada lifted a dark eyebrow. “The Varden are in your debt, Roran, 
for stopping their rampage. Who knows how much damage the Twins 
would have caused before Eragon or Arya could have confronted them? 
You helped us to win this battle. I won’t forget that. Our supplies are 
limited, but I will see that everyone on your ship is clothed and fed, and 
that your sick are treated.” 


Roran bowed even lower. “Thank you, Lady Nasuada.” 


“If I weren’t so pressed for time, I would insist upon knowing how and 
why you and your village evaded Galbatorix’s men, traveled to Surda, and 
then found us. Even just the bare facts of your trek make an extraordi- 
nary tale. I still intend to learn the specifics—especially since I suspect it 
concerns Eragon—but I must deal with other, more urgent matters at the 
moment.” 


614 


“Of course, Lady Nasuada.” 
“You may go, then.” 
“Please,” said Eragon, “let him stay. He should be here for this.” 


Nasuada gave him a quizzical look. “Very well. If you want. But enough 
of this dawdling. Jump to the meat of the matter and tell us about the 
Rider!” 


Eragon began with a quick history of the three remaining dragon eggs— 
two of which had now hatched—as well as Morzan and Murtagh, so that 
Roran would understand the significance of his news. Then he proceeded 
to describe his and Saphira’s fight with Thorn and the mysterious Rider, 
paying special attention to his extraordinary powers. “As soon as he spun 
his sword around, I realized we had dueled before, so I threw myself at 
him and tore off his helm.” Eragon paused. 


“It was Murtagh, wasn’t it?” asked Nasuada quietly. 
“How... ?” 


She sighed. “If the Twins survived, it only made sense that Murtagh had 
as well. Did he tell you what really happened that day in Farthen Dtr?” 
So Eragon recounted how the Twins betrayed the Varden, recruited the 
Urgals, and kidnapped Murtagh. A tear rolled down Nasuada’s cheek. “It’s 
a pity that this befell Murtagh when he has already endured so much 
hardship. I enjoyed his company in Tronjheim and believed he was our 
ally, despite his upbringing. I find it hard to think of him as our enemy.” 
Turning to Roran, she said, “It seems I am also personally in your debt for 
slaying the traitors who murdered my father.” 


Fathers, mothers, brothers, cousins, thought Eragon. It all comes down to 
family. Summoning his courage, he completed his report with Murtagh’s 
theft of Zar’roc and then his final, terrible secret. 


“It can’t be,” whispered Nasuada. 


Eragon saw shock and revulsion cross Roran’s face before he managed 
to conceal his reactions. That, more than anything else, hurt Eragon. 


“Could Murtagh have been lying?” asked Arya. 


“I don’t see how. When I questioned him, he told me the same thing in 


615 


the ancient language.” 
A long, uncomfortable silence filled the pavilion. 


Then Arya said, “No one else can know about this. The Varden are 
demoralized enough by the presence of a new Rider. And they'll be even 
more upset when they learn it’s Murtagh, whom they fought alongside 
and came to trust in Farthen Dar. If word spreads that Eragon Shade- 
slayer is Morzan’s son, the men will grow disillusioned and few people 
will want to join us. Not even King Orrin should be told.” 


Nasuada rubbed her temples. “I fear you're right. A new Rider...” She 
shook her head. “I knew it was possible for this to occur, but I didn’t 
really believe it would, since Galbatorix’s remaining eggs had gone so 
long without hatching.” 


“It has a certain symmetry,” said Eragon. 


“Our task is doubly hard now. We may have held our own today, but 
the Empire still far outnumbers us, and now we face not one but two 
Riders, both of whom are stronger than you, Eragon. Do you think you 
could defeat Murtagh with the help of the elves’ spellcasters?” 


“Maybe. But I doubt he’d be foolish enough to fight them and me to- 
gether.” 


For several minutes, they discussed the effect Murtagh could have on 
their campaign and strategies to minimize or eliminate it. At last Nasuada 
said, “Enough. We cannot decide this when we are bloody and tired and 
our minds are clouded from fighting. Go, rest, and we shall take this up 
again tomorrow.” 


As Eragon turned to leave, Arya approached and looked him straight in 
the eye. “Do not allow this to trouble you overmuch, Eragon-elda. You 
are not your father, nor your brother. Their shame is not yours.” 


“Aye,” agreed Nasuada. “Nor imagine that it has lowered our opinion of 
you.” She reached out and cupped his face. “I know you, Eragon. You 
have a good heart. The name of your father cannot change that.” 


Warmth blossomed inside Eragon. He looked from one woman to the 


next, then twisted his hand over his chest, overwhelmed by their friend- 
ship. “Thank you.” 


616 


Once they were back out in the open, Eragon put his hands on his hips 
and took a deep breath of the smoky air. It was late in the day, and the 
garish orange of noon had subsided into a dusky gold light that suffused 
the camp and battlefield, giving it a strange beauty. “So now you know,” 


he said. 
Roran shrugged. “Blood always tells.” 
“Don’t say that,” growled Eragon. “Don’t ever say that.” 


Roran studied him for several seconds. “You're right; it was an ugly 
thought. I didn’t mean it.” He scratched his beard and squinted at the 
bloated sun resting upon the horizon. “Nasuada wasn’t what I expected.” 


That forced a tired chuckle out of Eragon. “The one you were expect- 
ing was her father, Ajihad. Still, she’s as good a leader as he was, if not 
better.” 


“Her skin, is it dyed?” 
“No, that’s the way she is.” 


Just then, Eragon felt Jeod, Horst, and a score of other men from Car- 
vahall hurrying toward them. The villagers slowed as they rounded a tent 
and glimpsed Saphira. “Horst!” exclaimed Eragon. Stepping forward, he 
grasped the smith in a bear hug. “It’s good to see you again!” 


Horst gaped at Eragon, then a delighted grin spread across his face. 
“Blast if it isn’t good to see you as well, Eragon. You've filled out since 
you left.” 


“You mean since I ran away.” 

Meeting the villagers was a strange experience for Eragon. Hardship had 
altered some of the men so much, he barely recognized them. And they 
treated him differently than before, with a mixture of awe and reverence. 
It reminded him of a dream, where everything familiar is rendered alien. 
He was disconcerted by how out of place he felt among them. 


When Eragon came to Jeod, he paused. “You know about Brom?” 


“Ajihad sent me a message, but I’d like to hear what happened directly 
from you.” 


617 


Eragon nodded, grave. “As soon as I have the chance, we'll sit down to- 
gether and have a long talk.” 


Then Jeod moved on to Saphira and bowed to her. “I waited my entire 
life to see a dragon, and now I have seen two in the same day. I am in- 
deed lucky. However, you are the dragon I wanted to meet.” 


Bending her neck, Saphira touched Jeod on the brow. He shivered at 
the contact. Give him my thanks for helping to rescue me from Galbatorix. 
Otherwise, I would still be languishing in the king’s treasury. He was 
Brom’s friend, and so he is our friend. 


After Eragon repeated her words, Jeod said, “Atra esterni ono thelduin, 
Saphira Bjartskular,” surprising them with his knowledge of the ancient 
language. 


“Where did you go?” Horst asked Roran. “We looked high and low for 
you after you took off in pursuit of those two magicians.” 


“Never mind that now. Return to the ship and have everyone disem- 
bark; the Varden are sending us food and shelter. We can sleep on solid 
ground tonight!” The men cheered. 


Eragon watched with interest as Roran issued his commands. When at 
last Jeod and the villagers departed, Eragon said, “They trust you. Even 
Horst obeys you without question. Do you speak for all of Carvahall 
now?” 


“J do.” 


Heavy darkness was advancing upon the Burning Plains by the time 
they found the small two-man tent the Varden had assigned Eragon. 
Since Saphira could not fit her head through the opening, she curled up 
on the ground beside and prepared to keep watch. 


As soon as I get my strength back, I'll see to your wounds, promised Er- 
agon. 


I know. Don’t stay up too late talking. 


Inside the tent, Eragon found an oil lantern that he lit with steel and 
flint. He could see perfectly well without it, but Roran needed the light. 


They sat opposite each other: Eragon on the bedding laid out along one 


618 


side of the tent, Roran on a folding stool he found leaning in a corner. Er- 
agon was uncertain how to begin, so he remained silent and stared at the 
lamp’s dancing flame. 


Neither of them moved. 
After uncounted minutes, Roran said, “Tell me how my father died.” 


“Our father.” Eragon remained calm as Roran’s expression hardened. In 
a gentle voice, he said, “I have as much right to call him that as you. Look 
within yourself; you know it to be true.” 


“Fine. Our father, how did he die?” 


Eragon had recounted the story upon several occasions. But this time he 
hid nothing. Instead of just listing the events, he described what he had 
thought and felt ever since he had found Saphira’s egg, trying to make 
Roran understand why he did what he did. He had never been so anxious 
before. 


“I was wrong to hide Saphira from the rest of the family,’ Eragon con- 
cluded, “but I was afraid you might insist on killing her, and I didn’t real- 
ize how much danger she put us in. If I had... After Garrow died, I de- 
cided to leave in order to track down the Ra’zac, as well as to avoid put- 
ting Carvahall in any more danger.” A humorless laugh escaped him. “It 
didn’t work, but if I had remained, the soldiers would have come far 
sooner. And then who knows? Galbatorix might have even visited Palan- 
car Valley himself. I may be the reason Garrow—Father—died, but that 
was never my intention, nor that you and everyone else in Carvahall 
should suffer because of my choices...” He gestured helplessly. “I did the 
best I could, Roran.” 


“And the rest of it—Brom being a Rider, rescuing Arya at Gil’ead, and 
killing a Shade at the dwarves’ capital—all that happened?” 


“Aye.” As quickly as he could, Eragon summarized what had taken 
place since he and Saphira set forth with Brom, including their sojourn to 
Ellesméra and his own transformation during the Agaeti Blédhren. 


Leaning forward, Roran rested his elbows on his knees, clasped his 
hands, and gazed at the dirt between them. It was impossible for Eragon 
to read his emotions without reaching into his consciousness, which he 
refused to do, knowing it would be a terrible mistake to invade Roran’s 
privacy. 


619 


Roran was silent for so long, Eragon began to wonder if he would ever 
respond. Then: “You have made mistakes, but they are no greater than 
my own. Garrow died because you kept Saphira secret. Many more have 
died because I refused to give myself up to the Empire.... We are equally 
guilty.” He looked up, then slowly extended his right hand. “Brother?” 


“Brother,” said Eragon. 


He gripped Roran’s forearm, and they pulled each other into a rough 
embrace, wrestling to and fro as they used to do at home. When they 
separated, Eragon had to wipe his eyes with the heel of his hand. “Galba- 
torix should surrender now that we're together again,” he joked. “Who 
can stand against the two of us?” He lowered himself back onto the bed- 
ding. “Now you tell me, how did the Ra’zac capture Katrina?” 


All happiness vanished from Roran’s face. He began to speak in a low 
monotone, and Eragon listened with growing amazement as he wove an 
epic of attacks, sieges, and betrayal, of leaving Carvahall, crossing the 
Spine, and razing the docks of Teirm, of sailing through a monstrous 
whirlpool. 


When at last he finished, Eragon said, “You are a greater man than I. I 
couldn't have done half those things. Fight, yes, but not convince every- 
one to follow me.” 


“I had no choice. When they took Katrina—” Roran’s voice broke. “I 
could either give up and die, or I could try to escape Galbatorix’s trap, no 
matter the cost.” He fixed his burning eyes on Eragon. “I have lied and 
burned and slaughtered to get here. I no longer have to worry about pro- 
tecting everyone from Carvahall; the Varden will see to that. Now I have 
only one goal in life, to find and rescue Katrina, if she’s not already dead. 
Will you help me, Eragon?” 


Reaching over, Eragon grabbed his saddlebags from the corner of the 
tent—where the Varden had deposited them—and removed a wooden 
bowl and the silver flask of enchanted faelnirv Oromis had given him. He 
took a small sip of the liqueur to revitalize himself and gasped as it raced 
down his throat, making his nerves tingle with cold fire. Then he poured 
faelnirv into the bowl until it formed a shallow pool the width of his 
hand. 


“Watch.” Gathering up his burst of new energy, Eragon said, “Draumr 
kopa.” 


620 


The liqueur shimmered and turned black. After a few seconds, a thin 
key of light appeared in the center of the bowl, revealing Katrina. She lay 
slumped against an invisible wall, her hands suspended above her with 
invisible manacles and her copper hair splayed like a fan across her back. 


“She’s alive!” Roran hunched over the bowl, grasping at it as if he 
thought he could dive through the faelnirv and join Katrina. His hope 
and determination melded with a look of such tender affection, Eragon 
knew that only death could stop Roran from trying to free her. 


Unable to sustain the spell any longer, Eragon let the image fade away. 
He leaned against the wall of the tent for support. “Aye,” he said wearily, 
“she’s alive. And chances are, she’s imprisoned in Helgrind, in the Ra’zac’s 
lair.” Eragon grasped Roran by the shoulders. “The answer to your ques- 
tion, brother, is yes. I will travel to Dras-Leona with you. I will help you 
rescue Katrina. And then, together, you and I shall kill the Ra’zac and 
avenge our father.” 


END OF BOOK TWO 


THE STORY WILL CONTINUE IN 
BOOK THREE OF INHERITANCE 


PRONUNCIATION GUIDE AND GLOSSARY 





ON THE ORIGIN OF NAMES: 


To the casual observer, the various names an intrepid traveler will en- 
counter throughout Alagaésia might seem but a random collection of la- 
bels with no inherent integrity, culture, or history. However, as with any 
land that has been repeatedly colonized by different cultures—and in this 
case, different races—Alagaésia quickly accumulated layers of names 
from the elves, dwarves, humans, and even Urgals. Thus, we can have 
Palancar Valley (a human name), the Anora River and Ristvak’baen 
(elven names), and Utgard Mountain (a dwarf name) all within a few 
square miles of each other. 


While this is of great historical interest, practically it often leads to con- 
fusion as to the correct pronunciation. Unfortunately, there are no set 
rules for the neophyte. Each name must be learned upon its own terms, 
unless you can immediately place its language of origin. The matter grows 
even more confusing when you realize that in many places the spelling 
and pronunciation of foreign words were altered by the resident popula- 
tion to conform to their own language. The Anora River is a prime ex- 
ample. Originally anora was spelled denora, which means broad in the 
ancient language. In their writings, the humans simplified the word to 
anora, and this, combined with a vowel shift wherein de (ay-eh) was said 
as the easier a (uh), created the name as it appears in Eragon’s time. 


To spare readers as much difficulty as possible, the following list is 
provided, with the understanding that these are only rough guidelines to 
the actual pronunciation. The enthusiast is encouraged to study the 
source languages in order to master their true intricacies. 

PRONUNCIATION: 
Aiedail — AY-uh-dale 
Ajihad — AH-zhi-hod 
Alagaésia — al-uh-GA Y-zee-uh 
Arya — AR-ee-uh 


Carvahall — CAR-vuh-hall 


Dras-Leona — DRAHS lee-OH-nuh 

Du Weldenvarden — doo WELL-den-V AR-den 
Ellesméra — el-uhs-MEER-uh 

Eragon — EHR-uh-gahn 

Farthen Dar — FAR-then DURE (dure rhymes with lure ) 
Galbatorix — gal-buh-TOR-icks 

Gil’ead — GILL-ee-id 

Glaedr — GLAY-dur 

Hrothgar — HROTH-gar 

Islanzadi — iss-lan-ZAH-dee 

Jeod — JODE (rhymes with code ) 

Murtagh — MUR-tag (mur rhymes with purr ) 
Nasuada — nah-SOO-ah-dah 

Nolfavrell — NOLL-fah-vrel (noll rhymes with toll ) 
Oromis — OR-uh-miss 

Ra’zac — RAA-zack 

Saphira — suh-FEAR-uh 

Shruikan — SHREW-kin 


Silthrim — SEAL-thrim (sil is a hard sound to transcribe; it’s made by 
flicking the tip of the tongue off the roof of the mouth.) 


Teirm — TEERM 


Trianna — TREE-ah-nuh 


623 


Tronjheim — TRONJ-heem 
Urt’baen — OO-roo-bane 
Vrael — VRAIL 

Yazuac — YAA-zoo-ack 


Zarroc — ZAR-rock 


THE ANCIENT LANGUAGE: 
adurna — water 
Agaeti Blédhren — Blood-oath Celebration 
Aiedail — The Morning Star 
Argetlam — Silver Hand 
Atra esterni ono thelduin/Mor’ranr lifa unin hjarta onr/Un du evarinya 
ono varda. — May good fortune rule over you/Peace live in your 


heart/And the stars watch over you. 


Atra gulia un ilian tauthr ono un atra ono waise skélir fra rauthr. — May 
luck and happiness follow you and may you be a shield from misfortune. 


Atra nosu waise vardo fra eld hérnya. — Let us be warded from listeners. 
Bjartskular — Brightscales 
bléthr — halt; stop 


Brakka du vanyali sem huildar Saphira un eka! — Reduce the magic that 
holds Saphira and me! 


brisingr — fire 
Dagshelgr — Hallowed Day 


draumr képa — dream stare 


624 


Du Fells Nangoréth — The Blasted Mountains 

Du Fyrn Skulblaka — The Dragon War 

Du Véollar Eldrvarya — The Burning Plains 

Du Vrangr Gata — The Wandering Path 

Du Weldenvarden — The Guarding Forest 

dvergar — dwarves 

ebrithil — master 

edur — a tor or prominence 

Eka fricai un Shur’tugal. — I am a Rider and friend. 

elda — a gender-neutral honorific of great praise 

Eyddr eyreya onr! — Empty your ears! 

fairth — a picture taken by magical means 

finiarel — an honorific for a young man of great promise 

Fricai Andlat — death friend (a poisonous mushroom) 

Gala O Wyrda brunhvitr/Abr Berundal vandr-fédhr/Burthro laufsbladar 
ekar undir/Eom kona dauthleikr... — Sing O white-browed Fate/Of ill- 
marked Berundal/Born under oaken leaves/To mortal woman... 
ganga aptr — to go backward 

ganga fram — to go forward 

Gath sem oro un lam iet. — Unite that arrow with my hand. 
gedwéy ignasia — shining palm 

Géuloth du knifr. — Dull the knife. 


haldthin — thornapple 


625 


Helgrind — The Gates of Death 

hlaupa — run 

hljédhr — silent 

jierda — break; hit 

kodthr — catch 

Kvetha Fricai. — Greetings, Friend. 
lethrblaka — a bat; the Ra’zac’s mounts (literally, leather-flapper) 
letta — stop 

Letta orya thorna! — Stop those arrows! 
Liduen Kvaedhi — Poetic Script 

Losna kalfya iet. — Release my calves. 
malthinae — to bind or hold in place; confine 


nalgask — a mixture of beeswax and hazelnut oil used to moisten the 
skin 


Osthato Chetowa — the Mourning Sage 

Reisa du adurna. — Raise/Lift the water. 

risa — rise 

Sé mor’ranr ono finna. — May you find peace. 

Sé onr sverdar sitja hvass! — May your swords stay sharp! 


Sé oram thornessa havr sharjalvi lifs. — May this serpent have life’s 
movement. 


sk6lir — shield 


Skélir nosu fra brisingr! — Shield us from fire! 


626 


sk6liro — shielded 
skulblaka — dragon (literally, scale-flapper) 


Stydja unin morranr, Hrothgar Kénungr. — Rest in peace, King Hroth- 
gar. 


svit-kona — a formal honorific for an elf woman of great wisdom 
thrysta — thrust; compress 

Thrysta vindr. — Compress the air. 

Togira Ikonoka — the Cripple Who Is Whole 

the Varden — the Warders 

Vel einradhin iet ai Shur’tugal. — Upon my word as a Rider. 
Vinr Alfakyn — EIf Friend 

vodhr — a male honorific of middling praise 

vor — a male honorific for a close friend 

Waise heill. — Be healed. 

Wiol ono. — For you. 

wyrda — fate 

Wyrdfell — elven name for the Forsworn 

yawé — a bond of trust 


zar roc — misery 


THE DWARF LANGUAGE: 
Akh sartos oen dtirgrimst! — For family and clan! 


Asctidgamln — fists of steel 


627 


Astim Hefthyn — Sight Guard (inscription on a necklace given to Er- 
agon) 


Az Ragni — The River 

Az Sweldn rak Anhtin — The Tears of Anhtin 

Azt jok jordn rast. — Then you may pass. 

barzal — to curse someone with ill fate 

Barzél knurlar! — Curse them! 

barzaln — to curse someone with multiple misfortunes 

Beor — cave bear (elf word) 

dargrimst — clan (literally, our hall/home) 

eta — no 

Etzil nithgech! — Stop there! 

Farthen Dar — Our Father 

Feldtinost — frostbeard (a species of goat native to the Beor Mountains) 
Formv Hrethcarach... formy Jurgencarmeitder nos eta goroth bahst Tar- 
nag, dir encesti rak kythn! Jok is warrev az barztlegar dtr dargrimst, Az 
Sweldn rak Anhtin, mégh tor rak Jurgenvren? Né tidim etal os rast knur- 
lag. Knurlag ana... — This Shadeslayer... this Dragon Rider has no place in 
Tarnag, our holiest of cities! Do you forget the curse our clan, The Tears 
of Anhtin, bears from the Dragon War? We will not let him pass. He is... 
grimstborith — clan chief 

grimstcarvlorss — arranger of the house 

Gintera ArGna — Gitntera Bless 


Hert dargrimst? Fild rastn? — What clan? Who passes? 


hirna — likeness; statue 


628 


htathvir — double-bladed staff weapon used by Dargrimst Quan 

Ignh az voth! — Bring the food! 

IIf gauhnith. — A peculiar dwarf expression that means “It is safe and 
good.” Commonly uttered by the host of a meal, it is a holdover from 
days when poisoning of guests was prevalent among the clans. 

Ingeitum — fire workers; smiths 

Isidar Mithrim — Star Rose 

Jok is frekk dargrimstvren? — Do you want a clan war? 

knurl — stone; rock 

knurla — dwarf (literally, one of stone) 

Knurlag gana qirani Ddargrimst Ingeitum! Qarztl ana Hrothgar oen 
volfild — He was made a member of Clan Ingeitum! Cursed is Hrothgar 
and all who— 

knurlagn — men 

Knurlhiem — Stonehead 

Knurlnien — Heart of Stone 

Nagra — giant boar, native to the Beor Mountains 

oei — yes; affirmative 

Orik Thrifkz menthiv oen Hrethcarach Eragon rak Dtrgrimst Ingeitum. 
Wharn, az vanyali-carharig Arya. Né oc Undinz grimstbelardn. — Orik, 
Thrifk’s son, and Shadeslayer Eragon of Clan Ingeitum. Also, the elf- 
courier Arya. We are Undin’s hall-guests. 

Os il dom qirant carn dtr thargen, zeitmen, oen grimst vor formv edaris 
rak skilfz. Narho is belgond... — Let our flesh, honor, and hall be made as 
one by this blood of mine. I do pledge... 


otho — faith 


629 


Ragni Hefthyn — River Guard 

Shrrg — giant wolf, native to the Beor Mountains 
Smer voth. — Serve the food. 

Tronjheim — Helm of Giants 

Urzhad — cave bear 


vanyali — elf (The dwarves borrowed this word from the ancient lan- 
guage, wherein it means magic. ) 


Vor Hrothgarz korda! — By Hrothgar’s hammer! 
vrron — enough 


werg — an exclamation of disgust (the dwarves’ equivalent of ugh ) 


THE URGAL LANGUAGE: 
Ahgrat ukmar. — It is done. 
drajl — spawn of maggots 


nar — a gender-neutral title of great respect 
